SEVENTEEN CONTRADICTIONS AND THE END OF CAPITALISM

ALSO BY DAVID HARVEY

_The Limits to Capital_ (1982)
_The Condition of Postmodernity_ (1989)
_The New Imperialism_ (2003)
_A Brief History of Neoliberalism_ (2005)
_Spaces of Global Capitalism_ (2006)
_The Communist Manifesto: New Introduction_ (2009)
_Cosmopolitanism and the Geographies of Freedom_ (2009)
_Social Justice and the City: Revised Edition_ (2009)
_A Companion to Marx’s_ Capital (2010)
_The Enigma of Capital_ (2010)
_Rebel Cities: From the Right to the City to the Urban Revolution_
(2012)
_A Companion to Marx’s_ Capital, _Volume Two_ (2013)



SEVENTEEN CONTRADICTIONS AND THE END OF CAPITALISM


DAVID HARVEY

[image]

[image]

Oxford University Press is a department of the University of Oxford.
It furthers the University’s objective of excellence in research,
scholarship, and education by publishing worldwide.

Oxford New York
Auckland   Cape   Town   Dar es Salaam   Hong Kong   Karachi
Kuala Lumpur   Madrid   Melbourne   Mexico City   Nairobi
New Delhi   Shanghai   Taipei Toronto

With offices in
Argentina   Austria   Brazil   Chile   Czech Republic   France   Greece
Guatemala  Hungary   Italy   Japan   Poland   Portugal  Singapore
South Korea   Switzerland   Thailand   Turkey   Ukraine   Vietnam

Oxford is a registered trade mark of Oxford University Press
in the UK and certain other countries.

Published in the United States of America by
Oxford University Press
198 Madison Avenue, New York, NY 10016

© David Harvey 2014

All rights reserved. No part of this publication may be reproduced,
stored in a retrieval system, or transmitted, in any form or by any
means, without the prior permission in writing of Oxford University
Press, or as expressly permitted by law, by license, or under terms
agreed with the appropriate reproduction rights organization. Inquiries
concerning reproduction outside the scope of the above should be sent to
the Rights Department, Oxford University Press, at the address above.

You must not circulate this work in any other form
and you must impose this same condition on any acquirer.

Cataloging-in-Publication data is on file with the Library of Congress
ISBN 978-0-19-936026-0

9   8   7   6   5   4  3   2   1
Printed in the United States of America on acid-free paper

To John Davey
In recognition of his wise counsel and support for almost everything I
have ever published


Contents

PROLOGUE
The Crisis of Capitalism This Time Around

INTRODUCTION
On Contradiction

PART ONE: THE FOUNDATIONAL CONTRADICTIONS

1 Use Value and Exchange Value

2 The Social Value of Labour and Its Representation by Money

3 Private Property and the Capitalist State

4 Private Appropriation and Common Wealth

5 Capital and Labour

6 Capital as Process or Thing?

7 The Contradictory Unity of Production and Realisation

PART TWO: THE MOVING CONTRADICTIONS

8 Technology, Work and Human Disposability

9 Divisions of Labour

10 Monopoly and Competition: Centralisation and Decentralisation

11 Uneven Geographical Developments and the Production of Space

12 Disparities of Income and Wealth

13 Social Reproduction

14 Freedom and Domination

PART THREE: THE DANGEROUS CONTRADICTIONS

15 Endless Compound Growth

16 Capital’s Relation to Nature

17 The Revolt of Human Nature: Universal Alienation

CONCLUSION
Prospects for a Happy but Contested Future: The Promise of Revolutionary
Humanism

EPILOGUE
Ideas for Political Praxis

Notes
Bibliography and Further Reading
Index


Prologue


The Crisis of Capitalism This Time Around

Crises are essential to the reproduction of capitalism. It is in the
course of crises that the instabilities of capitalism are confronted,
reshaped and re-engineered to create a new version of what capitalism is
about. Much gets torn down and laid waste to make way for the new.
Once-productive landscapes are turned into industrial waste-lands, old
factories are torn down or converted to new uses, working-class
neighbourhoods get gentrified. Elsewhere, small farms and peasant
holdings are displaced by large-scale industrialised agriculture or by
sleek new factories. Business parks, R&D and wholesale warehousing and
distribution centres sprawl across the land in the midst of suburban
tract housing, linked together with clover-leafed highways. Central
cities compete with how tall and glamorous their office towers and
iconic cultural buildings might be, mega-shopping malls galore
proliferate in city and suburb alike, some even doubling as airports
through which hordes of tourists and business executives ceaselessly
pass in a world gone cosmopolitan by default. Golf courses and gated
communities pioneered in the USA can now be seen in China, Chile and
India, contrasting with sprawling squatter and self-built settlements
officially designated as slums, favelas or _barrios pobres_.

But what is so striking about crises is not so much the wholesale
reconfiguration of physical landscapes, but dramatic changes in ways of
thought and understanding, of institutions and dominant ideologies, of
political allegiances and processes, of political subjectivities, of
technologies and organisational forms, of social relations, of the
cultural customs and tastes that inform daily life. Crises shake our
mental conceptions of the world and of our place in it to the very core.
And we, as restless participants and inhabitants of this new emerging
world, have to adapt, through coercion or consent, to the new state of
things, even as we, by virtue of what we do and how we think and behave,
add our two cents’ worth to the messy qualities of this world.

In the midst of a crisis it is hard to see where the exit might be.
Crises are not singular events. While they have their obvious triggers,
the tectonic shifts they represent take many years to work out. The
long-drawn-out crisis that began with the stock market crash of 1929 was
not finally resolved until the 1950s, after the world had passed through
the Depression of the 1930s and the global war of the 1940s. Likewise,
the crisis whose existence was signalled by turbulence in international
currency markets in the late 1960s and the events of 1968 on the streets
of many cities (from Paris and Chicago to Mexico City and Bangkok) was
not resolved until the mid-1980s, having passed through the early 1970s
collapse of the Bretton Woods international monetary system set up in
1944, a turbulent decade of labour struggles in the 1970s and the rise
and consolidation of the politics of neoliberalisation under Reagan,
Thatcher, Kohl, Pinochet and, ultimately, Deng in China.

With the benefit of hindsight it is not hard to spot abundant signs of
problems to come well before a crisis explodes into full view. The
surging inequalities in monetary wealth and incomes of the 1920s and the
property market asset bubble that popped in 1928 in the USA presaged the
collapse of 1929, for example. Indeed, the manner of exit from one
crisis contains within itself the seeds of crises to come. The
debt-saturated and increasingly deregulated global financialisation that
began in the 1980s as a way to solve conflicts with labour by
facilitating geographical mobility and dispersal produced its denouement
in the fall of the investment bank of Lehman Brothers on 15 September
2008.

It is, at the time of writing, more than five years since that event,
which triggered the cascading financial collapses that followed. If the
past is any guide, it would be churlish to expect at this point any
clear indications of what a revivified capitalism – if such is possible
– might look like. But there should by now be competing diagnoses of
what is wrong and a proliferation of proposals for putting things right.
What is astonishing is the paucity of new thinking or policies. The
world is broadly polarised between a continuation (as in Europe and the
United States) if not a deepening of neoliberal, supply-side and
monetarist remedies that emphasise austerity as the proper medicine to
cure our ills; and the revival of some version, usually watered down, of
a Keynesian demand-side and debt-financed expansion (as in China) that
ignores Keynes’s emphasis upon the redistribution of income to the lower
classes as one of its key components. No matter which policy is being
followed, the result is to favour the billionaires club that now
constitutes an increasingly powerful plutocracy both within countries
and (like Rupert Murdoch) upon the world stage. Everywhere, the rich are
getting richer by the minute. The top 100 billionaires in the world
(from China, Russia, India, Mexico and Indonesia as well as from the
traditional centres of wealth in North America and Europe) added $240
billion to their coffers in 2012 alone (enough, calculates Oxfam, to end
world poverty overnight). By contrast, the well-being of the masses at
best stagnates or more likely undergoes an accelerating if not
catastrophic (as in Greece and Spain) degradation.

The one big institutional difference this time around seems to be the
role of the central banks, with the Federal Reserve of the United States
playing a leading if not domineering role on the world stage. But ever
since the inception of central banks (back in 1694 in the British case),
their role has been to protect and bail out the bankers and not to take
care of the well-being of the people. The fact that the United States
could statistically exit the crisis in the summer of 2009 and that stock
markets almost everywhere could recover their losses has had everything
to do with the policies of the Federal Reserve. Does this portend a
global capitalism managed under the dictatorship of the world’s central
bankers whose foremost charge is to protect the power of the banks and
the plutocrats? If so, then that seems to offer very little prospect for
a solution to current problems of stagnant economies and falling living
standards for the mass of the world’s population.

There is also much chatter about the prospects for a technological fix
to the current economic malaise. While the bundling of new technologies
and organisational forms has always played an important role in
facilitating an exit from crises, it has never played a determinate one.
The hopeful focus these days is on a ‘knowledge-based’ capitalism (with
biomedical and genetic engineering and artificial intelligence at the
forefront). But innovation is always a double-edged sword. The 1980s,
after all, gave us deindustrialisation through automation such that the
likes of General Motors (which employed well-paid unionised labour in
the 1960s) have now been supplanted by the likes of Walmart (with its
vast non-unionised low-wage labour force) as the largest private
employers in the United States. If the current burst of innovation
points in any direction at all, it is towards decreasing employment
opportunities for labour and the increasing significance of rents
extracted from intellectual property rights for capital. But if everyone
tries to live off rents and nobody invests in making anything, then
plainly capitalism is headed towards a crisis of an entirely different
sort.

It is not only the capitalist elites and their intellectual and academic
acolytes who seem incapable of making any radical break with their past
or defining a viable exit from the grumbling crisis of low growth,
stagnation, high unemployment and the loss of state sovereignty to the
power of bondholders. The forces of the traditional left (political
parties and trade unions) are plainly incapable of mounting any solid
opposition to the power of capital. They have been beaten down by thirty
years of ideological and political assault from the right, while
democratic socialism has been discredited. The stigmatised collapse of
actually existing communism and the ‘death of Marxism’ after 1989 made
matters worse. What remains of the radical left now operates largely
outside of any institutional or organised oppositional channels, in the
hope that small-scale actions and local activism can ultimately add up
to some kind of satisfactory macro alternative. This left, which
strangely echoes a libertarian and even neoliberal ethic of
anti-statism, is nurtured intellectually by thinkers such as Michel
Foucault and all those who have reassembled postmodern fragmentations
under the banner of a largely incomprehensible post-structuralism that
favours identity politics and eschews class analysis. Autonomist,
anarchist and localist perspectives and actions are everywhere in
evidence. But to the degree that this left seeks to change the world
without taking power, so an increasingly consolidated plutocratic
capitalist class remains unchallenged in its ability to dominate the
world without constraint. This new ruling class is aided by a security
and surveillance state that is by no means loath to use its police
powers to quell all forms of dissent in the name of anti-terrorism.

It is in this context that I have written this book. The mode of
approach I have adopted is somewhat unconventional in that it follows
Marx’s method but not necessarily his prescriptions and it is to be
feared that readers will be deterred by this from assiduously taking up
the arguments here laid out. But something different in the way of
investigative methods and mental conceptions is plainly needed in these
barren intellectual times if we are to escape the current hiatus in
economic thinking, policies and politics. After all, the economic engine
of capitalism is plainly in much difficulty. It lurches between just
sputtering along and threatening to grind to a halt or exploding
episodically hither and thither without warning. Signs of danger abound
at every turn in the midst of prospects of a plentiful life for everyone
somewhere down the road. Nobody seems to have a coherent understanding
of how, let alone why, capitalism is so troubled. But it has always been
so. World crises have always been, as Marx once put it, ‘the real
concentration and forcible adjustment of all the contradictions of
bourgeois economy’.¹ Unravelling those contradictions should reveal a
great deal about the economic problems that so ail us. Surely that is
worth a serious try.

It also seemed right to sketch in the likely outcomes and possible
political consequences that flow from the application of this
distinctive mode of thought to an understanding of capitalism’s
political economy. These consequences may not seem, at first blush, to
be likely, let alone practicable or politically palatable. But it is
vital that alternatives be broached, however foreign they may seem, and,
if necessary, seized upon if conditions so dictate. In this way a window
can be opened on to a whole field of untapped and unconsidered
possibilities. We need an open forum – a global assembly, as it were –
to consider where capital is, where it might be going and what should be
done about it. I hope that this brief book will contribute something to
the debate.

New York City,
January 2014


Introduction


On Contradiction

‘There must be a way of scanning or X-raying the present which shows up
a certain future as a potential within it. Otherwise, you will simply
succeed in making people desire fruitlessly …’

Terry Eagleton, _Why Marx Was Right_, p. 69

‘In the crises of the world market, the contradictions and antagonisms
of bourgeois production are strikingly revealed. Instead of
investigating the nature of the conflicting elements which erupt in the
catastrophe, the apologists content themselves with denying the
catastrophe itself and insisting, in the face of their regular and
periodic recurrence, that if production were carried on according to the
textbooks, crises would never occur.’

Karl Marx, _Theories of Surplus Value_, Part 2, p. 500

There are two basic ways in which the concept of contradiction is used
in the English language. The commonest and most obvious derives from
Aristotle’s logic, in which two statements are held to be so totally at
odds that both cannot possibly be true. The statement ‘All blackbirds
are black’ contradicts the statement that ‘All blackbirds are white.’ If
one statement is true, then the other is not.

The other mode of usage arises when two seemingly opposed forces are
simultaneously present within a particular situation, an entity, a
process or an event. Many of us experience, for example, a tension
between the demands of working at a job and constructing a satisfying
personal life at home. Women in particular are perpetually being advised
on how they might better balance career objectives with family
obligations. We are surrounded with such tensions at every turn. For the
most part we manage them on a daily basis so that we don’t get too
stressed out and frazzled by them. We may even dream of eliminating them
by internalising them. In the case of living and working, for example,
we may locate these two competing activities in the same space and not
segregate them in time. But this does not necessarily help, as someone
glued to their computer screen struggling to meet a deadline while the
kids are playing with matches in the kitchen soon enough has to
recognise (for this reason it often turns out to be easier to clearly
separate living and working spaces and times).

Tensions between the competing demands of organised production and the
need to reproduce daily life have always existed. But they are often
latent rather than overt and as such remain unnoticed as people go about
their daily business. Furthermore, the oppositions are not always
starkly defined. They can be porous and bleed into each other. The
distinction between working and living, for example, often gets blurred
(I have this problem a lot). In much the same way that the distinction
between inside and outside rests on clear borders and boundaries when
there may be none, so there are many situations where clear oppositions
are hard to identify.

Situations arise, however, in which the contradictions become more
obvious. They sharpen and then get to the point where the stress between
opposing desires feels unbearable. In the case of career objectives and
a satisfying family life, external circumstances can change and turn
what was once a manageable tension into a crisis: the demands of the job
may shift (change of hours or location). Circumstances on the home front
may be disrupted (a sudden illness, the mother-in-law who took care of
the kids after school retires to Florida). People’s feelings on the
inside can change also: someone experiences an epiphany, concludes ‘this
is no way to live a life’ and throws up their job in disgust. Newly
acquired ethical or religious principles may demand a different mode of
being in the world. Different groups in a population (for example, men
and women) or different individuals may feel and react to similar
contradictions in very different ways. There is a powerful subjective
element in defining and feeling the power of contradictions. What is
unmanageable for one may mean nothing special for another. While the
reasons may vary and conditions may differ, latent contradictions may
suddenly intensify to create violent crises. Once resolved, then the
contradictions can just as suddenly subside (though rarely without
leaving marks and sometimes scars from their passage). The genie is, as
it were, temporarily stuffed back into the bottle, usually by way of
some radical readjustment between the opposing forces that lie at the
root of the contradiction.

Contradictions are by no means all bad and I certainly don’t mean to
imply any automatic negative connotation. They can be a fecund source of
both personal and social change from which people emerge far better off
than before. We do not always succumb to and get lost in them. We can
use them creatively. One of the ways out of a contradiction is
innovation. We can adapt our ideas and practices to new circumstances
and learn to be a far better and more tolerant person from the
experience. Partners who had drifted apart may rediscover each other’s
virtues as they get together to manage a crisis between work and family.
Or they may find a solution through forming new and enduring bonds of
mutual support and caring with others in the neighbourhood where they
live. This kind of adaptation can happen at a macroeconomic scale as
well as to individuals. Britain, for example, found itself in a
contradictory situation in the early eighteenth century. The land was
needed for biofuels (charcoal in particular) and for food production,
and, at a time when the capacity for international trade in energy and
foodstuffs was limited, the development of capitalism in Britain
threatened to grind to a halt because of intensifying competition on the
land between the two uses. The answer lay in going underground to mine
coal as a source of energy so the land could be used to grow food alone.
Later on, the invention of the steam engine helped revolutionise what
capitalism was about as fossil fuel sources became general. A
contradiction can often be the ‘mother of invention’. But notice
something important here: resort to fossil fuels relieved one
contradiction but now, centuries later, it anchors another contradiction
between fossil fuel use and climate change. Contradictions have the
nasty habit of not being resolved but merely moved around. Mark this
principle well, for we will come back to it many times in what follows.

The contradictions of capital have often spawned innovations, many of
which have improved the qualities of daily life. Contradictions when
they erupt into a crisis of capital generate moments of ‘creative
destruction’. Rarely is it the case that what is created and what is
destroyed is predetermined and rarely is it the case that everything
that is created is bad and everything that was good was destroyed. And
rarely are the contradictions totally resolved. Crises are moments of
transformation in which capital typically reinvents itself and morphs
into something else. And the ‘something else’ may be better or worse for
the people even as it stabilises the reproduction of capital. But crises
are also moments of danger when the reproduction of capital is
threatened by the underlying contradictions.

In this study I rely on the dialectical rather than the logical
Aristotelian conception of contradiction.¹ I do not mean to imply by
this that the Aristotelian definition is wrong. The two definitions –
seemingly in contradiction – are autonomous and compatible. It is just
that they refer to very different circumstances. I find that the
dialectical conception is rich in possibilities and not at all difficult
to work with.

At the outset, however, I must first open up what is perhaps the most
important contradiction of all: that between reality and appearance in
the world in which we live.

Marx famously advised that our task should be to change the world rather
than to understand it. But when I look at the corpus of his writings I
have to say that he spent an inordinate amount of time seated in the
library of the British Museum seeking to understand the world. This was
so, I think, for one very simple reason. That reason is best captured by
the term ‘fetishism’. By fetishism, Marx was referring to the various
masks, disguises and distortions of what is really going on around us.
‘If everything were as it appeared on the surface,’ he wrote, ‘there
would be no need for science.’ We need to get behind the surface
appearances if we are to act coherently in the world. Otherwise, acting
in response to misleading surface signals typically produces disastrous
outcomes. Scientists long ago taught us, for example, that the sun does
not actually go around the earth, as it appears to do (though in a
recent survey in the USA it seems 20 per cent of the population still
believe it does!). Medical practitioners likewise recognise that there
is a big difference between symptoms and underlying causes. At their
best, they have transformed their understanding of the differences
between appearances and realities into a fine art of medical diagnosis.
I had a sharp pain in my chest and was convinced it was a heart problem,
but it turned out to be referred pain from a pinched nerve in my neck
and a few physical exercises put it right. Marx wanted to generate the
same sorts of insights when it came to understanding the circulation and
accumulation of capital. There are, he argued, surface appearances that
disguise underlying realities. Whether or not we agree with his specific
diagnoses does not matter at this point (though it would be foolish not
to take note of his findings). What matters is that we recognise the
general possibility that we are often encountering symptoms rather than
underlying causes and that we need to unmask what is truly happening
underneath a welter of often mystifying surface appearances.

Let me give some examples. I put $100 in a savings account at a 3 per
cent annual compound rate of interest and after twenty years it has
grown to $180.61. Money seems to have the magical power to increase
itself at a compounding rate. I do nothing but my savings account grows.
Money seems to have the magical capacity to lay its own golden eggs. But
where does the increase of money (the interest) really come from?

This is not the only kind of fetish around. The supermarket is riddled
with fetishistic signs and disguises. The lettuce costs half as much as
half a pound of tomatoes. But where did the lettuce and the tomatoes
come from and who was it that worked to produce them and who brought
them to the supermarket? And why does one item cost so much more than
another? Moreover, who has the right to attach some kabbalistic sign
like $ or € or £ over the items for sale and who puts a number on them,
like $1 a pound or €2 a kilo? Commodities magically appear in the
supermarkets with a price tag attached such that customers with money
can satisfy their wants and needs depending upon how much money they
have in their pockets. We get used to all this, but we don’t notice that
we have no idea where most of the items come from, how they were
produced, by whom and under what conditions, or why, exactly, they
exchange in the ratios they do and what the money we use is really all
about (particularly when we read that the Federal Reserve has just
created another $1 trillion of it at the drop of a hat!).

The contradiction between reality and appearance which all this produces
is by far the most general and pervasive contradiction that we have to
confront in trying to unravel the more specific contradictions of
capital. The fetish understood in this way is not a crazy belief, a mere
illusion or a hall of mirrors (though it will sometimes seem that way).
It really is the case that money can be used to buy commodities and that
we can live out our lives without much concern about anything other than
how much money we have and how much that money will buy in the
supermarket. And the money in my savings account really does grow. But
ask the question ‘What is money?’ and the answer is usually a baffled
silence. Mystifications and masks surround us at every turn, though
occasionally, of course, we get shocked when we read that the thousand
or so workers who died when a factory building collapsed in Bangladesh
were making the shirts we are wearing. For the most part we know nothing
about the people who produce the goods that support our daily life.

We can live perfectly well within a fetish world of surface signals,
signs and appearances without needing to know all that much about how it
works (in much the same way that we can turn on a switch and have light
without knowing anything about electricity generation). It is only when
something dramatic happens – the supermarket shelves are bare, the
prices in the supermarket go haywire, the money in our pocket suddenly
becomes worthless (or the light does not go on) – that we typically ask
the bigger and broader questions as to why and how things are happening
‘out there’, beyond the doors and unloading bays of the supermarket,
that can so dramatically affect daily life and sustenance.

In this book I will try to get behind the fetishism and identify the
contradictory forces that beset the economic engine that powers
capitalism. I do so because I believe that most of the accounts of what
is happening currently available to us are profoundly misleading: they
replicate the fetishism and do nothing to disperse the fog of
misunderstanding.

I here make, however, a clear distinction between _capitalism_ and
_capital_. This investigation focuses on capital and not on capitalism.
So what does this distinction entail? By capitalism I mean any social
formation in which processes of capital circulation and accumulation are
hegemonic and dominant in providing and shaping the material, social and
intellectual bases for social life. Capitalism is rife with innumerable
contradictions, many of which, though, have nothing in particular to do
directly with capital accumulation. These contradictions transcend the
specificities of capitalist social formations. For example, gender
relations such as patriarchy underpin contradictions to be found in
ancient Greece and Rome, in ancient China, in Inner Mongolia or in
Ruanda. The same applies to racial distinctions, understood as any claim
to biological superiority on the part of some subgroup in the population
vis-à-vis the rest (race is not, therefore, defined in terms of
phenotype: the working and peasant classes in France in the
mid-nineteenth century were openly and widely regarded as biologically
inferior beings – a view that was perpetuated in many of Zola’s novels).
Racialisation and gender discriminations have been around for a very
long time and there is no question that the history of capitalism is an
intensely racialised and gendered history. The question then arises: why
do I not include the contradictions of race and gender (along with many
others, such as nationalism, ethnicity and religion) as foundational in
this study of the contradictions of capital?

The short answer is that I exclude them because although they are
omnipresent within capitalism they are not specific to the form of
circulation and accumulation that constitutes the economic engine of
capitalism. This in no way implies that they have no impact on capital
accumulation or that capital accumulation does not equally affect
(‘infect’ might be a better word) or make active use of them. Capitalism
clearly has in various times and places pushed racialisation, for
example, to extremes (including the horrors of genocide and holocausts).
Contemporary capitalism plainly feeds off gender discriminations and
violence as well as upon the frequent dehumanisation of people of
colour. The intersections and interactions between racialisation and
capital accumulation are both highly visible and powerfully present. But
an examination of these tells me nothing particular about how the
economic engine of capital works, even as it identifies one source from
where it plainly draws its energy.

The longer answer requires a better understanding of my purpose and of
the method I have chosen to pursue. In the same way that a biologist
might isolate a distinctive ecosystem whose dynamics (and
contradictions!) need to be analysed as if it is isolated from the rest
of the world, so I seek to isolate capital circulation and accumulation
from everything else that is going on. I treat it as a ‘closed system’
in order to identify its major internal contradictions. I use, in short,
the power of abstraction to build a model of how the economic engine of
capitalism works. I use this model to explore why and how periodic
crises occur and whether, in the long run, there are certain
contradictions that may prove fatal to the perpetuation of capitalism as
we now know it.

In the same way that the biologist will readily admit that external
forces and disruptions (hurricanes, global warming and sea-level rise,
noxious pollutants in the air or contamination of the water) will often
overwhelm the ‘normal’ dynamics of ecological reproduction in the area
she has isolated for study, so the same is true in my case: wars,
nationalism, geopolitical struggles, disasters of various kinds all
enter into the dynamics of capitalism, along with hefty doses of racism
and gender, sexual, religious and ethnic hatreds and discriminations. It
would take only one nuclear holocaust to end it all well before any
potentially fatal internal contradictions of capital have done their
work.

I am not saying, therefore, that everything that happens under
capitalism is driven by the contradictions of capital. But I do want to
identify those internal contradictions of capital that have produced the
recent crises and made it seem as if there is no clear exit without
destroying the lives and livelihoods of millions of people around the
world.

Let me use a different metaphor to explain my method. A vast cruise ship
sailing the ocean is a particular and complicated physical site for
divergent activities, social relations and interactions. Different
classes, genders, ethnicities and races will interact in sometimes
friendly and at other times violently oppositional ways as the cruise
progresses. The employees, from the captain on down, will be
hierarchically organised and some strata (for example, the cabin
stewards) may be at loggerheads with their overseers as well as with the
demanding people they are required to serve. We could aspire to describe
in detail what happens on the decks and in the cabins of this cruise
ship and why. Revolutions may break out between decks. The ultra rich
may isolate themselves on the upper decks, playing an infinite game of
poker which redistributes wealth among them, while paying no mind
whatsoever to what transpires below. But it is not my interest here to
get into all of this. In the bowels of this ship there is an economic
engine that pounds away day and night supplying energy to it and
powering it across the ocean. Everything that happens on this ship is
contingent on this engine continuing to function. If it breaks down or
blows up, then the ship is dysfunctional.

Plainly, the engine we have has been stuttering and grumbling of late.
It appears peculiarly vulnerable. In this inquiry I shall try to
establish why. If it does break down and the ship lies listless and
powerless in the water, then we will all be in deep trouble. The engine
will have to be either repaired or replaced with an engine of a
different design. If the latter, then this poses the question of how to
redesign the economic engine and to what specifications. In so doing it
is helpful to know what did or did not work well in the old engine so we
can emulate its qualities without replicating its faults.

There are, however, a number of key points where the contradictions of
capitalism affect the economic engine of capital with potentially
disruptive force. If the engine gets flooded because of external events
(such as a nuclear war, a global infectious disease pandemic that halts
all trade, a revolutionary movement from above that attacks the
engineers below or a negligent captain who steers the boat on to the
rocks), then plainly the engine of capital stops for reasons other than
its own internal contradictions. I will, in what follows, duly note the
primary points where the engine of capital accumulation might be
particularly vulnerable to such external influences. But I shall not
pursue their consequences in any detail, for, as I began by insisting,
my aim here is to isolate and analyse the _internal_ contradictions of
capital rather than the contradictions of capitalism taken as a whole.

In certain circles it is fashionable to derogatorily dismiss studies
such as this as ‘capitalo-centric’. Not only do I see nothing wrong with
such studies, provided, of course, that the interpretive claims that
arise from them are not pressed too far and in the wrong direction, but
I also think it imperative that we have much more sophisticated and
profound capitalo-centric studies to hand to facilitate a better
understanding of the recent problems that capital accumulation has
encountered. How else can we interpret the persistent contemporary
problems of mass unemployment, the downward spiral of economic
development in Europe and Japan, the unstable lurches forward of China,
India and the other so-called BRIC countries? Without a ready guide to
the contradictions underpinning such phenomena we will be lost. It is
surely myopic, if not dangerous and ridiculous, to dismiss as
‘capitalo-centric’ interpretations and theories of how the economic
engine of capital accumulation works in relation to the present
conjuncture. Without such studies we will likely misread and
misinterpret the events that are occurring around us. Erroneous
interpretations will almost certainly lead to erroneous politics whose
likely outcome will be to deepen rather than to alleviate crises of
accumulation and the social misery that derives from them. This is, I
believe, a serious problem throughout much of the contemporary
capitalist world: erroneous policies based in erroneous theorising are
compounding the economic difficulties and exacerbating the social
disruption and misery that result. For the putative ‘anti-capitalist’
movement now in formation it is even more crucial not only to better
understand what exactly it is that it might be opposed to, but also to
articulate a clear argument as to why an anti-capitalist movement makes
sense in our times and why such a movement is so imperative if the mass
of humanity is to live a decent life in the difficult years to come.

So what I am seeking here is a better understanding of the
contradictions of _capital_, not of _capitalism_. I want to know how the
economic engine of _capitalism_ works the way it does, and why it might
stutter and stall and sometimes appear to be on the verge of collapse. I
also want to show why this economic engine should be replaced and with
what.


Part One The Foundational Contradictions

_The first seven contradictions are foundational because capital simply
could not function without them. Furthermore, they all hang together in
such a way as to make it impossible to substantially modify, let alone
abolish, any one of them without seriously modifying or abolishing the
others. Challenging the dominant role of exchange value in the provision
of a use value like housing, for example, implies changes in the form
and role of money and modifying, if not abolishing, the private property
rights regime with which we are all too familiar. The search for an
anti-capitalist alternative consequently appears a rather tall order.
Simultaneous transformations would have to occur on many fronts.
Difficulties on one front have also often been contained by strong
resistances elsewhere such that general crises are avoided. But the
interlinkages between the contradictions on occasion turn toxic. An
intensification of a contradiction of one sort can become contagious.
When contagions multiply and magnify (as clearly happened in 2007–9),
then a general crisis ensues. This is dangerous for capital and creates
opportunities for systemic anti-capitalist struggle. This is why an
analysis of the contradictions that produce such general crises is so
important. If oppositional and anti-capitalist movements in particular
know what broadly to expect as the contradictions unfold, then they will
be better positioned to take advantage of, rather than being surprised
and stymied by, the way the contradictions move around and deepen (both
geographically and sectorally) in the course of crisis formation and
resolution. If crises are transitional and disruptive phases in which
capital is reconstituted in a new form, then they are also phases in
which deep questions can be posed and acted upon by those social
movements seeking to remake the world in a different image_.


Contradiction 1


Use Value and Exchange Value

Nothing could be simpler. I walk into a supermarket with money in my
pocket and exchange it for some food items. I cannot eat the money but I
can eat the food. So the food is useful to me in ways that the money is
not. The food is shortly thereafter used up and consumed away, while the
bits of paper and coins that are accepted as money continue to
circulate. Some of the money taken in by the supermarket is paid out in
the form of wages to a cashier who uses the money to buy more food. Some
of the earnings go to owners in the form of profit and they spend it on
all sorts of things. Some of it goes to the middlemen and eventually to
the direct producers of the food, who all also spend it. And so it goes
on and on. In a capitalist society millions of transactions of this sort
take place every day. Commodities like food, clothing and cellphones
come and go, while the money just keeps on circulating through people’s
(or institutions’) pockets. This is how daily life is currently lived by
much of the world’s population.

All the commodities we buy in a capitalist society have a use value and
an exchange value. The difference between the two forms of value is
significant. To the degree they are often at odds with each other they
constitute a contradiction, which can, on occasion, give rise to a
crisis. The use values are infinitely varied (even for the same item),
while the exchange value (under normal conditions) is uniform and
qualitatively identical (a dollar is a dollar is a dollar, and even when
it is a euro it has a known exchange rate with the dollar).

Consider, as an example, the use value and the exchange value of a
house. As a use value, the house provides shelter; it is a place where
people can build a home and an affective life; it is a site of daily and
biological reproduction (where we cook, make love, have arguments and
raise children); it offers privacy and security in an unstable world. It
can also function as a symbol of status or social belonging to some
subgroup, as a sign of wealth and power, as a mnemonic of historical
memory (both personal and social), as a thing of architectural
significance; or it simply stands to be admired and visited by tourists
as a creation of elegance and beauty (like Frank Lloyd Wright’s Falling
Water). It can become a workshop for an aspiring innovator (like the
famous garage that was the epicentre of what became Silicon Valley). I
can hide a sweatshop in the basement or use it as a safe house for
persecuted immigrants or as a base for trafficking sex slaves. We could
go on to list a whole raft of different uses to which the house can be
put. Its potential uses are, in short, myriad, seemingly infinite and
very often purely idiosyncratic.

But what of its exchange value? In much of the contemporary world we
have to buy the house, lease it or rent it in order to have the
privilege of using it. We have to lay out money for it. The question is:
how much exchange value is required to procure its uses and how does
this ‘how much?’ affect our ability to command the particular uses we
want and need? It sounds a simple question but actually its answer is
rather complicated.

Once upon a time, frontier pioneers built their own houses for almost no
monetary cost: the land was free, they used their own labour (or
procured the collective help of neighbours on a reciprocal basis – you
help me now with my roof and I will help you next week with your
foundations) and acquired many of the raw materials (timber, adobe etc.)
from all around them. The only monetary transactions would have been
those concerned with the acquisition of axes, saws, nails, hammers,
knives, harnesses for the horses and suchlike. Systems of housing
production of this sort can still be found in the informal settlements
constituting the so-called slums of many cities in developing countries.
This is how the favelas of Brazil get built. The promotion of ‘self-help
housing’ by the World Bank from the 1970s onwards formally identified
this system of housing provision as appropriate for low-income
populations in many parts of the world. The exchange values involved are
relatively limited.

Houses can also be ‘built to order’. Someone has land and pays
architects, contractors and builders to construct a house according to a
given design. The exchange value is fixed by the cost of raw materials,
the wages of labour and payment for the services required to build the
house. The exchange value does not dominate. But it can limit the
possibilities of creating use values (there is not enough money to build
a garage or a whole wing of the aristocratic mansion does not get built
because the funding runs out). In advanced capitalist societies many
people add to the existing use values of a house in this way (building
an extension or a deck, for example).

In much of the advanced capitalist world, however, housing is built
speculatively as a commodity to be sold on the market to whoever can
afford it and whoever needs it. Housing provision of this sort has long
been evident in capitalist societies. This is the way in which the
famous Georgian terraces of Bath, Bristol, London and the like were
built at the end of the eighteenth century. Later on, such speculative
building practices were harnessed to erect the tenement blocks of New
York City, the terraced housing for the working classes in industrial
cities such as Philadelphia, Lille and Leeds, and the tract housing of
the typical American suburb. The exchange value is fixed by the basic
costs of the house’s production (labour and raw materials), but in this
case there are two other costs added in: first, the profit mark-up of
the speculative builder, who lays out the initial necessary capital and
pays the interest on any loans involved, and, second, the cost of
acquiring, renting or leasing the land from property owners. The
exchange value is set by the actual costs of production plus profit,
interest on loans and capitalised rent (land price). The aim of the
producers is to procure exchange values not use values. The creation of
use values for others is a means to that end. The speculative quality of
the activity means, however, that it is _potential_ exchange value that
matters. The builders of the housing actually stand to lose as well as
to gain. Obviously, they try to orchestrate things, particularly housing
purchases, to ensure that this does not happen. But there is always a
risk. Exchange value moves into the driver’s seat of housing provision.

Seeing the need for adequate use values going unmet, a variety of social
forces, ranging from employers anxious to keep their labour force
domesticated and to hand (like Cadbury) to radical and utopian believers
(like Robert Owen, the Fourierists and George Peabody) and the local and
national state, have from time to time launched a variety of housing
programmes with public, philanthropic or paternalistic funding to
provide for the needs of the lower classes at a minimum cost. If it is
widely accepted that everyone has a right to ‘a decent home and a
suitable living environment’ (as stated in the preamble to the US
Housing Act of 1949), then, obviously, use value considerations are
brought back to the forefront of struggles over housing provision. This
political stance very much affected housing policies in the social
democratic era in Europe and had spillover effects in North America and
in selected parts of the developing world. The involvement of the state
in housing provision has, obviously, waxed and waned over the years, as
has the interest in social housing. But exchange value considerations
often creep back in as the fiscal capacities of the state are put to the
test by the need to subsidise affordable housing out of shrinking public
coffers.

There have been, then, a variety of ways in which the tension between
use values and exchange values in housing production has been managed.
But there have also been phases when the system has broken down to
produce a crisis of the sort that occurred in the housing markets of the
United States, Ireland and Spain in 2007–9. This crisis was not
unprecedented. The Savings and Loan Crisis in the USA from 1986 on, the
collapse of the Scandinavian property market in 1992 and the end of the
Japanese economic boom of the 1980s in the land market crash of 1990 are
other examples.¹

In the private market system that now dominates in much of the
capitalist world, there are additional issues that need to be addressed.
To begin with, the house is a ‘big ticket item’ that will be consumed
over many years and not, like food, be instantaneously used up. Private
individuals may not have the money up front to buy the house outright.
If I cannot buy it with cash, I have two basic choices. Either I can
rent or lease from an intermediary – a landlord – who specialises in
buying speculatively built housing in order to live off the rents. Or I
can borrow to buy, either getting loans from friends and relatives or
taking out a mortgage with a financial institution. In the case of a
mortgage, I have to pay the full exchange value of the house plus the
monthly interest over the lifetime of the mortgage. I end up owning the
house outright after, say, thirty years. Consequently, the house becomes
a form of saving, an asset whose value (or at least that part of the
value that I have acquired through my monthly payments) I can cash in at
any time. Some of that asset value will have been sucked up by the costs
of maintenance (for example, painting) and the need to renew
deteriorated items (for example, a roof). But I can still hope to
increase the net value I command as time goes on by paying off my
mortgage.

The mortgage finance of a housing purchase is, however, a very peculiar
transaction. The total paid out on a $100,000 mortgage over thirty years
at 5 per cent is around $195,000, so the mortgagee in effect pays a
premium of $95,000 extra in order to acquire an asset valued at
$100,000. The transaction hardly makes sense. Why would I do this? The
answer, of course, is that I need the use value of the house as
somewhere to live and I pay $95,000 to live in the house until I take
full ownership. It is the same as paying $95,000 rent to a landlord over
thirty years except in this case I ultimately secure the exchange value
of the whole house. The house becomes, in effect, a form of saving, a
repository of exchange value for me.

The exchange value of housing is not, however, fixed. It fluctuates over
time according to a variety of social conditions and forces. To begin
with, it is not independent of the exchange values of surrounding
houses. If all the houses around me are deteriorating or people of ‘the
wrong sort’ are moving in, then my house value is very likely to fall
even though I keep it in tip-top shape. Conversely, ‘improvements’ in
the neighbourhood (for example, gentrification) will increase the value
of my house even though I myself have invested nothing. The housing
market is characterised by what economists call ‘externality’ effects.
Homeowners often take action, both individual and collective, to control
such externalities. Propose building a halfway house for released
criminals in a ‘respectable’ neighbourhood of homeowners and see what
happens! The result is a lot of ‘not in my back yard’ politics,
exclusions of unwanted populations and activities, and neighbourhood
organisations whose missions are almost exclusively oriented to the
maintenance and improvement of neighbourhood housing values (good
neighbourhood schools have a big effect, for example). People act to
protect the value of their savings. But people can also lose their
savings when the state or investors take over housing in a neighbourhood
destined for redevelopment and let that housing deteriorate, thus
destroying the market value of the housing that remains.

If I do invest in improvements, then I might want to be careful to do
only those that clearly add to the house’s exchange value. There are
lots of ‘advice books’ for homeowners on this topic (building a new
state-of-the-art kitchen adds value but mirrors on all the ceilings or
an aviary in the back yard does not).

Home ownership has become important for larger and larger segments of
the population in many parts of the world. The maintenance and
improvement of housing asset values have become important political
objectives for larger and larger segments of the population and a major
political issue because the exchange value for consumers is as important
as the exchange value earned by producers.

But over the last thirty years or so, housing has become an object of
speculation. I buy a house for $300,000 and three years later its value
has appreciated to $400,000. I can then capitalise upon the extra value
by refinancing for $400,000 and walk away with the extra $100,000, which
I can use as I wish. The enhanced exchange value of housing becomes a
hot item. The house becomes a convenient cash cow, a personal ATM
machine, thus boosting aggregate demand, including, of course, the
further demand for housing. Michael Lewis in _The Big Short_ explains
the sort of thing that happened during the run-up to the crash of 2008.
The childminder of one of his lead informants ended up owning, with her
sister, six houses in Queens in New York City. ‘After they bought the
first one, and its value rose, the lenders came and suggested they
refinance and take out $250,000 – which they used to buy another.’ Then
the price of that one rose too and they repeated the experiment. ‘By the
time they were done they owned five of them and the market was falling
and they couldn’t make any of the payments.’²

Speculation in housing market asset values became rife. But speculation
of this sort always has a ‘Ponzi’ element attached. I buy a house on
borrowed money and the prices go up. More people are then attracted to
the idea of buying into housing because of rising property values. They
borrow even more money (easy to do when lenders are flush with money) to
buy into a good thing. Housing prices go up even more, so even more
people and institutions get into the game. The result is a ‘property
bubble’ which eventually pops. How and why such bubbles in asset values
like housing form, how big or small they are and what happens when they
pop depends on the configurations of different conditions and forces.
For the moment all we have to accept, on the evidence of the historical
record (from the property market crashes of 1928, 1973, 1987 and 2008 in
the United States, for example), is that such manias and bubbles are
part and parcel of what capitalist history is about. As China has moved
closer to adopting the ways of capital, so it has also become
increasingly subject to speculative booms and bubbles in its housing
markets. We will revisit the question why in what follows.

In the recent property market crash in the United States, about 4
million people lost their homes through foreclosure. For them, the
pursuit of exchange value destroyed access to housing as a use value. An
untold number of people are still ‘under water’ in their mortgage
finance. This refers to a situation in which someone who purchased a
house at the height of the boom now owes a financial institution more
money than the house is worth on the market. Owners cannot get out of
ownership and move without taking a substantial loss. At the height of
the boom, housing prices were so high that many could not get access to
use values without assuming a debt that would ultimately prove
unpayable. After the crash, the financial drain of being stuck with a
certain bundle of use values has had remarkably dire effects. The
reckless pursuit of exchange value destroyed, in short, the capacity for
many to acquire and afterwards sustain their access to housing use
values.

Similar problems have occurred in rental markets. In New York City,
where some 60 per cent of the population are renters, many large rental
complexes were bought out at the height of the boom by private equity
funds looking to make a killing by raising rents (even in the face of
strong regulatory laws). The funds deliberately ran down the current use
values to justify their plans for reinvestment, but then themselves went
bankrupt in the financial crash, leaving tenants with deteriorated use
values and higher rents living in foreclosed properties whose ownership
obligations were often unclear (who you call to fix a non-functioning
furnace in a housing complex in foreclosure is not at all obvious).
Nearly 10 per cent of the rental housing stock has suffered from these
sorts of problems. The ruthless pursuit of maximising exchange values
has diminished access to housing use values for a large segment of the
population. And to top it all, of course, the housing market crash
triggered a global crisis from which it has proved very difficult to
recover.

Housing provision under capitalism has moved, we can conclude, from a
situation in which the pursuit of use values dominated to one where
exchange values moved to the fore. In a weird reversal, the use value of
housing increasingly became, first, a means of saving and, second, an
instrument of speculation for consumers as well as producers, financiers
and all the others (real estate brokers, loan officers, lawyers,
insurance agents etc.) who stood to gain from boom conditions in housing
markets. The provision of adequate housing use values (in the
conventional consumption sense) for the mass of the population has
increasingly been held hostage to these ever-deepening exchange value
considerations. The consequences for the provision of adequate and
affordable housing for an increasing segment of the population have been
disastrous.

In the background to all this has been the shifting terrain of public
opinion and public policy on the proper role of the state in the
provision of adequate use values and basic needs to populations. Since
the 1970s, a ‘neoliberal consensus’ has emerged (or been imposed) in
which the state withdraws from obligations for public provision in
fields as diverse as housing, health care, education, transportation and
public utilities (water, energy, even infrastructures). It does so in
the interests of opening up these arenas to private capital accumulation
and exchange value considerations. Everything that happened in the
housing field has been affected by these shifts. Why this shift to
privatisation occurred is a particular question we are not at this point
concerned to answer. All that I think it is important to record at this
point is that shifts of this sort have occurred such that state
involvement in housing provision (with its particular implication for
how the use value–exchange value contradiction has been managed) has
been radically transformed throughout much (though not all) of the
capitalist world over the last forty years.

Obviously, I have chosen this case of the use value and exchange value
of housing because it is a perfect example of how a simple difference,
between the use value and the exchange value of a commodity in the
market, can evolve into an opposition and an antagonism before becoming
so heightened into an absolute contradiction as to produce a crisis not
only in housing but throughout the whole financial and economic system.
It did not, presumably, have to evolve that way (or did it? – this is a
crucial question we must ultimately answer). But that it did evolve that
way in the United States and in Ireland, Spain and to some degree
Britain, as well as in various other parts of the world, after 2000 or
so to produce the macroeconomic crisis of 2008 (a crisis not yet
resolved) is unquestionable. And that it was a crisis in the exchange
value side that denied more and more people adequate use values in
housing in addition to a decent standard of life is also undeniable.

The same thing happens to health care and education (higher education in
particular) as exchange value considerations increasingly dominate the
use value aspects of social life. The story we hear everywhere repeated,
from our classrooms to throughout virtually all the media, is that the
cheapest, best and most efficient way to procure use values is through
unleashing the animal spirits of the entrepreneur hungry for profit to
participate in the market system. For this reason, many categories of
use values that were hitherto supplied free of charge by the state have
been privatised and commodified – housing, education, health care and
public utilities have all gone in this direction in many parts of the
world. The World Bank insists that this should be the global norm. But
it is a system that works for the entrepreneurs, who by and large make
hefty profits, and for the affluent, but it penalises almost everyone
else to the point of somewhere between 4 and 6 million foreclosures in
the case of housing in the USA (and countless more in Spain and many
other countries). The political choice is between a commodified system
that serves the rich well enough and a system that focuses on the
production and democratic provision of use values for all without any
mediations of the market.

So let us reflect, then, in a more abstract theoretical way on the
nature of this contradiction. Exchange of use values between
individuals, organisations (such as businesses and corporations) and
social groups is plainly important in any complex social order
characterised by intricate divisions of labour and extensive trade
networks. Barter in such situations has limited utility because of the
problem of the ‘double coincidence of wants and needs’. You have to have
a commodity I want and I have to have a commodity you want in order for
simple barter to take place. Barter chains can be constructed but they
are limited and cumbersome. Therefore some independent measure of the
value of all commodities on the market – a single metric of value –
becomes not only advantageous but necessary. I can then sell my
commodity for some general equivalent of value and use that general
equivalent to buy whatever I want or need from elsewhere. The general
equivalent is, of course, money. But this takes us on to the field of
the second contradiction of capital. What is money?


Contradiction 2


The Social Value of Labour and Its Representation by Money

Exchange value requires a measure of ‘how much’ commodities are worth
relative to each other. This measure is called money. So what is this
‘money’ that we so unthinkingly use and reuse on a daily basis? We worry
when we do not have enough of it, plot ways (sometimes devious or
illegal) to get more of it, even as we find ourselves often struggling
to organise our lives to live within the parameters defined by how much
of it we possess. It sometimes seems as if money is the supreme God of
the commodity world and that we must all bow down before it, submit to
its dictates and worship before the altar of its power.

We know very well what the basic technical functions of the capitalist
form of money are. It is a means or medium of circulation (facilitating
exchanges in a way that solves the problem of the ‘non-coincidence of
interests’ that so limits direct barter). It provides a single measuring
rod for the economic values of all commodities in the market. And it
provides a way to store value. But what does money represent and how
does it proliferate in its social and political functions and meanings
to make it seem as if it is the lust for money that makes the social and
economic world go round?

Money, in the first instance, is a means whereby I can make a claim on
the social labour of others: that is, a claim on that labour which is
expended on the production of goods and services for others in the
marketplace (this is what differentiates a ‘commodity’ from a ‘product’
like the tomatoes I grow in my back yard for my own consumption). It is
a claim that does not have to be exercised instantaneously (because
money stores value), but at some point it has to be exercised, otherwise
money is not fulfilling its destiny and function.

In a complex society, such as that which capital has constructed, we
depend heavily upon the labour of others to provide us with all the use
values we need to live. We take the availability of many of these use
values for granted. We turn on a switch and the electricity comes on,
the gas stove lights up at the press of a button, the windows can be
opened and closed, our shoes and shirts fit, the coffee and tea of a
morning are always there, the bread and the buses, the cars and the
pencils and pens, the notepaper and the books, all are available to us,
and there are dentists and doctors and chiropractors and hair-dressers,
teachers, researchers, lawyers and bureaucrats producing knowledge and
rules – all to be had at a price! But these things and services absorb
human labour both directly and indirectly through the labour that
accumulates in the steel that goes into the nail that builds the house.
Most of us participate to some degree or other, directly or indirectly,
in the activity of providing goods and services to others.

It is the social value of all that activity, of all that labouring, that
underpins what it is that money represents. ‘Value’ is a social relation
established between the labouring activities of millions of people
around the world. As a social relation, it is immaterial and invisible
(like the relation between me, the writer, and you, the reader of this
text). But, like moral and ethical values more generally, this
immaterial value has objective consequences for social practices. In the
case of social labour, ‘value’ speaks to why shoes cost more than
shirts, houses cost more than cars and wine costs more than water. These
differences in value between commodities have nothing to do with their
character as use values (apart from the simple fact that they must all
be useful to someone somewhere) and everything to do with the social
labour involved in their production.

Being immaterial and invisible, value requires some material
representation. This material representation is money. Money is a
tangible form of appearance as well as a symbol and representation of
the immateriality of social value. But, like all forms of representation
(maps come to mind), there is a gap between the representation and the
social reality it is seeking to represent. The representation does a
good job of capturing the relative value of social labour in some
respects, but it misses out and even falsifies in others (much as maps
are accurate representations of some features of the world around us but
misleading about others). This gap between money and the value it
represents constitutes the second foundational contradiction of capital.

Money, we can say at the outset, is inseparable but also distinct from
the social labour that constitutes value. Money hides the immateriality
of social labour (value) behind its material form. It is all too easy to
mistake the representation for the reality it seeks to represent, and to
the degree that the representation falsifies (as to some degree it
always does) we end up believing in and acting upon something that is
false. In the same way we cannot see the social labour in any commodity,
so we are particularly blinded to the nature of social labour by the
money that represents it. We will look at examples shortly. The
inseparability of value from its representation is important. It derives
from the simple fact that without money and the commodity transactions
it facilitates, value could not exist as an immaterial social relation.
In other words, value could not form without the aid of the material
representation (money) and the social practices of exchange. The
relation between money and value is dialectical and co-evolutionary –
they both emerge together – rather than causal.

But the relation can also be misleading because the ‘gap’ between social
value and its representation is riddled with potential contradictions,
depending upon the form the money takes. Commodity moneys (like gold and
silver) are rooted in tangible commodities with definite physical
qualities. On the other hand, coins, paper and fiat moneys (the former
issued by private entities and the latter by the state) and the more
recent forms of electronic moneys are symbols merely. ‘Money of account’
dispenses with actual money payments at the moment of sale or purchase
in favour of the payment of net balances at the end of a certain period.
For firms that buy and sell, the net balances of multiple money
transactions are usually far less than the total transactions because
purchases and sales offset each other. Only the residual net balance
claims are actually paid. Banks, for example, clear cheques from each
other (this is now done electronically but it used to be done manually
at clearing houses – five times a day in New York – with each bank
sending runners to deposit cheques at the window of the bank the cheque
was drawn upon). At the end of the day or clearing period, the net
transfers between the banks may be close to zero even though a vast
number of transactions have taken place. This can be so because the
cheques drawn on one bank are offset by the cheques deposited by many
others. Money of account therefore greatly reduces the actual amount of
‘real’ money needed. This kind of money also underpins a vast array of
credit instruments and loans used to promote both production and
consumption (in housing markets, for example, developers borrow to build
speculative housing and consumers use mortgage finance to buy that
housing). Credit moneys in themselves constitute a hugely complicated
world (that some theorists regard as radically different from other
moneys).

From all of this arises a peculiar and seemingly tautological use for
money. Money, which supposedly measures value, itself becomes a kind of
commodity – _money capital_. Its use value is that it can be used to
produce more value (profit or surplus value). Its exchange value is the
interest payment, which in effect puts a value on that which measures
value (a highly tautological proposition!). This is what makes money as
a measure so special and so odd. Whereas other standard measures, like
inches and kilos, cannot be bought and sold in themselves (I can only
buy kilos of potatoes, not kilos full stop), money can be bought and
sold in itself as money capital (I can buy the use of $100 for a certain
period of time).

The simplest way to conjure up a material representation for value is to
select one commodity as the value representative for all the rest. For a
variety of reasons, the precious metals, gold and silver in particular,
emerged historically as best suited to fulfil this role. The reasons
they were selected are important. To begin with these metals were
relatively scarce and there is a fairly constant accumulated supply. I
cannot go into my back yard and dig up some gold or silver whenever I
want. The supply of the precious metals is relatively inelastic, so they
maintain their relative value against all other commodities over time
(though bursts of production activity, like the California gold rush,
did create some problems). Most of the world’s gold is already mined and
above ground. Second, these metals do not oxidise and deteriorate (as
would happen if we chose raspberries or potatoes as our money
commodity): this means that they maintain their physical characteristics
over the time of a market transaction and, even more importantly, they
can function relatively safely as a long-term store of value. Third, the
physical properties of these metals are known and their qualities can be
assayed accurately so their measure is easily calibrated, unlike, say,
the bottles of vodka (where consumer taste could be erratic) that
emerged as a form of commodity money in Russia when the monetary system
collapsed in the 1990s and trading collapsed into a multilateral
bartering system.¹ The physical and material properties of these
elements of the so-called natural world are used to anchor and represent
the immateriality of value as social labour.

But commodity moneys are awkward to use on a daily basis for the
exchange of low-value commodities. So coins, tokens and eventually bits
of paper and then electronic moneys became much more practicable in the
marketplaces of the world. Imagine what it would be like if we had to
pay for a cup of coffee on the street with the exact weight of gold or
silver! So while the commodity moneys may have provided a solid physical
material basis to represent social labour (the British currency notes
still promise ‘to pay the bearer’ even though these notes have long ago
ceased to be freely convertible into gold and silver), they were quickly
displaced by far more flexible and manageable money forms. But this
creates another oddity. Moneys which were originally required to give
physical form to the immateriality of social labour get represented by
symbols, by representations and, ultimately, by numbers in computerised
accounts.

When money commodities are represented by numbers, this introduces a
serious and potentially misleading paradox into the monetary system.
Whereas gold and silver are relatively scarce and of constant supply,
the representation of money as numbers allows the quantity of money
available to expand without any technical limit. We thus see the Federal
Reserve in our time adding trillions of dollars to the economy at the
drop of a hat through tactics like quantitative easing. There seems no
limit to such possibilities except that imposed by state policies and
regulation. When the metallic basis of global moneys was totally
abandoned in the 1970s, we indeed found ourselves in a potentially
limitless world of money creation and accumulation. Furthermore, the
rise of moneys of account and even more importantly of credit moneys
(beginning with the simple use of IOUs) places a great deal of money
creation in the hands of individuals and the banks rather than in the
hands of state institutions. This calls forth regulatory impositions and
interventions on the part of the state apparatus in what is often a
desperate attempt to manage the monetary system. Astonishing and
legendary episodes of inflation, such as that which occurred in the
Weimar Republic in 1920s Germany, have emphasised the key role of the
state in relation to maintaining confidence in the qualities and meaning
of the paper money it issues. We will return to this when we look at the
third foundational contradiction.

All these oddities in part arise because the three basic functions of
money have quite different requirements if they are to be effectively
performed. Commodity moneys are good at storing value but dysfunctional
when it comes to circulating commodities in the market. Coins and paper
moneys are great as a means or medium of payment but are less secure as
a long-term store of value. Fiat currencies issued by the state with
compulsory circulation (compulsory because taxes have to be paid in this
currency) are subject to the policy whims of the issuing authorities
(for example, debts can be inflated away by just printing money). These
different functions are not entirely consistent with each other. But nor
are they independent. If money cannot store value at all for more than
an ephemeral moment, then it would be useless as a medium of
circulation. On the other hand, if we are looking for money only as a
means of circulation, then fake moneys can do the job just as well as
the ‘real’ money of a silver coin. This is why gold and silver, which
are great as measurers and storers of value, in turn need representing
in the form of notes and paper/credit moneys if commodity circulation is
to remain fluid. So we end up with representations of representations of
social labour as the basis of the money form! There is, as it were, a
double fetish (a double set of masks behind which the sociality of human
labour for others is hidden).

With the aid of money, commodities can be labelled in the market with an
asking price. That price may or may not be realised depending on
conditions of supply and demand. But this labelling carries with it
another set of contradictions. The price actually realised in an
individual sale depends on particular conditions of supply and demand in
a particular place and time. There is no immediate correspondence
between this singular price and the generality of value. It is only in
competitive and perfectly functioning markets that we can anticipate the
convergence of all these singular realised market prices around some
average price that represents the generality of value. But notice it is
only because prices can diverge from value that the prices can move
around so as to give a firmer representation of what the value might be.
However, the market process offers many opportunities and temptations to
disrupt this convergence. Every capitalist longs to be able to sell at a
monopoly price and to avoid competition. Hence the name branding and the
logo-laden sales practices that allow Nike to charge a monopoly price
that permanently ensures departure from unified standards of value in
sneaker production. This quantitative divergence between prices and
values poses a problem. Capitalists necessarily respond to prices and
not to values because in the marketplace they see only prices and can
have no direct means of identifying values. To the degree that there is
a quantitative departure of prices from values, so capitalists find
themselves having to respond to the misleading representations rather
than to the underlying values.

Furthermore, there is nothing to stop me putting this label called price
on anything, no matter whether it is the product of social labour or
not. I can hang the label on a plot of land and extract a rent for its
use. I can, like all those lobbyists on K Street in Washington, legally
buy influence in Congress or cross the line to sell conscience, honour
and reputation to some highest bidder. There is not only a quantitative
but a qualitative divergence between market prices and social values. I
can make a fortune out of trafficking women, peddling drugs or
clandestinely selling arms (three of the most lucrative businesses in
contemporary capitalism). Even worse (if that is possible!), I can use
money to make more money, as if it is capital when it is not. The
monetary signals diverge from what the logic of social labour should be
all about. I can create vast pools of fictitious capital – money capital
loaned out to activities that create no value at all even as they are
highly profitable in money terms and return interest to me. State debt
to fight wars has always been funded by the circulation of fictitious
capital – people lend to the state and get repaid with interest out of
state tax revenues even though the state is destroying and not creating
any value at all.

So here is yet another paradox. Money that is supposed to represent the
social value of creative labour takes on a form – fictitious capital –
that circulates to eventually line the pockets of the financiers and
bondholders through the extraction of wealth from all sorts of
non-productive (non-value-producing) activities. If you do not believe
this, then you have to look no further than the recent history of the
housing market to see exactly what I mean. Speculation on housing values
is not a productive activity, yet vast amounts of fictitious capital
flowed into the housing market up until 2007–8 because the rate of
return on investments was high. Easy credit meant rising housing prices
and high rates of turnover meant a plethora of opportunities to earn
exorbitant fees and commissions on housing transactions. The bundling
together of the mortgages (a form of fictitious capital) into
collateralised debt obligations created a debt instrument (an even more
fictitious form of capital) that could be marketed worldwide. These
instruments of fictitious capital, many of which turned out to be
worthless, were marketed to unsuspecting investors around the world as
if they were investments certified by the rating agencies to be ‘as safe
as houses’. This was fictitious capital run wild. We are still paying
the price for its excesses.

The contradictions that arise around the money form are, therefore,
multiple. Representations, as we have already noted, falsify even as
they represent. In the case of gold and silver as representations of
social value, we see that we are taking the particular circumstances for
the production of those precious metals as a general measure of the
value congealed in all commodities. We in effect take a particular use
value (the metal gold) and use it to represent exchange value in
general. Above all, we take something that is inherently social and
represent it in such a way that it can be appropriated as a form of
social power by private persons. This last contradiction has deep and in
some ways devastating consequences for the contradictions of capital.

To begin with, the fact that money permits social power to be
appropriated and exclusively utilised by private persons places money at
the centre of a wide range of noxious human behaviours – lust and greed
for money power inevitably become central features in the body politic
of capitalism. All sorts of fetishistic behaviours and beliefs centre on
this. The desire for money as a form of social power becomes an end in
itself which distorts the neat demand–supply relation of the money that
would be required simply to facilitate exchange. This throws a monkey
wrench into the supposed rationality of capitalist markets.

Whether greed is an innate human behaviour or not can doubtless be
debated (Marx, for example, did not believe so). But what is certain is
that the rise of the money form and the capacity for its private
appropriation has created a space for the proliferation of human
behaviours that are anything but virtuous and noble. Accumulations of
wealth and power (accumulations that were ritually disposed of in the
famous potlatch system of pre-capitalist societies) have not only been
tolerated but welcomed and treated as something to be admired. This led
the British economist John Maynard Keynes, writing on ‘Economic
Possibilities for our Grandchildren’ in 1930, to hope that:

When the accumulation of wealth is no longer of high social importance,
there will be great changes in the code of morals. We shall be able to
rid ourselves of many of the pseudo-moral principles which have
hag-ridden us for two hundred years, by which we have exalted some of
the most distasteful of human qualities into the position of the highest
virtues. We shall be able to afford to dare to assess the money motive
at its true value. The love of money as a possession – as distinguished
from the love of money as a means to the enjoyments and realities of
life – will be recognized for what it is, a somewhat disgusting
morbidity, one of those semi-criminal, semi-pathological propensities
which one hands over with a shudder to the specialists on mental
disease. All kinds of social customs and economic practices, affecting
the distribution of wealth and of economic rewards and penalties, which
we now maintain at all costs, however distasteful and unjust they may be
in themselves, because they are tremendously useful in promoting
accumulation of capital, we shall then be free, at last, to discard.²

So what should the critical response be to all this? To the degree that
the circulation of speculative fictitious capital inevitably leads to
crashes which exact a huge toll from capitalist society in general (and
even more tragically from the most vulnerable populations therein), so
an outright assault on the speculative excesses and the (largely
fictitious) monetary forms that have evolved to promote them necessarily
become the focus of political struggle. To the degree that these
speculative forms have underpinned the immense increases in social
inequality and the distribution of wealth and power such that an
emergent oligarchy – the infamous 1 per cent (which is really the even
more infamous 0.1 per cent) – now effectively controls the levers of all
global wealth and power, so this also defines obvious lines of class
struggle crucial to the future well-being of the mass of humanity.

But this is only the more obvious tip of the iceberg. Money is, it bears
repeating, as inseparable from value as exchange value is inseparable
from money. The bonds between the three are tightly woven. If exchange
value weakens and ultimately disappears as the guiding means by which
use values are both produced and distributed in society, so the need for
money and all of the lustful pathologies associated with its use (as
capital) and possession (as a consummate source of social power) will
also disappear. While the utopian aim of a social order without exchange
value and therefore moneyless needs to be articulated, the intermediate
step of designing quasi-money forms that facilitate exchange but inhibit
the private accumulation of social wealth and power becomes imperative.
This can be done in principle. Keynes, in his influential _General
Theory of Employment, Interest, and Money_, for example, cites ‘the
strange, unduly neglected prophet Silvio Gesell’, who long ago proposed
the creation of quasi-money forms that oxidise if not used. The
fundamental inequality between commodities (use values) that decay and a
money form (exchange value) that does not has to be rectified. ‘Only
money that goes out of date like a newspaper, rots like potatoes,
evaporates like ether, is capable of standing the test as an instrument
of exchange of potatoes, newspapers, iron and ether,’ wrote Gesell.³
With electronic moneys, this is now practicable, in ways that were not
possible before. An oxidisation schedule can easily be written into
monetary accounts such that unused moneys (like unused airline miles)
dissolve after a certain period of time. This cuts the bond between
money as a means of circulation and money as a measure and even more
significantly as a store of value (and hence a primary means for the
accumulation of private wealth and power).

Obviously, moves of this sort would require wide-ranging adjustments of
other facets of the economy. If money oxidises it would be impossible to
use that money to save for future needs. Investment pension funds, for
example, would disappear. This is not so appalling a prospect as it
might appear. To begin with, investment pension funds are vulnerable to
becoming worthless anyway (because of underfunding, mismanagement,
collapses in stock market values or inflation). The value of monetarily
based pension funds is contingent and not secure, as many pensioners are
now finding out. Social Security, on the other hand, is a form of
pension right that does not in principle depend upon using money to save
for the future. Today’s workers provide for those who preceded them. Far
better to organise future incomes by this means than by saving and
hoping investments will pay off. A guaranteed minimum income (or minimal
access to a collectively managed pool of use values) for all would
obviate entirely the need for a money form that would allow private
savings to guarantee future economic security.

The focus would then have to be on what really matters, which is the
continuous creation of use values through social labour and the
eradication of exchange value as the principal means by which the
production of use values is organised. Marx, for one, believed that
reforms within the monetary system would not in themselves guarantee the
dissolution of the power of capital and that it was illusory to believe
that tinkering with monetary forms could be the cutting edge of
revolutionary change. He was, I believe, correct in this supposition.
But what I think his analysis also makes clear is that the evolution of
an alternative to capital would require as a necessary but not
sufficient condition a radical reconfiguration of how exchange is
organised and the ultimate dissolution of the power of money not only
over social life but, as Keynes indicates, over our mental and moral
conceptions of the world. Envisaging a moneyless economy is one way to
get a measure of what an alternative to capitalism might look like. The
possibility of this, given the potentialities of electronic moneys or
even substitutes for money, may not be so far off. The rise of new forms
of cybercurrency, such as Bitcoin, suggest that capital itself is now on
the way to invent new monetary forms. It is opportune and wise,
therefore, for the left to frame political ambitions and political
thought around this ultimate objective.

An alternative monetary politics of this sort becomes more imperative
when we consider a particularly dangerous immediate problem. The
contemporary form that money assumes has achieved the status of a double
fetish – an abstracted representation (pure numbers stored on a computer
screen) of a concrete representation (like gold and silver) of the
immateriality of social labour. When money takes the form of mere
numbers, then its potential quantity is limitless. This permits the
illusion to flourish that limitless and unending growth of capital in
its money form is not only possible but desirable. Against this, even a
casual examination of the conditions pertaining to the development of
social labour and the augmentation of value shows that compounding
growth for ever is impossible. This opposition, as we will see later,
lies at the root of one of the three most dangerous contradictions of
capital, that of compounding growth.

When money was constrained by being anchored, however weakly, in the
material availability and relative scarcity of the physical money
commodities, then there was a material restraint upon the infinite
creation of money. The abandonment of the metallic base of the world’s
money supply in the early 1970s created a whole new world of possible
contradictions. Money could be printed ad infinitum by whoever was
authorised to do so. The money supply lay in the hands of fallible human
institutions such as the central banks. The danger was accelerating
inflation. It is no accident that after a brief period of rising
inflation towards the end of the 1970s in the United States in
particular, the world’s central bankers (led by Paul Volcker at the US
Federal Reserve) all converged on the sole policy of containing
inflation at all costs, thereby abandoning responsibility for employment
and unemployment. When the European Central Bank was formed to deal with
the euro, its sole mandate was to control inflation and nothing else.
That this played out disastrously when the sovereign debt crises hit
several European countries after 2012 testifies to a chronic inability
within the institutions that capital sets up to regulate its own
excesses, to understand the contradictory logic embedded in the monetary
form that capital now necessarily assumes. It is therefore no surprise
that the crisis that broke out in 2007–8 was a crisis that took in the
first instance a financial form.


Contradiction 3


Private Property and the Capitalist State

Commodities do not take themselves to market. Individual agents – buyers
and sellers – come together in the market to trade commodities for money
and vice versa. For this to occur, both buyers and sellers must have
exclusive rights of disposal and appropriation over the commodities and
the moneys that they hold. Exchange value and money jointly presume the
existence of individual private property rights over both commodities
and money.

To clear the air, let me first make a distinction between individual
appropriation and private property. We all of us, as living persons,
appropriate things in the course of actively making use of them. I
appropriate food when I eat it, I appropriate a bicycle when I ride it,
I appropriate this computer while writing this. My use of many of the
processes and things available to me precludes anyone else from using
them when I am using them. There are, however, some items whose use is
not exclusionary. If I watch a TV programme this does not prevent others
from so doing. And there are other goods (‘public goods’) that are often
held and used in common, though usually with limitations. I use the
street, as do many others, but there is a limit to how many people a
street can hold and there are certain activities that either by custom
or by law are prohibited upon the street (for example, defecation on the
streets of New York). For many processes and things, however, an
exclusive relationship exists between the user(s) and that which is
being used. This is not the same thing as private property.

Private property establishes an exclusive ownership right to a thing or
a process whether it is being actively used or not. At the root of
commodity exchange there lies the presupposition that I do not myself
actively want or need the commodity I offer for trade. Indeed, the very
definition of a commodity is something that is produced for someone else
to use. Private property rights confer the right to trade away
(alienate) that which is owned. A difference then emerges between what
are called usufructuary rights (rights that pertain to active use) and
exclusionary permanent ownership rights. This difference has often been
the source of confusion, particularly throughout the history of
colonialism. Indigenous populations frequently operate on the basis of
usufructuary rights to land, for example (this is the case with shifting
agriculture). Colonial powers typically imposed exclusionary ownership
rights and this was the source of a great deal of conflict. Populations
that moved around from one site to another, following their herds or
moving from exhausted land to fresh and more fertile land, suddenly
found themselves barred from moving by the existence of fences and
barbed wire. They often found themselves prevented from using land that
they had traditionally regarded as open for use because someone now
owned it in perpetuity even if it was not used. The indigenous
population in North America suffered greatly from this. In contemporary
Africa people’s customary and collective resource rights are currently
being pell-mell converted to an exclusionary private property rights
regime by what many regard as fraudulent agreements between, for
example, village chiefs (who have customarily held the land in trust for
their people) and foreign interests. This constitutes what is generally
referred to as a huge ‘land grab’ by capital and foreign states for
control over Africa’s land and resources.

Private property rights presuppose a social bond between that which is
owned and a person, defined as a juridical individual, who is the owner
and who has the rights of disposition over that which is owned. By a
marvellous sleight of juridical reasoning, it has transpired that
ownership is vested not only in individuals like you and me but also in
corporations and other institutions which, under the law, are defined as
legal persons (even though, as many like to point out, corporations
cannot be jailed when they do wrong in the same way that living persons
can). The existence of this social bond is recognised in almost all
bourgeois constitutions and connects ideals of individual private
property with notions of individual human rights, the ‘rights of man’
and doctrines and legal protections of those individual rights. The
social bond between individual human rights and private property lies at
the centre of almost all contractual theories of government.

Private property rights are in principle held in perpetuity. They do not
expire or dissipate through lack of use. They can pass from one
generation to another through inheritance. As a result, there is an
inner connection between private property rights and non-oxidisable
forms of money. Only the latter can last in perpetuity. But the
evolution of forms of paper and fiat money whose relative value is
subject to degradation (through, for example, inflation) undermines the
initially secure connection between the perpetuity and stability of
money forms and that of private property. Furthermore, under the
doctrine of _res nullius_, most famously embraced by John Locke, only
that private property in land which is productive of value (that is,
which involves the application of productive social labour for commodity
production) is deemed legitimate. Failure to produce value (and surplus
value) not only justified the wholesale dispossession of the land rights
of the Irish by the British, it also justified the wiping out and
dispossession of ‘unproductive’ indigenous populations to make way for
the ‘productive’ colonisers particularly throughout the Americas and now
across much of Africa. The contemporary version of this doctrine in
advanced capitalist societies is that of eminent domain, through which
the appropriation of private property in land to bring it into a
condition of higher and better usage is legally justified. Private
property in both land and money is only, therefore, contingently
perpetual.

The imposition of private property rights depends upon the existence of
state powers and legal systems (usually coupled with monetary taxation
arrangements) that codify, define and enforce the contractual
obligations that attach to both private property rights and the rights
of juridical individuals. There is a good deal of evidence that the
coercive power of the state played an important role in opening spaces
within which capital could flourish well before private property regimes
became dominant. This was as true in the transition from feudalism to
capitalism in Europe as it later became when the Chinese set up special
economic zones for capitalist activity in southern China after 1980. But
in between usufructuary and private property rights lies a plethora of
common property or customary rights, which are often confined to a given
polity (like a village community or more broadly across a whole cultural
regime). These rights are not necessarily open to all, but they do
presuppose sharing and cooperative forms of governance between the
members of the polity. The eradication of usufructuary rights and the
infamous process of enclosure of the commons have led to the dominance
of a system of individualised private property rights backed by state
power as _the_ basis for exchange relations and trade. This is the form
consistent with capital circulation and accumulation.

To be private property, however, a thing or process has to be clearly
bounded, nameable and identifiable (in the case of land, this rests on
cadastral mapping and the construction of a land registry). Not
everything is susceptible to that condition. It is almost impossible to
imagine the air and the atmosphere being divisible into private property
entities that can be bought and sold. What is remarkable, however, is
the lengths to which capital has gone to extend the reach of an
individualised private property rights regime deep into the heart of
biological processes and other aspects of both the social and the
natural world in order to establish proprietary rights. There is a
fierce ongoing struggle over the proprietary rights to knowledge of
natural processes, for example. The field of intellectual property
rights in particular is currently riddled with controversy and conflict.
Should knowledge be universally available to all or privately owned?

An individualised private property rights regime lies at the basis of
what capital is about. It is a necessary condition and construction in
the sense that neither exchange value nor money could operate in the way
it does without this legal infrastructure. But this rights regime is
beset by contradictions. As in the case of money, the contradictions are
multiple rather than singular. This is so in part because of the way in
which the contradictions between use value and exchange value and
between money and the social labour which it represents spill over into
the individualised private property rights regime.

The first and most obvious line of contradiction is between the
supposedly ‘free’ exercise of individual private property rights and the
collective exercise of coercive regulatory state power to define, codify
and give legal form to those rights and the social bond that knits them
so closely together. Legal definitions of the individual and, hence, a
culture of individualism arose with the proliferation of exchange
relations, the rise of monetary forms and the evolution of the
capitalist state. All but the most rabid of libertarians and the most
extreme of anarchists will agree, however, that some semblance of state
power has to exist in order to sustain the individualised property
rights and structures of law that, according to theoreticians like
Friedrich Hayek, guarantee the maximum of non-coercive individual
liberty. But these rights have to be enforced and it is at this point
that the state, with its monopoly over the legitimate use of force and
violence, is called upon to repress and police any transgressions
against the private property rights regime. The capitalist state must
use its acquired monopoly over the means of violence to protect and
preserve the individualised private property rights regime as
articulated through freely functioning markets. The centralised power of
the state is used to protect a decentralised private property system.
However, the extension of the status of personhood and juridical
individual to powerful corporations and institutions obviously corrupts
the bourgeois utopian dream of a perfected world of individual personal
liberty for all on the basis of democratically dispersed ownership.

There are many problems within the realm of market exchange that prompt
the state to go far beyond a simple ‘nightwatchman’ role as guardian of
private property and of individual rights. To begin with, there are
problems of the provision of collective and public goods (such as
highways, ports and harbours, water and waste disposal, education and
public health). The field of physical and social infrastructures is vast
and of necessity the state must be involved either in directly producing
or in mandating and regulating the provision of these goods. In
addition, the state apparatus itself must be built not only to
administer but to secure the institutions it has to protect (hence the
creation of military and police capacities and powers and the funding of
these activities through taxation).

Above all, the state has to find a way to govern and administer diverse,
often restive and fractious populations. That many capitalist states
have ended up doing so through the institution of democratic procedures
and mechanisms of governmentality to elicit consent rather than by
resorting to coercion and force has led some to suggest, erroneously in
my view, an inherent bond between democratisation and capital
accumulation. That some form of bourgeois democracy has proved to be
generally more effective and efficient as a form of governance within
capitalism in general is, however, undeniable. But this outcome has not
necessarily been a consequence of capital’s rise to dominance as the
economic engine of a social formation: it owes its dynamic to broader
political forces and to long-standing attempts to find collective forms
of governance that effectively bridge the tension between the potential
arbitrariness of state autocratic power and the popular desire for
individual liberty and freedom.

Then there is the pervasive problem of what to do about market failures.
These arise because of so-called externality effects, defined as real
costs which are not (for some reason) registered in the market. The most
obvious field of externalities is pollution, where firms and individuals
do not pay for deleterious effects on air, water and land qualities
through their actions. There are other forms of both positive and
negative externality effects that typically lead to calls for collective
rather than individual action – the exchange value of housing, for
example, is captive to externality effects since investment or
disinvestment in one house in a neighbourhood has an effect (either
positive or negative) on the value of houses in the immediate vicinity.
One form of state intervention designed to cope with problems of this
sort is land-use zoning.

Most people concede the legitimacy of state or other forms of collective
action to control and regulate those activities that generate strong
negative externality effects. In all of these instances the state
necessarily has to encroach upon the exercise of individual liberties
and private property rights. The contradiction between use and exchange
values spills over to have profound effects upon the relation between
centralised state power and the free exercise of decentralised
individual private property rights. The only interesting question is how
far does the state go and to what degree that encroachment might be
based on coercion rather than the building of consent (a process that
unfortunately entails the cultivation of nationalism). In any case, the
state has to have a monopoly over the legalised use of violence to
exercise such functions.

That monopoly also becomes explicit in the way the state in both its
pre-capitalist and its capitalist incarnations has been pre-eminently a
war-making machine embroiled in geopolitical rivalries and geo-economic
strategising on the world stage. Within the framework of an emergent and
perpetually evolving interstate global system, the capitalist state is
involved in the pursuit of diplomatic, trading and economic advantages
and alliances to secure its own wealth and power (or, more accurately,
the wealth, status and power of its leaders and at least some segments
of the population) by enhancing the capacity of property-rights holders
to amass more and more wealth in the territory in which they reside. In
so doing, war – classically defined as diplomacy by other means –
becomes a crucial tool of geopolitical and geo-economic positioning in
which the amassing of wealth, competitive power and influence within the
territorial confines of the state becomes a distinctive aim.

But to fight wars and engage in such manoeuvrings the state requires
adequate economic resources. The monetisation of its war-making
activities lay at the root of the construction of what economic
historians refer to as the fiscal-military state from the fifteenth
century onwards. At the heart of this state lay the construction of what
I call the ‘state–finance nexus’. In the British case this was most
clearly symbolised by the alliance between the state apparatus on the
one hand and the London merchant capitalists on the other. The latter
effectively funded the state’s war-making powers by securing the
national debt in return for an exclusive charter to monopolise and
manage the monetary system through the formation of the Bank of England
in 1694. This was the world’s first central bank. It subsequently became
a model for the rest of the capitalist world to follow.

This highlights a key relationship between the state and money. Silvio
Gesell, I think, has it right:

Money requires the State, without a State money is not possible; indeed
the foundation of the State may be said to date from the introduction of
money. Money is the most natural and the most powerful cement of nations
… The fact that money is indispensable, and that State control of money
is also indispensable, gives the State unlimited power over money.
Exposed to this unlimited power the metal covering of money is as chaff
before the wind. Money is as little protected by the money-material from
abuse of State power as the constitution of the State is protected from
arbitrary usurpation of power by the parchment upon which it is written.
Only the State itself, the will of those in power (autocrats or
representatives), can protect money from bunglers, swindlers and
speculators – on condition that those in power are capable of purposeful
use of their power. Up to the present they have never, unfortunately,
possessed this capability.¹

Yet, Gesell surprisingly suggests, ‘the security of paper-money is
greater than that of metal money’. This is so precisely because
‘paper-money is secured by all the interests and ideals which weld
people into a State. The paper-money of a State can only go down with
the State itself.’ The state, which is usually defined by its monopoly
over the legitimate use of violence, acquires another key function: it
must have monopoly power over money and the currency.

There are two caveats to this argument. First, this monopoly power is
generic to the state and not particular. The global monetary system is
hierarchical in character. The US dollar has functioned as the reserve
currency for the global monetary system since 1945 and the USA has
exclusive rights of seignorage (creation) of that money. The monetary
powers of other states are circumscribed because international debts are
typically denominated in US dollars and have to be paid in dollars. An
individual state cannot monetise its debts by printing its own currency
because the immediate effect will be to devalue the local currency
against the US dollar. There are other currencies which might be used
for global trade – pounds sterling (which used to be the global reserve
currency), the euro and the yen and maybe in the future the Chinese
yuan. But these have so far not threatened the position of the US dollar
and occasional proposals to replace the dollar with a market-basket of
currencies (of the sort that Keynes originally proposed at Bretton Woods
in 1944) have so far been rebuffed by the USA. Considerable benefits
accrue to the USA, after all, from its control over the global reserve
currency. US imperial power has been exercised either directly or
indirectly by dollar diplomacy. The hegemony of the US state in the
world system is largely sustained by its control over the world currency
and its ability to print money to pay, for example, for its excessive
military expenditures. In the face of this, individual states may give
up their role over their own currency. Ecuador, for example, uses US
dollars. When the euro came into being, the individual states
surrendered their monopoly power over their currencies to a set of
supra-national institutions (the European Central Bank) dominated by
Germany and to a lesser degree by France.

The second caveat is that this monopoly right of the state over the
currency can be subcontracted, as it were, to merchant and banking
capitalists through the chartering of central banks that are nominally
independent of direct democratic or state political control. This is the
case with the Bank of England, the US Federal Reserve and the European
Central Bank. These powerful institutions exist in a liminal space
between the state and the private banks. They are institutions which,
along with the Treasury Departments of the state government, form the
state–finance nexus that has long functioned as the ‘central nervous
system’ for regulating and promoting capital. The state–finance nexus
has all the characteristics of a feudal institution, because its
operations are usually hidden from view and shrouded in mystery. It
operates more like the Vatican or the Kremlin than like an open and
transparent institution. It assumes a human face only at times of
difficulty, when, for example, Hank Paulson (Secretary of the Treasury)
and Ben Bernanke (Chair of the Federal Reserve) jointly took to the
airwaves to dictate national policy in the wake of the collapse of
Lehman Brothers in September 2008, when both the Executive Branch and
Congress appeared paralysed and fearful. ‘When the financial system and
the state–finance nexus fails, as it did in 1929 and 2008, then everyone
recognises there is a threat to the survival of capital and of
capitalism and no stone is left unturned and no compromise left
unexamined in the endeavours to resuscitate it.’²

But all is not always harmonious in the relation between the capitalist
state and private property. To the degree that the state embraces some
form of democracy in order to counteract the absolutist and autocratic
state forms that can be arbitrarily hostile or unreceptive to certain of
the requirements of capital, regarding, for example, freedom of
movement, so it is opened up to populist influences of various sorts.
If, as sometimes happens, it is captured by organised labour and left
political parties, so its powers may be deployed to curb the powers of
capital as private property. Capital can then no longer operate freely
in many domains of the economy (labour markets, labour processes, income
distributions and the like). It finds itself forced to operate in the
framework of a veritable regulatory forest that circumscribes its
freedoms. From time to time, therefore, the contradiction between state
and private property gets heightened into an absolute contradiction that
pits public against private, state against market. Fierce ideological
and political battles can erupt around this contradiction.

But let me be clear: I am not here trying to write out a general theory
of what the capitalist state is all about. I am simply drawing attention
to those aspects and specific functions of the state that have to
operate in a certain way to support the reproduction of capital. Given
its powers of taxation and the state’s susceptibility to political
influences and interests, state powers can sometimes be redirected
politically to economic ends in ways that trump private entrepreneurial
activity and interests. During phases of social democratic political
control (of the sort that was set up in Britain after the Second World
War as well as in some European countries) and under various forms of
_dirigiste_ governmentality (of the sort characteristic of France under
de Gaulle, Singapore under Lee Kuan-Yew and many other East Asian
states, including China), state institutions can be created and
organised as economic agents that either assume control of the
commanding heights of the economy or guide investment decisions.
Government planning at a variety of scales (macroeconomic, urban,
regional and local) takes centre stage sometimes in competition with but
more often in partnership with private and corporate activities. A large
segment of capital accumulation then passes through the state in ways
that are not necessarily directed to profit-maximising but to social or
geopolitical ends. Even in states most devoted to the principles of
privatisation and neoliberalisation, the military-industrial complex is
set apart from the rest of the economy as a lucrative trough at which
private subcontracted interests freely feed.

From the other end of the political spectrum, the manner of organising
state finances is something libertarians clearly see as profoundly
contradictory to individual liberties and freedoms. It passes monopoly
control over money and credit to a non-elected and undemocratic set of
institutions, headed by the central bankers. A critic like Thomas Greco
therefore argues:

The politicization of money, banking, and finance (which prevails
throughout the world today) has enabled the concentration of power and
wealth in few hands – a situation that has been extremely damaging to
societies, cultures, economies, democratic government, and the
environment. National governments have arrogated to themselves virtually
unlimited spending power, which enables them to channel wealth to
favored clients, to conduct wars on a massive scale, and to subvert
democratic institutions and the popular will. The privileged private
banking establishment has managed to monopolize everyone’s credit,
enabling the few to exploit the many through their partiality in
allocating credit, by charging usury (disguised as ‘interest’) and
increasingly exorbitant fees, and by rewarding politicians for their
service in promoting their interests.³

The libertarian argument, which is by no means implausible, is that this
was what subverted the possibility of a genuine bourgeois democracy
characterised by the maximum of individual liberty from the seventeenth
century onwards. This is the system that in addition forces compounding
growth, invites ‘environmental destruction and rends the social fabric
while increasing the concentration of power and wealth. It creates
economic and political instabilities that manifest in recurrent cycles
of depression and inflation, domestic and international conflict, and
social dislocation.’⁴ For this reason both left and right wings of the
political spectrum in the United States tend to be antagonistic to
institutions like the Federal Reserve and the International Monetary
Fund.

The balance of the contradiction between private interests and
individual liberties on the one hand and state power on the other has
shifted most decisively in recent years towards the undemocratic,
autocratic and despotic centres of the state apparatus, where they are
backed by the increasing centralisation and militarisation of social
control. This does not mean that the decentred powers of individual
property owners are dissolved or even at risk. Indeed, those powers are
enhanced as capital is increasingly protected against any and all forms
of social opposition: for example, from labour or from
environmentalists. Decentralisation is in any case often an optimal
strategy for maintaining centralised control. The Chinese have in recent
times consciously deployed this principle very effectively. It is
nowhere more evident than in the state organisation of money power in
commodity markets.

Since I have in preceding sections frequently referred to the housing
market and the crisis in the property market as an example, let me
briefly explain how it all works in this context. Private property
rights underpin home ownership and capitalist states have systematically
supported by various means (from active subsidies to advertising and
rhetoric of the dreams of home ownership) the extension of home
ownership to more and more segments of the population. This has in part
been to ensure a continuous growth of the property market as a field of
active and lucrative capital accumulation, but it has also performed a
crucial ideological function, consolidating popular and populist support
for the strategy of providing use values through exchange value
mechanisms: in other words, support for the capitalist way. The active
governmental support for home ownership in the United States, for
political as well as economic reasons, consequently played its part in
fostering the sub-prime mortgage crisis that brought down some of the
major private investment institutions but also brought the quasi-public
institutions of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac into the ranks of bankruptcy,
from which they had to be rescued by temporary nationalisation.

So what, then, must the political strategy in relation to this
contradiction between state and private property be? A simple argument
to try to restore the balance and enhance individual liberties (as many
on both the left and the right of the political spectrum seem to favour
these days) cannot suffice, in part because the balance has shifted so
dramatically towards arbitrary state power and also because faith in the
state as a potentially benevolent agent has largely faded. The return of
the state to a pure ‘nightwatchman’ role will only further unleash the
powers of what is already a largely unregulated capital to do as it will
without any social or long-term constraints.

The only viable alternative political strategy is one that dissolves the
existing contradiction between private and individual interests on the
one hand and state power and interests on the other and replaces it with
something else. It is in this context that much of the current left
concern with the re-establishment and reclamation of ‘the commons’ makes
so much sense. The absorption of private property rights into a
comprehensive project for the collective management of the commons and
the dissolution of autocratic and despotic state powers into democratic
collective management structures become the only worthy long-term
objectives.

These objectives make sense when applied to money and credit. The
reclamation of money and credit as a form of the democratically
regulated commons is imperative if the trend towards autocracy and
monetary despotism is to be reversed. Severing the activities of money
creation from the state apparatus becomes imperative in the name of
strengthening and democratising collective liberties and freedoms. Since
the power of the capitalist state rests in part on the twin pillars of a
monopoly over the legitimate use of violence and monopoly power over
monetary affairs and the currency, the breaking of the latter monopoly
would ultimately entail a dissolution (rather than the ‘smashing’) of
capitalist state power. Once deprived of power over its monetary
resources, the capacity of the state to resort to militarised violence
against its own restive populations would be nullified also. While this
might seem far-fetched as an idea, something like it is already
partially realised by the fact that the power of the bondholders is
being used in countries like Greece, Italy and Spain to dictate state
policies towards their own populations. Replace the power of the
bondholders by the power of the people and this all too visible trend
could just as easily be reversed.

State power is, as already noted, generic rather than particular. Hence
this politics would have to dissolve all those international monetary
institutions (like the IMF) that have emerged to support the dollar
imperialism of the USA and which serve to maintain its financial
hegemony within the world system. The disciplinary apparatus that is
currently destroying the daily life of the Greek people, as well as the
lives of many others who have suffered from the interventions of the IMF
(usually in combination with other multilateral state powers, such as,
in the Greek case, the European Central Bank and the European
Commission), would likewise need to be dissolved to make way for
practices and institutions of collective management of the common wealth
of populations. Such a solution may appear abstracted and utopian in
relation to current practices. But it is vital for alternative politics
to have this sort of vision and long-term ambition in mind. Radical
agendas, either revolutionary or reformist, must be formulated if
civilisation is to be saved from being drowned in the contradiction
between callous and unregulated private property and increasingly
autocratic and militarised police state powers dedicated to the support
of capital rather than to the well-being of the people.


Contradiction 4


Private Appropriation and Common Wealth

The common wealth created by social labour comes in an infinite variety
of use values, everything from knives and forks to cleared lands, whole
cities, the aircraft we fly, the cars we drive, the food we eat, the
houses we live in and the clothes we wear. The private appropriation and
accumulation of this common wealth and the social labour congealed
within it occur in two quite different ways. First, there is a vast
array of what we would now consider extra-legal activities, such as
robbery, thievery, swindling, corruption, usury, predation, violence and
coercion, along with a range of suspicious and shady practices in the
market (monopolisation, manipulation, market cornering, price fixing,
Ponzi schemes etc.). Second, individuals accumulate wealth by legally
sanctioned exchanges under conditions of non-coercive trade in freely
functioning markets. Theorists of capital circulation and accumulation
typically exclude activities of the first sort as excrescences external
to the ‘normal’ and legitimate functioning of the capitalist market.
They build their models of capital circulation and accumulation on the
presumption that only the second mode of private appropriation and
accumulation of social wealth is legitimate and relevant.

I think it is time we overthrew this convenient but profoundly
misleading fiction promoted by the economics textbooks and recognise the
symbiotic relation between these two forms of appropriation of both
social labour and the products of that social labour. I make this
argument in part on the simple empirical grounds that it is stupid to
seek to understand the world of capital without engaging with the drug
cartels, traffickers in arms and the various mafias and other criminal
forms of organisation that play such a significant role in world trade.
It is impossible to shunt aside as accidental excrescences the vast
array of predatory practices that were so easily identifiable in the
recent crash of property markets in the United States (along with recent
revelations of systematic banking malfeasance – such as the
falsification of asset valuations in bank portfolios – money laundering,
Ponzi finance, interest-rate manipulations and the like).

But beyond these obvious empirical reasons, there are strong theoretical
grounds for believing that an economy based on dispossession lies at the
heart of what capital is foundationally about. The direct dispossession
of the value that social labour produces at the point of production is
but one (albeit major) strain of dispossession that feeds and sustains
the appropriation and accumulation by private ‘persons’ (that is, legal
entities including corporations) of large portions of the common wealth.

Bankers do not care in principle, for example, whether their profits and
excessive bonuses come from lending money to landlords who extract
exorbitant rents from oppressed tenants, from merchants who price-gouge
their customers, from credit card and telephone companies that bilk
their users, from mortgage companies that illegally foreclose on
homeowners or from manufacturers who savagely exploit their workers.
While theorists on the political left, inspired by their understanding
of Marx’s political economy, have typically privileged the last of these
forms of appropriation as in some sense more foundational than all the
others, the historical evolution of capital has exhibited immense
flexibility in its capacity to appropriate the common wealth in all
these other myriad ways. The higher wages workers may get through class
struggle in the workplace can all too easily be snatched back by the
landlord, the credit card companies, the merchants, to say nothing of
the taxman. The bankers even construct their own shell games, from which
they profit immensely, and even when they get caught it is, for the most
part, the bank (that is, the shareholders) who take the hit and not the
bankers themselves (only in Iceland did the bankers actually end up in
jail).

At the heart of this process of private appropriation of the common
wealth lies the contradictory way in which, as we have seen, money
represents and symbolises social labour (value). The fact that money, as
opposed to the social value it represents, is inherently appropriable by
private persons means that money (provided it functions well as both a
store and measure of value) can be accumulated without limit by private
persons. And to the degree that money is a repository of social power,
so its accumulation and centralisation by a set of individuals become
critical to both the social construction of personal greed and the
formation of a more or less coherent capitalist class power.

Recognising the dangers to the social world, pre-capitalist societies
endeavoured to erect barriers to the reckless private appropriation and
use of common wealth while resisting the commodification and
monetisation of everything. They realised very well that monetisation
dissolved other ways of forming community with the result, as Marx put
it, that ‘money became the community’.¹ We are still living with the
consequences of that transition. That these older societies ultimately
lost that battle should not deter us from considering ways in which this
private appropriation of the common wealth might be curbed, for it is
still the case that it poses immense dangers in terms of reckless
appropriations and investments regardless of the environmental or social
consequences, even threatening the conditions for the reproduction of
capital itself.

While this may all be self-evident, there is something even more
sinister at work within the monetary calculus that really puts the seal
upon the politics and practices of accumulation by dispossession as the
hallmark of what capital is about. In the examination of how money
works, we saw how the distinction between value and price opened a gap
between the realities of social labour on the one hand and the ability
to hang a fictional price label on anything, no matter whether it was a
product of social labour or not. Both uncultivated land and conscience
can be sold for money! The gap between values and prices was therefore
not only quantitative (such that prices could move instantaneously up or
down in response to any disequilibrium in demand and supply) but also
qualitative (such that a price could be put on even such immaterial
traits as honour, allegiances and loyalties). This gap has become a
yawning chasm as capital has expanded its range and depth with the
passing of time.

Of all writers it was, perhaps, Karl Polanyi, an émigré Hungarian
socialist economic historian and anthropologist who ended up working and
writing in the United States at the height of the McCarthyite scourge,
who most clearly saw the nature of this phenomenon and ‘the perils to
society’ which it posed. His influential work on _The Great
Transformation_ was first published in 1944 and remains a landmark text
to this day. The markets for labour, land and money are, he pointed out,
essential for the functioning of capital and the production of value.

But labor, land, and money are obviously _not_ commodities … Labor is
only another name for a human activity which goes with life itself,
which in its turn is not produced for sale but for entirely different
reasons, nor can that activity be detached from the rest of life, be
stored or mobilized; land is only another name for nature, which is not
produced by man; actual money, finally, is merely a token of purchasing
power which, as a rule, is not produced at all, but comes into being
through the mechanism of banking or state finance. None of them is
produced for sale. The commodity description of labor, land, and money
is entirely fictitious.²

To allow the fictions that land, labour and money are commodities to
flourish without restraint would, in Polanyi’s view, ‘result in the
demolition of society’. In ‘disposing of a man’s labor power the system
would, incidentally, dispose of the physical, psychological, and moral
entity “man” attached to that tag. Robbed of the protective covering of
cultural institutions, human beings would perish from the effects of
social exposure; they would die as the victims of acute social
dislocation through vice, perversion, crime and starvation. Nature would
be reduced to its elements, neighborhoods and landscapes defiled, rivers
polluted, military safety jeopardized, the power to produce food and raw
materials destroyed’; and, finally, ‘shortages and surfeits of money
would prove as disastrous to business as floods and droughts in
primitive society’.

No society, Polanyi concluded, ‘could stand the effects of such a system
of crude fictions even for the shortest stretch of time unless its human
and natural substance as well as its business organization was protected
against the ravages of this satanic mill’.³ To the degree that
neoliberal politics and policies these last few decades have dismantled
many of the protections that had been so painstakingly created through
earlier decades of struggle, so we now find ourselves increasingly
exposed to some of the worst traits of that ‘satanic mill’ which
capital, left to itself, inevitably creates. Not only do we see around
us abundant evidence of so many of the collapses that Polanyi feared,
but a heightened sense of universal alienation looms ever more
threatening, as more and more of humanity turns away in disgust from the
barbarism the underpins the civilisation it has itself constructed. This
constitutes, as I shall argue by way of conclusion, one of the three
most dangerous, perhaps even fatal, contradictions for the perpetuation
of both capital and capitalism.

How the commodification of labour, land and money was historically
accomplished is in itself a long and painful story, as Marx’s brief
history of so-called ‘primitive accumulation’ in _Capital_ outlines. The
transformation of labour, land and money into commodities rested on
violence, cheating, robbery, swindling and the like. The common lands
were enclosed, divided up and put up for sale as private property. The
gold and silver that formed the initial money commodities were stolen
from the Americas. The labour was forced off the land into the status of
a ‘free’ wage labourer who could be freely exploited by capital when not
outright enslaved or indentured. Such forms of dispossession were
foundational to the creation of capital. But even more importantly, they
never disappeared. Not only were they central to the more dastardly
aspects of colonialism, but to this very day the politics and policies
of dispossession (administered for the most part by an unholy alliance
of corporate and state power) of access to land, water and natural
resources are underpinning massive movements of global unrest. The
so-called ‘land grabs’ throughout Africa, Latin America and much of Asia
(including the massive dispossessions occurring currently in China) are
just the most obvious symptom of a politics of accumulation by
dispossession run riot in ways that even Polanyi could not have
imagined. In the United States, tactics of eminent domain, along with
the brutal foreclosure wave that led to massive losses not only of use
values (millions rendered homeless) but also of hard-won savings and
asset values embedded in housing markets, to say nothing of the loss of
pension, health care and educational rights and benefits, all indicate
that the political economy of outright dispossession is alive and well
in the very heart of the capitalist world. The irony of course is that
these forms of dispossession are now increasingly administered under the
virtuous disguise of a politics of the austerity required to bring an
ailing capitalism back into a supposedly healthy state.

To isolate nature ‘and form a market out of it was perhaps the weirdest
of all undertakings of our ancestors,’ Polanyi remarks, while ‘to
separate labor from other activities of life and subject it to the laws
of the market was to annihilate all organic forms of existence and
replace them by a different type of organization, an atomist and
individualistic one’.⁴ This last consequence has been crucial to how the
structure of contradictions we are here examining works. Plainly, the
contradictory unity between state and private property that constitutes
the third foundational contradiction of capital became significant _not_
as a foundational tool to facilitate accumulation by dispossession, but
as a post facto legitimation and institutional rationalisation of the
results of that violence of dispossession. Once land, labour and money
had been objectified, pulverised and broken away from their embeddedness
in the broader flows of cultural life and of living matter, then they
could be resutured together under the umbrella of constitutional rights
and laws founded on principles of individual rights to private property
guaranteed by the state.

Land, for example, is not a commodity produced by social labour. But it
was at the heart of the enclosure movement in Britain and colonising
practices everywhere to divide it up, privatise and commodify it so that
the land market could become a primary field for capital accumulation
and wealth extraction on the part of an increasingly powerful rentier
class. So-called ‘natural’ resources can likewise be bought up even
though they are not in themselves a product of social labour. The
commodification of nature has certain limits because some things (like
the atmosphere and the restless oceans) are not easily privatised and
enclosed. While the fish extracted from the oceans can easily be
commodified, the waters in which they swim pose a different problem.
Markets can, however, be created around usufructuary rights to, say,
pollution of the atmosphere and the oceans or to exclusive leasing
rights to fishing in certain zones (such that Spanish trawlers fish
exclusively in that part of the southern Atlantic Ocean over which
Argentina claims rights).

The enclosure and parcelling up of land, of labour (through extensions
of both the detailed and social divisions of labour) and money power
(fictitious money and credit money capital in particular) all as
commodities were crucial to this transition to the system of private
property rights that gives a legal basis for the operations of capital.
The state–private property contradiction thus displaces a fluid and
alive conception of the relation to nature, with the idea that nature is
to be construed, as Heidegger once complained, as ‘one vast gasoline
station’.⁵ It likewise displaced all those cultural assumptions that
attached to common property regimes and customary rights that were more
characteristic of preceding modes of production (this does not, I want
to stress, warrant waxing nostalgic for the social order within which
such rights and practices were embedded). It puts in place of all of
this variety of being and living in the world a doctrine of the
universal, self-evident and individualised ‘rights of man’, dedicated to
the production of value, that effectively masks in universalistic and
naturalised legal doctrine the lurid trail of violence that accompanied
the dispossession of indigenous populations. To this day, however,
opponents and dissenters to all of this – increasingly viewed as
terrorists – are more likely to inhabit the prisons than live in the
mini-utopia of the bourgeois suburb.

In this constructed world certain truths stand out as self-evident,
chief of which is that everything under the sun must be in principle and
wherever technically possible subject to commodification, monetisation
and privatisation. We have already had cause to comment on how housing,
education, health care and public utilities have trended in this
direction and we can now add to these the activities of war-making and
even government itself as more and more of these sectors get
subcontracted to private companies. Those blessed with sufficient money
power can then buy up (or steal) almost anything and everything to the
exclusion of the mass of the population that is lacking in sufficient
money power, subversive guile or political/military influence to
compete. But the fact that it is now possible to buy up proprietary
rights to gene sequences, pollution credits and weather futures should
surely, in the light of Polanyi’s warnings, give us pause. The trouble,
however, it that all of this seems to be so embedded in the ‘natural’
and unshakeable bourgeois order of things that it seems not only
understandable but inevitable that business as usual should be able to
dominate social life in spheres of social and cultural activity where it
has absolutely no business to be. Exchange value is everywhere the
master and use value the slave. It is in this context that the revolt of
the mass of the people in the name of inadequate access to fundamental
use values becomes imperative.

That imperative then couples with a systematic critique and revolt
against the ongoing politics of appropriation and accumulation by
dispossession. That politics sits in a puzzling and plainly
contradictory relation to universal legal doctrines of private property
rights that supposedly regulate state–individual relations in such a way
that coercive dispossessions, thievery, robbery and chicanery ought to
have no place. Capitalist constitutionality and legality, it seems, are
based on a lie or at best upon confusing fictions, if events in
financial and housing markets these last few years are anything to go
by. Yet we lack a common sense of exactly what the nature of that lie
might be. As a result, we typically reduce the problem of accumulation
by dispossession to one of the inability to apply, implement and
regulate market behaviours sufficiently.

There are two other insights to be taken from this formulation. First,
what guarantees that the individuals who so pillage and raid the common
wealth will act collectively in such a way as to ensure the reproduction
of that common wealth? Private individuals or corporations acting in
their own short-term self-interest often undermine, if not destroy, the
conditions for their own reproduction. Farmers exhaust the fertility of
their land and employers have been known to work their labourers to
death or to a point of such exhaustion that they function inefficiently.
This difficulty is particularly severe on the terrain of environmental
damage and degradation, as the example of British Petroleum’s part in
the Gulf Oil Spill of 2010 suggests. Second, what incentive do
individuals have to abide by the rules of good market behaviour when the
profits attached to so doing are low and the rate of return on
illegality, predation, thievery and cheating is very high, even after
taking into account the enormous fines that might be levied for
misbehaviour? The huge fines levied on financial institutions such as
HSBC, Wells Fargo, CitiBank, JPMorgan and the like in recent years and
the evidence of continued malfeasance in the realms of finance suggest
that this too is an ongoing problem for the reproduction of the common
wealth.

It is only when it is clearly understood how the ‘objective’ but totally
fictional mediations of monetisation, commodification and privatisation
of non-commodities such as land, labour and capital (all wrought and
often sustained by extra-legal and coercive means) lie at the root of
the hypocrisy of capitalist constitutionality that we see how that
constitutionality (and its legal codes) can incorporate illegality at
its very base. The fact that these fictions and fetishisms
systematically advantage some individuals rather than others and so
constitute the basis for the construction of capitalist class power is
no longer purely incidental: it is the foundational raison d’être for
the whole political and economic edifice that capital constructs. The
inner relation between capitalist class power and these fictions and
fetishisms is nowhere more evident than in the crucial commodification,
monetisation and privatisation of labour power and it is to this that we
must now turn.


Contradiction 5


Capital and Labour

That some human beings have appropriated and exploited the labour power
of others has been a long-standing feature of human organisation. The
exercise of the power to do so has entailed the construction of
different social relations, from the coercions of slavery, serfdom and
the trading of women (and sometimes children) as mere chattels to the
willing consent of worshippers to do God’s or the gods’ work in
theocratic societies or the submissive fealty of loyal subjects to go to
war or to mobilise to build, say, pyramids, in the name of a revered
leader, patriarch, monarch or local lord. That such social relations of
domination, appropriation and exploitation could be racialised,
ethnicised, gendered and targeted at culturally, religiously affiliated
or supposedly biologically inferior beings has also been a long-standing
practice. That they could be monetised and commodified is obvious.
Slaves could be bought and sold directly, dowries (measured in key
commodities like cattle or money) were attached to the trade in women,
and mercenary armies displaced those in which religious beliefs and
personal loyalties were what counted. In addition, being mired in
escalating debts (debt peonage or some parallel form such as
share-cropping) was, and continues to be, one of the more insidious ways
in which either the labour or the products of the labour of others get
appropriated by those with social, political and money power.

But what capital deals in, and this is what makes this mode of
production distinctive, is labour power as a commodity. The labourer is
the bearer of that commodity and sells it to the capitalist in a
supposedly ‘free’ labour market. Trading in labour services preceded the
rise of capitalism, of course, and it is entirely possible that such
trading will continue long after capital has ceased to exist as a viable
way to produce and consume. But what capital learned was that it could
create the basis for its own reproduction – hopefully on a permanent
basis – through the systemic and continuous use of labour power to
produce a surplus over that which the labourer needed to survive at a
given standard of living. This surplus lies at the root of monetary
profit.

The remarkable thing about this system is that it does not appear to
rely on cheating, theft, robbery or dispossession because labourers can
be paid their ‘fair’ market value (the ‘going rate’) at the same time as
they can be put to work to generate the surplus value that capital needs
to survive. This ‘fairness’ rests on the conceit that labourers have an
individualised private property right over the labour power they are
capable of furnishing to capital as a commodity (a commodity which has
the use value to capital of being able to produce value and surplus
value) and that they are ‘free’ to dispose of that labour power to
whomsoever they like. It is most convenient for capital, of course, that
labourers be ‘freed’ of any access to the land or even to any means of
production. They then have no option except to sell their labour power
in order to live. When put to work, capitalists can see to it that
labourers produce more in commodity values than the market value of
their labour power. Labourers, in short, must add more value than they
get if capital is to be created and reproduced. Capital pockets the
added value as profit and can store that added value as an
ever-increasing concentration of money power.

The commodification of labour power is the only way to solve a seemingly
intractable contradiction within the circulation of capital. In a
properly functioning market system, where coercion, cheating and robbery
are ruled out, the exchanges should be based on a principle of equality
– we exchange use values with each other and the value of those use
values should be roughly the same. This contradicts the presumption that
there will be more value for all capitalists because in a
well-functioning capitalist system all capitalists should earn a profit.
So where does the extra value come from to assure a profit when the
market system in principle depends on equality of exchanges? There must
exist a commodity that has the capacity to create more value than it
itself has. And that commodity is labour power. And that is what capital
relies upon for its own reproduction.

The effect is to transform social labour – the labour we do for others –
into _alienated_ social labour. Work and labour are exclusively
organised around the production of commodity exchange values that yield
the monetary return upon which capital builds its social powers of class
domination. Workers, in short, are put in a position where they can do
nothing other than reproduce through their work the conditions of their
own domination. This is what freedom under the rule of capital means for
them.

While the relation between the labourer and the capitalist is always an
individual contractual relation (by virtue of the private property
character of labour power), it is not hard to see how in both the labour
market and the labour process there will arise a general class relation
between capital and labour that will inevitably – like all private
property relations – involve the state and the law as arbiter, regulator
or enforcer. This is so by virtue of the systemic contradiction between
individual private property rights and state power. Nothing stops the
labourers individually or collectively agitating and fighting for more
and nothing stops the capitalists from striving (also individually or
collectively) to either pay the labourer less than their fair market
value or reduce the value of labour power (by either trimming the market
basket of goods deemed necessary to the labourer’s survival or reducing
the cost of the existing market basket). Both capital and labour are
within their rights to struggle over these issues and, as Marx famously
put it, ‘between equal rights, force decides’.¹

The more that capital is successful in the struggle against labour, the
greater its profits. The more the labourers succeed, the higher their
standard of living and the more options they have in the labour market.
The capitalist likewise typically struggles to increase the intensity,
productivity and/or length of time of the labour rendered to it in the
labour process, while labourers strive to diminish both the hours and
the intensity as well as the physical hazards implicit in the activity
of labouring. The regulatory power of the state – for example,
legislation to limit the length of the working day or to limit exposure
to hazardous working conditions and materials – is often involved in
these relations.

The forms and effectiveness of the contradictory relation between
capital and labour have been much studied and have long played a
critical part in defining the necessity of revolutionary as well as
reformist political struggles. I can therefore be mercifully brief here,
since I presume most of my readers are broadly familiar with what is
entailed. For some analysts of a left-wing persuasion (Marxists in
particular), it is this contradiction between capital and labour that
constitutes the primary contradiction of capital. For that reason, it is
often regarded as the fulcrum of all meaningful political struggles and
the seedbed for all anti-capitalist revolutionary organisation and
movement. It is also cited by some as the sole underlying source of all
forms of crises. There have certainly been places and times when what is
called the ‘profit squeeze’ theory of crisis formation seems to have
been prominently at work. When workers become very powerful relative to
capital, then they are likely to push wage levels up to the point where
they reduce profits to capital. Under these conditions capital’s typical
response is to go on strike, to refuse to invest or reinvest, and
deliberately create unemployment as a means to discipline labour. An
argument of this kind would fit the situation in North America, Britain
and Europe from the late 1960s into the 1970s.² But capital also just as
often gets into difficulty when it dominates too easily over labour, as
the unfolding situation after the crash of 2008 demonstrates.

But the capital–labour contradiction cannot stand alone as an
explanation of crises either analytically or even, in the final
analysis, politically. It is both embedded in and dependent upon its
relation to the other contradictions of capital (even, for example, the
contradiction between use and exchange values). Viewed in this light,
both the nature and conception of the political task in any
anti-capitalist movement have to change, because the surrounding
constraints – such as the vast concentrations of money power that
capital typically amasses to pursue its agenda and secure its interests
– often place limits on the conditions of possibility of radical
transformations in the capital–labour relation in the workplace. Even if
the eventual suppression of the capital–labour contradiction and the
drive to establish the conditions for unalienated (as opposed to
alienated) labour are the be-all and end-all of an alternative political
ambition, these objectives cannot be accomplished without addressing the
other contradictions, such as that of the money form and the private
capacity to appropriate social wealth, with which they are associated.

Consideration of the capital–labour contradiction certainly points to
the political ambition to supersede capital’s domination over labour in
both the labour market and the workplace by forms of organisation in
which associated labourers collectively control their own time, their
own labour processes and their own product. Social labour for others
does not disappear but alienated social labour does. The long history of
attempts to create some such alternative (by way of worker cooperatives,
autogestion, worker control and more latterly solidarity economies)
suggests that this strategy can meet with only limited success for the
reasons already stated. State-organised alternatives derived from the
nationalisation of the means of production and centralised planning have
likewise turned out to be equally problematic if not misleadingly
utopian. The difficulty of successfully implementing either of these
strategies derives, I believe, from the way the capital–labour
contradiction is linked to and embedded in the other contradictions of
capital. If the aim of these non-capitalistic forms of labour
organisation is still the production of exchange values, for example,
and if the capacity for private persons to appropriate the social power
of money remains unchecked, then the associated workers, the solidarity
economies and the centrally planned production regimes ultimately either
fail or become complicit in their own self-exploitation. The drive to
establish the conditions for unalienated labour falls short.

There are also some unfortunate misunderstandings of the complex terrain
upon which the contradiction between capital and labour is fought out.
The tendency in left thinking is to privilege the labour market and the
workplace as the twin central domains of class struggle. These are
therefore the privileged sites for the construction of alternatives to
capitalist forms of organisation. This is where the proletarian vanguard
supposedly fashions itself to lead the way to a socialist revolution. As
we will see shortly, when we come to examine the contradictory unity
between production and realisation in the circulation of capital, there
are other terrains of struggle that can be of equal if not more
compelling significance.

For example, working people in the United States typically spend about a
third of their income on housing. Housing provision, as we have seen, is
typically driven by increasingly speculative exchange value operations
and is a site for the extraction of rents (on both land and property),
of interest (largely in the form of mortgage payments) and of taxes on
property, as well as profit on the industrial capital deployed in
housing construction. It is also a market characterised by a great deal
of predatory activity (for example, extraction of legal fees and
charges). Labour, which may have won significant concessions on wages
through struggles fought out in labour markets and at the point of
production, may have to give back almost all of its gains to procure
housing as a use value under speculatively driven housing market
conditions and after unavoidable encounters with predatory practices.
What labour wins in the domain of production is stolen back by the
landlords, the merchants (for example, the telephone companies), the
bankers (for example, credit card charges), the lawyers and commission
agents, while a large chunk of what is left also goes to the taxman. As
with the case of housing, the privatisation and commodity provision of
medical care, education, water and sewage, and other basic services,
diminish the discretionary income available to labour and recapture
value for capital.

But this is not the full story. All of these practices form a collective
site where the politics of accumulation by dispossession takes over as a
primary means for the extraction of income and wealth from vulnerable
populations, including the working classes (however defined). The
stealing back of privileges once acquired (such as pension rights,
health care, free education and adequate services that underpin a
satisfactory social wage) has become a blatant form of dispossession
rationalised under neoliberalism and now reinforced through a politics
of austerity ministered in the name of fiscal rectitude. Organising
against this accumulation by dispossession (the formation of an
anti-austerity movement, for example) and the pursuit of demands for
cheaper and more effective housing, education, health care and social
services are, therefore, just as important to the class struggle as is
the fight against exploitation in the labour market and in the
workplace. But the left, obsessed with the figure of the factory worker
as the bearer of class consciousness and as the avatar of socialist
ambition, fails largely to incorporate this other world of class
practices into its thinking and its political strategies.

It is also here that the complex interactions between the contradictions
of _capital_ and those of _capitalism_ come more fully into view. I will
take up this question in more detail later. But here it would be foolish
as well as tactically unwise to conclude any discussion of the
capital–labour contradiction without noting not only its embedded
relation to the other contradictions of capital but also its clear
entanglement with the contradictions of _capitalism_, particularly those
associated with racialisation, gender and other forms of discrimination.
Labour and housing-market segmentation and segregation along racial,
ethnic or other lines, for example, are notoriously pervasive features
of all capitalist social formations.

While the capital–labour contradiction is unquestionably a central and
foundational contradiction of capital, it is not – even from the
standpoint of _capital_ alone – a primary contradiction to which all
other contradictions are in some sense subservient. From the standpoint
of _capitalism_, this central and foundational contradiction within the
economic engine constituted by capital clearly has a vital role to play,
but its tangible manifestations are mediated and tangled up through the
filters of other forms of social distinction, such as race, ethnicity,
gender and religious affiliation so as to make the actual politics of
struggle within capitalism a far more complicated affair than would
appear to be the case from the standpoint of the labour–capital relation
alone.

I do not say all of this to diminish the significance of the
capital–labour contradiction within the panoply of capital’s
contradictions, for it is indeed a key contradiction of singular
character and importance. It is, after all, in the workplace and through
the labour market that the force of capital impinges directly upon the
body of the labourer as well as upon all those dependent on the labourer
for their life chances and their well-being. The alienating and
coruscating nature of that experience for many people (the often savage
treatment in the labour process and the experience of raw hunger in the
workers’ household) is always a primary locus of mass alienation and,
consequently, a flashpoint for outbreaks of revolutionary anger. But its
overemphasis and its treatment as if it operates autonomously and
independently of the other contradictions of capital have, I believe,
been damaging to a full-blooded revolutionary search for an alternative
to capital and, hence, to capitalism.


Contradiction 6


Capital as Process or Thing?

In years gone by physicists endlessly debated whether light should best
be conceptualised in terms of particles or waves. In the seventeenth
century Isaac Newton developed a corpuscular theory of light at the same
time as Christiaan Huygens advocated his wave theory. Opinion thereafter
fluctuated between one or other determination until Niels Bohr, the
daddy of quantum mechanics, resolved the so-called ‘wave–particle
duality’ by appeal to a principle of complementarity. Light is, under
this interpretation, both a particle and a wave. Both descriptions are
needed to complete our understanding, but we do not need to use both
descriptions at the same time. Some physicists, however, regarded the
duality as simultaneous rather than complementary. And there was
considerable debate over whether the duality was inherent in nature or
reflected the limitations of the observer. Whatever the case, it is
clear that dualities of this sort are now accepted as foundational for
theory building in many areas of the natural sciences. The mind–brain
duality, to take another example, lies at the root of thinking in the
contemporary neurosciences. So let it not be said that the natural
sciences are inherently hostile to some kind of dialectical reasoning or
immune to the idea of contradiction (though, I hasten to add, the nature
of their dialectical reasoning is very different from the wooden and
stultifying version of dialectics that Engels and later Stalin
favoured). What a pity that conventional economics, which aspires to the
status of a science, has not followed suit!

Should capital be viewed as a process or as a thing? It has to be
viewed, I shall argue, as both, and I favour a simultaneous rather than
a complementary interpretation of how this duality works, even though,
for purposes of exposition, it is often necessary to favour one
standpoint over another. The unity of the capital circulating
continuously as a process and a flow on the one hand and the different
material forms it assumes (primarily money, production activities and
commodities) on the other make for a contradictory unity. The focus of
our inquiry has to be, therefore, upon the nature of this contradiction
and how it can be the locus of creativity and change as well as of
instabilities and crises.

Consider a simple flow model of how a well-behaved and honest capitalist
might work while respecting all the legalities that a properly regulated
capitalist state might impose on market behaviours. The capitalist
starts the day with a certain amount of money (whether the money is
borrowed or owned outright does not matter here). That money is used to
purchase means of production (use of land and all the resources that lie
therein, as well as partially finished inputs, energy, machinery and the
like). The capitalist also finds a labour market at hand and hires
workers under contract for a given period of work (say, eight hours a
day for five days for a weekly wage). The acquisition of these means of
production and of labour power precedes the moment of production. The
labour power is, however, usually remunerated after production has
occurred, whereas the means of production are usually paid for prior to
production (unless purchased on credit). Plainly, the productivity of
workers depends on the technology (for example, machines), the
organisational form (for example, the division of labour within the
labour process and forms of cooperation) and the intensity/efficiency of
the labour process as designed by the capitalist. The outcome of this
production process is a new commodity (mostly things but sometimes
processes, like transportation as well as services) which is taken into
the marketplace and sold to consumers at a price that should yield the
capitalist an equivalent sum of money to that which was initially laid
out plus an additional sum that constitutes a profit.

The profit at the end of the day is the motivation for going to all the
trouble to engage with this process. The following day the capitalist
repeats the process all over again in order to continue to make a
living. But the next day she typically takes a part of the profit earned
yesterday and uses it to expand production. She does this for a variety
of reasons, including lust and greed for more money power, but also out
of fear that upstart capitalist competitors may drive her out of
business if she does not reinvest a part of yesterday’s profits in
expansion.

There are illegal versions of this process. The initial money may have
been assembled through robbery and violence. Access to land and
resources may be coerced and inputs may be stolen rather than purchased
fairly on the open market. The conditions of contract imposed on labour
may violate legally established norms, while violations of all sorts –
non-payment of wages, forced extension of working hours, fines for
supposed misconduct – can be widespread. Labour process conditions can
become intolerable or even hazardous (exposure to toxic substances,
forced increase in the intensity of work beyond reasonable human
capacities). Chicanery in the marketplace through false representation,
monopoly pricing and the sale of defective and even dangerous
commodities can all be widespread. Competitors can be shot and monopoly
prices charged. The recognition that all these things can happen has led
to state policing and interventions such as regulatory laws on
occupational safety and health, consumer product safety protections and
the like (such protective measures have been severely weakened under the
neoliberal regimes personified by Ronald Reagan and Margaret Thatcher
that have prevailed these last thirty years or so).

Almost everywhere we look in the capitalist world, the evidence of
widespread illegality is palpable. The definition of what is the norm
for legal capital circulation is, it seems, heavily influenced, if not
defined, by the field of illegal behaviours. This legal–illegal duality
therefore also plays a role in how capital works. Plainly, the
involvement of state power as a constraint on individual behaviours is
needed. A stateless capitalism is unthinkable (see Contradiction 3). But
how the state intervenes depends on class controls and influence over
the state apparatus. The illegalities practised by Wall Street in recent
times could not have occurred without some mix of neglect or complicity
on the part of the state apparatus.

But the main point here is the definition of capital as a process, as a
continuous flow of value through the various moments and across the
various transitions from one material form to another. At one moment
capital takes the form of money, at another it is a stock of means of
production (including land and resources) or a mass of labourers walking
through the factory gates. Within the factory, capital is involved in
concrete labouring and the making of a commodity in which latent and as
yet unrealised value (social labour) and surplus value are congealed.
When the commodity is sold, then capital returns once again to its money
form. In this continuous flow, both the process and the things are
contingent upon each other.

The process–thing duality is not unique to capital. It is a universal
condition of existence in nature, I would argue, and, since human beings
are a part of nature, it is a universal condition of social activity and
social life under all modes of production. I live my life as a process
even as I have thing-like qualities through which the state defines who
I am (name and number!). But capital confronts and mobilises this
duality in a particular way and it is this that requires our close
attention. Capital exists as a continuous flow of value through the
different physical states we have identified (along with others yet to
be considered). The continuity of the flow is a primary condition of
capital’s existence. Capital must circulate continuously or die. The
speed of its circulation is also important. If I can circulate my
capital faster than you, then I have a certain competitive advantage.
There is considerable competitive pressure, therefore, to accelerate the
turnover time of capital. The tendency towards speed-up is easily
identifiable in capital’s history. The list of technological and
organisational innovations designed to speed things up and to reduce the
barriers posed by physical distance is very long.

But all this presumes that the transitions from one moment to another
are unproblematic. This is not, however, the case. I have money and I
want to make steel, so I need to have to hand immediately all of the
ingredients (labour power and means of production) to make that steel.
But the iron ore and coal are still buried in the ground and it takes a
lot of time to dig them out. There are not enough workers close by who
are willing to sell their labour power. I need to build a blast furnace
and that takes time too. Meanwhile my money capital designated for steel
production sits dormant and no value is produced. The transition from
money into the commodities required for production is plagued with all
sorts of potential barriers of this sort and time lost is capital
devalued or even capital lost. It is only when all these barriers are
transcended that capital can finally flow into actual production.

Within production there are also all manner of potential problems and
barriers. It takes time to produce the steel and the intensity of the
work process affects how long it takes for the steel to be produced.
While different organisational and technological innovations can be
sought out to shorten the working time, there are physical barriers to
reducing this time to zero. Workers, furthermore, are not automatons.
They may lay down their tools or go slow in the labour process.
Establishing control over and collaboration with the workforce is needed
for continuity.

Once the steel is finished it has to be sold and again the commodity can
sit on the market for some time before a buyer shows up. If everyone out
there has enough steel to last a couple of years, then there can be no
buyers at all for a while and the commodity capital becomes dead capital
because it has ceased to circulate. The producer has a vested interest
in securing and accelerating the turnover time of consumption. One of
the ways to do that is to produce steel that rusts so fast that it needs
rapid replacement. Diminishing the turnover time of consumption is much
easier, however, in the case of cellphones and electronic devices.
Planned obsolescence, innovation, shifting fashion and the like become
deeply rooted in capitalist culture.

All sorts of strategies and short cuts emerge as capital desperately
seeks to transcend or bypass the barriers to circulation and to smooth
out and speed up its turnover time. Producers, for example, may not want
to wait to sell their commodities. For them it is easier to pass the
commodity on to merchants at a discount on the full value (which
furnishes the merchants with an opportunity to earn their cut of the
surplus). The merchants (wholesalers and retailers) take on both the
costs and the risks of selling the product to final consumers. By
pursuing efficiencies and economies of scale (while exploiting the
labour they employ) they can connect producers with final consumers at a
lower cost than would be the case if the direct producers undertook the
marketing themselves. This smooths out the flow and provides producers
with a more secure market. But, on the negative side, the merchants may
end up exercising considerable power over the direct producers and force
the latter to take lower rates of return (this is the Walmart strategy).
Alternatively, producers can seek credit on unsold goods. But here too
the autonomous power of the bankers, financiers and discounters may then
come into play as an active factor in the circulation and accumulation
of capital. Social strategies to maintain the continuity of capital flow
constitute a double-edged sword. While they may succeed in their
immediate aim of smoothing out and facilitating the circulation process,
they simultaneously create active power blocs among the merchants (for
example, Walmart) and the financiers (for example, Goldman Sachs) who
may pursue their own specific interests rather than serve the interests
of capital in general.

There are other more purely physical problems that exacerbate the
tension between fixity and motion within the circulation of capital.
These problems centre on the category of long-term investments in fixed
capital. In order for capital to circulate freely in space and time,
physical infrastructures and built environments must be created that are
fixed in space (anchored on the land in the form of roads, railways,
communication towers and fibre-optic cables, airports and harbours,
factory buildings, offices, houses, schools, hospitals and the like).
Other more mobile forms of fixed capital (the ships, trucks, planes and
railway engines, as well as the machinery and office equipment, right
the way down to the knives and forks, the plates and cooking utensils,
we use on a daily basis) have a long life. The mass of all this – as we
look at an urban landscape like São Paulo, Shanghai or Manhattan – is
simply huge and much of it is immovable, and that part which is movable
cannot be replaced during the item’s lifetime without loss of value. It
is one of the paradoxes of capital accumulation that as time goes on the
sheer mass of this long-lived and often physically immobile capital for
both production and consumption increases relative to the capital that
is continuously flowing. Capital is forever in danger of becoming more
sclerotic over time because of the increasing amount of fixed capital
required.

Fixed and circulating capital are in contradiction with each other but
neither can exist without the other. The flow of that part of capital
that facilitates circulation has to be slowed down if the movement of
the circulating capital is to speed up. But the value of immobile fixed
capital (like a container port terminal) can be realised only through
its use. A container facility to which no ships come is useless and the
capital invested in it is lost. On the other hand, commodities could not
find their way to market without the ships and the container terminals.
Fixed capital constitutes a world of things to support the process of
capital circulation, while the process of circulation furnishes the
means whereby the value invested in the fixed capital is recovered.

Another layer of difficulty then arises out of this underlying
contradiction between fixity and motion. When the social manoeuvres
designed to smooth out capital flow (for example, the activities of
merchant capitalists and even more powerfully those of the financiers)
are combined with the physical problems of fixity in the land, then a
space is opened up for landed property to capture a share of the
surplus. This distinct faction of capital extracts rents and shapes
investments on the land even as it speculates mercilessly on land,
natural resource and property asset values.

Back in the 1930s Keynes happily looked forward to what he called ‘the
euthanasia of the rentier’.¹ That political ambition, which Keynes
applied to all owners of capital, has not of course been realised. Land,
for example, has become even more prominent as a form of fictitious
capital to which titles of ownership (or shares of future rental income)
can be traded internationally. The concept of ‘land’ now includes, of
course, all the infrastructures and human modifications accumulated from
past times (for example, the subway tunnels of London and New York built
more than a century ago), as well as recent investments not yet
amortised. The potential stranglehold of the rentier and the landed
interest on economic activity is now an even greater threat,
particularly as it is backed today by the power of financial
institutions that revel in the returns to be had from escalating rents
and land and property prices. The housing-price booms and crashes on
which we have already commented have been typical examples. What is
interesting is that these practices have not gone away. They have now
morphed into the astonishing ‘land grabs’ going on around the world
(from the resource-rich regions of north-east India to Africa and
throughout much of Latin America) as institutions and individuals seek
to secure their financial future by ownership of land and all the
resources (both ‘natural’ and humanly created) embedded therein. This
suggests the arrival of a coming regime of land and resource scarcity
(in a largely self-fulfilling condition based on monopoly and
speculative power of the sort that the oil companies have long
exercised).

The rentier class rests its power on the control of fixity even as it
uses the financial powers of motion to peddle its wares internationally.
How this happened in housing markets in recent times is the paradigmatic
case. Ownership rights to houses in Nevada were traded all over the
world to unsuspecting investors who were eventually bilked of millions
as Wall Street and other financial predators enjoyed their bonuses and
their ill-gotten gains.

The questions, then, are: when and why does this tension between fixity
and motion and between process and thing become heightened into an
absolute contradiction, particularly in the form of the excessive power
of the rentier class, so as to produce crises? Plainly, this
contradiction can be the locus of local stresses and crises. If
commodities no longer flow, then the things that facilitate the flows
become useless and have to be abandoned and rental returns collapse. The
long and painful history of deindustrialisation has left whole cities,
like Detroit, bereft of activity and therefore sinks of lost value even
as other cities, like Shenzhen or Dhaka, become hubs of activity that
demand massive investments in fixed capital coupled with rental
extractions and property market booms if they are to succeed. The
history of capital is rife with stories of localised booms and crashes
in which the contradiction between fixed and circulating capital,
between fixity and motion, is strongly implicated. This is the world
where capital as a force of creative destruction becomes most visible in
the physical landscape we inhabit. The balance between creativity and
destruction is often hard to discern, but the costs imposed on whole
populations through deindustrialisation, gyrations in property values
and land rents, disinvestment and speculative building all emanate from
the underlying and perpetual tension between fixity and motion which
periodically and in specific geographical locations heightens to the
point of an absolute contradiction and, hence, produces a serious
crisis.

So what kind of alternative political ambition can be derived from this
analysis? One immediate and obvious target is the abolition of the
powers of landed property to extract rents from the fixity they command.
The capacity of rentiers to trade legal titles to immobile land and
property assets fluidly across spaces, which happened as mortgages
bundled into collateralised debt obligations (CDOs) were traded
worldwide in recent times, must be curbed. Land, resources and the
amortised built environment should be categorised and managed as a
common property resource for the populations that use and rely upon
them. The people as a whole gain nothing from the escalating land and
property prices that have characterised recent times. The connection
between financial speculation and investments in physical
infrastructures and other forms of fixed capital must likewise be
negated, so that financial considerations no longer dictate production
and use of physical infrastructures. Finally, the use value aspects of
infrastructural provision must come to the fore. This leaves the social
order with no option but to explore the field of rational planning
practices on the part of political collectivities to ensure that the
necessary physical use values can be produced and maintained. In this
way, the admittedly always complex relations between processes and
things and between fixity and motion can be orchestrated for the common
good rather than mobilised for the endless accumulation of capital.


Contradiction 7


The Contradictory Unity of Production and Realisation

As capital flows, it passes through two major checkpoints where its
performance in achieving that quantitative increase which lies at the
root of profit is registered. In the labour process or its equivalent,
value is added through work. But this value added remains latent rather
than actual until it is realised through a sale in the market. The
continuous circulation of capital depends upon the successful passage
(with success measured as the rate of profit) through the two moments
of, first, production in the labour process and, second, realisation in
the market. The unity that necessarily prevails between these two
moments within the circulation process of capital is, however, a
contradictory unity. So what is the main form this contradiction takes?

In the first volume of his epic analysis of capital, Marx assumes away
all problems of realisation in the market in order to study how the
surplus value that underpins profit is produced. Other things being
equal (which, of course, we know they never are), we would expect
capital to have a strong incentive to pay workers as little as possible,
to work them for as many hours and as intensely as possible, to get them
to bear as much of the costs of their own reproduction (through
household activities and work) as possible and to keep them as docile
and disciplined (by coercion if necessary) in the labour process as
possible. To this end, it is mighty convenient (if not essential) for
capital to have to hand a vast reservoir of trained but unused labour
power – what Marx called an ‘industrial reserve army’ – in order to keep
the aspirations of those employed in check. If such a labour surplus did
not exist, then capital would need to create one (hence the significance
of the twin forces of technologically induced unemployment and opening
up access to new labour supplies, such as those in China, over the last
thirty years). It would also be important for capital to prevent if
possible all or any forms of collective organisation on the part of the
workers and to hold in check by whatever means possible any drive by
them to exercise political influence over the state apparatus.

The ultimate outcome of such practices on the part of capital, Marx
theorised in Volume 1 of _Capital_, would be the production of
increasing wealth for capital at one pole and increasing impoverishment,
degradation and loss of dignity and power on the part of the working
classes who actually produced the wealth at the other pole.

In the second volume of _Capital_ – a volume that is little read even by
accomplished leftist scholars – Marx studies the conditions of
realisation, while assuming that there are no problems arising in
production. A number of uncomfortable though tentative (the volume was
never finished) theoretical conclusions are arrived at. If capital does
all those things that it must do according to the Volume 1 analysis to
ensure the production and appropriation of surplus value, then the
aggregate demand exercised by the labour force in the marketplace will
tend to be restricted, if not systematically diminished. In addition, if
the costs of the social reproduction of the labourers are being forced
back into the household, then the labourers will not be buying goods and
services in the market. The irony is that the more the labourers take on
the cost of reproducing themselves, the less they will have an incentive
to go to work for capital. A large unemployed reserve army is,
furthermore, not a source of burgeoning aggregate demand (unless propped
up by generous state income subsidies), any more than falling wages
(including a fall-off in state contributions to the social wage)
constitute the basis for an expanding market.

Herein lies a serious contradiction:

The workers are important for the market as buyers of commodities. But
as sellers of their commodity – labour power – capitalist society has
the tendency to restrict them to their minimum price. Further
contradiction: the periods in which capitalist production exerts all its
forces regularly show themselves in periods of overproduction; because
the limit to the application of the productive powers is not simply the
production of value, but also its realization. However, the sale of
commodities, the realization of commodity capital, and thus of surplus
value as well, is restricted not by the consumer needs of society in
general, but by the consumer needs of a society in which the great
majority are always poor and must always remain poor.¹

Lack of aggregate effective demand in the market (as opposed to the
social demand for needed use values on the part of a penurious
population) creates a serious barrier to the continuity of capital
accumulation. It leads to falling profits. Working-class consumer power
is a significant component of that effective demand.

Capitalism as a social formation is perpetually caught in this
contradiction. It can either maximise the conditions for the
_production_ of surplus value, and so threaten the capacity to _realise_
surplus value in the market, or keep effective demand strong in the
market by empowering workers and threaten the ability to create surplus
value in production. In other words, if the economy does well according
to the Volume 1 prescriptions it is likely to be in trouble from the
standpoint of Volume 2, and vice versa. Capital in the advanced
capitalist countries tended towards a demand-management stance
consistent with the Volume 2 prescriptions (emphasising the conditions
for realisation of value) between 1945 and the mid-1970s but in the
process increasingly ran into problems (particularly those of a
well-organised and politically powerful working-class movement) in the
production of surplus value. After the mid-1970s it therefore shifted
(after a fierce battle with labour) towards a supply-side stance more
consistent with Volume 1. This emphasised cultivating the conditions for
surplus value production (through reducing real wages, crushing
working-class organisation and generally disempowering workers). The
neoliberal counter-revolution, as we now call it, from the mid-1970s
onwards resolved the pre-eminent problems of surplus value production
but it did so at the expense of creating problems of realisation in the
marketplace.

This general story is, of course, a gross oversimplification, but it
provides a neat illustration of how the contradictory unity of
production and realisation has been manifest historically. It is clear
in this instance also that the processes of crisis formation and
resolution are bound together by the way crises get moved around from
production to realisation and back again. There have, interestingly,
been parallel shifts in economic policy and theory. For example,
Keynesian demand management (broadly consistent with Marx’s Volume 2
analysis) dominated economic thinking in the 1960s, whereas monetarist
supply-side theories (broadly consistent with Volume 1 analysis) came to
dominate after 1980 or so. I think it important to situate these
histories of both ideas and public policies in terms of the underlying
contradictory unity of production and realisation as represented by the
first two volumes of _Capital_.

The contradiction between production and realisation can, however, be
mitigated in a number of ways. To begin with, demand can be increased in
the face of falling wages by the expansion of aggregate numbers in the
labour force (as happened when China began to mobilise its latent labour
surplus after 1980 or so), by the expansion of conspicuous consumption
on the part of the bourgeoisie or by the existence and expansion of
strata in the population who are not engaged in production but who have
considerable purchasing power (state officials, the military, lawyers,
doctors, educators and the like). There is an even more significant way
that the contradiction might be countered: by resort to credit. There is
nothing in principle that prevents credit being supplied to sustain in
equal measure both production and realisation of values and surplus
values. The clearest example of this is when financiers lend to
developers to build speculative tract housing while lending mortgage
finance to consumers to purchase that housing. The problem, of course,
is that this practice can all too easily produce speculative bubbles of
the sort that led into the crash of 2007–9 primarily in the housing
markets of the United States but also in Spain and Ireland. The long
history of booms, bubbles and crashes in construction testifies to the
importance of phenomena of this sort in capital’s history.

But the interventions of the credit system have plainly also been
constructive in certain ways and played a positive role in sustaining
capital accumulation through difficult times. As a result, the
contradiction between production and realisation is displaced back into
the contradiction between the money and the value forms. The
contradiction between production and realisation is internalised within
the credit system, which on the one hand engages in insane speculative
activity (of the sort that animated the housing bubble) while on the
other hand salving many of the difficulties of maintaining a steady and
continuous flow of capital across the contradictory unity of production
and realisation. Restrictions on the credit system exacerbate the latent
contradiction between production and realisation, while unchaining and
deregulating the credit system unleashes unchecked speculative activity
particularly with respect to asset values. The underlying problem is
never abolished all the time that the contradictions between use and
exchange value and between money and the social labour money represents
remain in place. It is out of the interconnections between these
different contradictions that financial and commercial crises frequently
arise.

There are a number of secondary contradictions that attach to the
production–realisation relationship. While it is unquestionable that the
value added arises in the act of production and that the amount of value
added depends crucially on the exploitation of living labour in the
labour process, the continuity of flow makes it possible for the value
and surplus value to be realised at a number of different points within
the circulation process. The capitalist producer who organises the
production of value and surplus value does not necessarily realise that
value. If we introduce the figures of the merchant capitalist, the
bankers and the financiers, the landlords and property owners, and the
taxman, then there are several different locations where the value and
the surplus value can be realised. And the realisation can take two
basic forms. By exerting immense pressure on the capitalist producers,
the merchant capitalists and the financiers, for example, can reduce the
return to the direct producers to the smallest of margins while racking
up major profits for themselves. This is how Walmart and Apple operate
in China, for example. In this case not only does realisation occur in a
different sector, it also occurs across the ocean in another country
(creating a geographical transfer of wealth of considerable
significance).

The other path to bridge the production–realisation contradiction is to
recoup from the labourers any share of the surplus that they have
acquired for themselves by charging extortionate prices or imposing
fees, rents or taxes upon the working classes so as to diminish their
discretionary income and standard of living significantly. This practice
can also occur through manipulation of the social wage such that gains
made in pension rights, in educational and health care provision and in
basic services can be rolled back as part of a political programme of
accumulation by dispossession. This is what the current widespread
appeal to a politics of austerity on the part of the state is designed
to achieve. Capital may lose or concede to workers’ demands at the point
of production but regain what has been conceded or lost (and then some)
by excessive extractions in the living space. High rents and housing
costs, excessive charges by credit card companies, banks and telephone
companies, the privatisation of health care and education, the
imposition of user fees and fines, all inflict financial burdens on
vulnerable populations even when these costs are not inflated by a host
of predatory practices, arbitrary and regressive taxes, excessive legal
fees and the like.

These activities are, moreover, active and not passive. The actual or
attempted expulsion of low-income and vulnerable populations from
high-value land and locations through gentrification, displacement and
sometimes violent clearances has been a long-standing practice within
the history of capitalism. It unites those residents of Rio de Janeiro’s
favelas subject to evictions, the former occupants of self-built housing
in Seoul, those moved through eminent domain procedures in the United
States and the shack-dwellers in South Africa. Production here means the
production of space, and realisation takes the form of capital gains on
land rents and property values, thus generally empowering the developers
and the rentiers as opposed to other factions of capital.

The contradictory unity between production and realisation therefore
applies as much to the fate of the workers as it does to capital. The
logical conclusion, which by and large the left has tended to sideline
if not ignore, is that there is necessarily a contradictory unity in
class conflict and class struggle across the spheres of working and
living.

The political ambition that derives from this contradiction is to
reverse the relation between production and realisation. Realisation
should be replaced by the discovery and statement of the use values
needed by the population at large and production should then be
orchestrated to meet these social needs. Such a reversal might be
difficult to accomplish overnight, but the gradual decommodification of
basic needs provision is a feasible long-term project, which fits neatly
with the idea that use values and not the perpetual search for
augmenting exchange values should become the basic driver of economic
activity. If this seems a very tall order, it is useful to remember that
the social democratic states in Europe (particularly those of
Scandinavia) reoriented their economies to demand-side management from
the 1960s onwards as a way to stabilise capitalism. In so doing, they
partially accomplished – albeit in a somewhat halfhearted way – that
reversal of the production–realisation relation that the passage to an
anti-capitalist economy would demand.


Part Two The Moving Contradictions

_The foundational contradictions of capital do not stand in isolation
from each other. They interlock in a variety of ways to provide a basic
architecture for capital accumulation. The contradiction between use
value and exchange value (1) depends on the existence of money, which
lies in a contradictory relation to value as social labour (2). Exchange
value and its measure, money, presume a certain juridical relation
between those engaging in exchange: hence the existence of private
property rights vested in individuals and a legal or customary framework
to protect those rights. This grounds a contradiction between
individualised private property and the collectivity of the capitalist
state (3). The state has a monopoly over the legitimate use of violence
as well as over the issue of fiat money, the primary means of exchange.
A profound connection exists between the perpetuity of the money form
and the perpetuity of private property rights (both imply the other).
Private individuals can legally and freely appropriate the fruits of
social labour (the common wealth) for themselves through exchange (4).
This constitutes a monetary basis for the formation of capitalist class
power. But capital can systematically reproduce itself only through the
commodification of labour power, which solves the problem of how to
produce the inequality of profit out of a market exchange system based
on equality. This solution entails converting social labour – the labour
we do for others – into alienated social labour – the labour that is
dedicated solely to the production and reproduction of capital. The
result is a foundational contradiction between capital and labour (5).
Put in motion, these contradictions define a continuous process of
capital circulation that passes through different material forms, which
in turn implies an ever-deepening tension between fixity and motion in
the landscape of capital (6). Within the circulation of capital a
contradictory unity necessarily exists between production and
realisation of capital (7)_.

_These contradictions define a political terrain upon which an
alternative to the world that capital creates can be defined. The
political orientation must be towards use values rather than exchange
values, towards a money form that inhibits private accumulation of
wealth and power and the dissolution of the state–private property nexus
into multiple overlapping regimes of collectively managed common
property_ _rights. The ability of private persons to appropriate the
common wealth must be checked and the monetary basis for class power
must be undermined. The contradiction between capital and labour has to
be displaced by emphasising the power of associated labour to engage in
unalienated labour, to determine its own labour process while producing
needed use values for others. The relation between fixity and motion
(which can never be abolished since it is a universal condition of human
existence) must be managed in such a way as to counteract the powers of
the rentier and to facilitate the continuous and secure fulfilment of
basic needs for all. Finally, instead of production for production’s
sake leading the way to a forced world of manic and alienated
consumerism, production should be rationally organised to provide the
use values necessary to achieve an adequate material standard of living
for all. Realisation should be converted into a wants-and-needs-based
demand to which production responds_.

_These are general orientations for long-term political thinking as to
how an alternative to capital might be constituted. It is against the
background of these orientations that specific strategies and proposals
should be evaluated_.

_The foundational contradictions are constant features of capital in any
place and time. The only thing constant about the contradictions we will
next consider is that they are unstable and constantly changing. This
makes for an understanding of political economy that departs radically
from the model of the natural sciences, where it can broadly be assumed
that the principles being elucidated are true for all space and time. As
Brian Arthur puts it in his perceptive and instructive book_ The Nature
of Technology, _the means by which the ‘base laws’ (or in my language
‘the foundational contradictions’) are expressed ‘change over time, and
the patterns they form change and re-form over time. Each new pattern,
each new set of arrangements, then, yields a new structure for the
economy and the old one passes, but the underlying components that form
it – the base laws – remain always the same.’_¹

_In the case of moving contradictions, the basic nature of the
contradiction has first to be described, before going on to provide a
general assessment of the form it now assumes. By understanding
something_ _of its evolutionary trajectory, we can then say something
about future prospects and possibilities. This evolution is not
predetermined. Nor is it random or accidental. But since the pace of
evolutionary change tends to be relatively slow – a matter of decades
rather than years (though there is evidence it is accelerating) – it is
then possible to say something about future prospects as well as present
dilemmas_.

_To capture the sense of movement is politically vital, for the
instability and the movement provide political opportunities at the same
time as they pose critical problems. Political ideas and strategies that
make sense in one place and time do not necessarily apply at another.
Many a political movement has failed because it sought to appeal to
ideas and ambitions that were well past their sell-by date. We cannot
shape our current political strategies and carve out our contemporary
political ambitions to fit the defunct ideas of some long-dead political
theorist. This does not mean there is nothing to be learned from a study
of the past or that no advantage is to be had from drawing upon past
memories and traditions for inspiration in the present. What it does
imply is an obligation to write the poetry of our own future against the
background of the rapidly evolving contradictions of capital’s present_.


Contradiction 8


Technology, Work and Human Disposability

The central contradiction that the traditional Marxist conception of
socialism/communism is supposed to resolve is that between the
incredible increase in the productive forces (broadly understood as
technological capacities and powers) and capital’s incapacity to utilise
that productivity for the common welfare because of its commitment to
the prevailing class relations and their associated mechanisms of class
reproduction, class domination and class rule. Left to itself, the
argument goes, capital is bound to produce an increasingly vulnerable
oligarchic and plutocratic class structure under which the mass of the
world’s population is left to hustle a living or starve to death.
Frustrated by this ever-increasing inequality in the midst of plenty, a
self-consciously organised anti-capitalist revolutionary movement (led,
in Leninist accounts, by a vanguard party) will arise among the masses
to dismantle class rule before going on to reorganise the global economy
to deliver the benefits promised by capital’s amazing productivity to
everyone on planet earth.

While there is more than a grain of truth in this analysis – we seem
well on the way these days to producing a global plutocracy, for example
– coupled with more than a whiff of hopeful revolutionary fervour
concerning the transitional mechanism, it has always seemed to me that
this formulation is too simplistic, if not fundamentally deficient. But
what is clear is that the dramatic increases in productivity achieved by
capital form one side of a contradictory movement that is always in
danger of erupting into crises. It is not entirely clear, though, what
its antithesis might rightly be. It is to this question that we now
turn.

Technology can be defined as the use of natural processes and things to
make products for human purposes. At its base, technology defines a
specific relation to nature that is dynamic and contradictory. We will
return to this all-important contradiction in depth later (see
Contradiction 16). All that matters here is to recognise its existence
and its fluidity and dynamism. The immediate and distinctive purpose of
_capital_ (as opposed, say, to the military, the state apparatus and
various other institutions in civil society) is _profit_, which
translates socially into the perpetual accumulation of capital and the
reproduction of capitalist class power. This is capital’s consuming aim.
To this end, capitalists adapt and reshape the hardware of technology
(the machines and computers), the software (the programming of machine
uses) and their organisational forms (command and control structures
over labour usage in particular). Capital’s immediate purpose is to
increase productivity, efficiency and profit rates, and to create new
and, if possible, ever more profitable product lines.

When considering the trajectories of technological change, it is vital
to remember that the software and the organisational forms are every bit
as important as the hardware. Organisational forms, like the control
structures of the contemporary corporation, the credit system,
just-in-time delivery systems, along with the software incorporated into
robotics, data management, artificial intelligence and electronic
banking, are just as crucial to profitability as the hardware embodied
in machines. To take a contemporary example, cloud computing is the
organisational form, Word is the software and this Mac, upon which I
write, the hardware. All three elements – hardware, software and
organisational form – are combined in computer technology. Under this
definition, money, banking, the credit system and the market are all
technologies. This definition may appear unduly broad but I think it
absolutely essential to keep it so.

Capital’s technology was initially subject to internal transformation
through competition between individual producers (at least, that was the
theory). Capitalist firms, in competition with each other, sought to
raise their individual efficiency and productivity so as to gain excess
profits relative to their competitors. Those that succeeded flourished,
while others were left behind. But competitive advantages (higher
profits) from superior organisational forms, machines or, for example,
tighter inventory control were usually short-lived. Competing firms
could quickly adopt the new methods (unless, of course, the technologies
were patented or protected by monopoly power). The outcome would be
leapfrogging innovations in technologies across sectors.

I sound a note of scepticism here because the history of capital
demonstrates a penchant for monopoly rather than competition and this
would not be so favourable for innovation. Instead, we find a strong
collective generic preference – a culture as it were – emerging among
capitalists for increasing efficiency and productivity across all
capitalist enterprises with or without the driving force of competition.
Innovations at one point in a supply chain – for example, power loom
cotton fabric production – required innovations elsewhere – for example,
the cotton gin – if overall productivity was to be improved. But it
sometimes took and still takes a while for a whole domain of economic
activity to be reorganised on a new technological basis. Last, but by no
means least, individual capitalists and corporations came to recognise
the importance of product innovation as a way to earn, if only for a
while, monopoly profits and, when protected by patent law, a monopoly
rent.

Capital was not and is not the only agent involved in the pursuit of
technological advantages. Different branches of the state apparatus have
always been deeply involved. Most prominent, of course, has been the
military in search of superior weaponry and organisational forms. War
and threats of war (arms races) have been strongly associated with waves
of technological innovation. In the early history of capitalism this
source of innovation probably played a dominant role. But various other
facets of state administration concerned with the levying and payment of
taxes, the definition of land and property rights and legal forms of
contract, along with the construction of the technologies of governance,
money management, mapping, surveillance, policing and other procedures
for the control of whole populations, have all along been just as if not
more significantly involved as capitalist firms and corporations in
developing new technological forms. Collaborations on research and
development between the state and private sectors with respect to
military, medical, public health and energy technologies have been
widespread. The spillover benefits of innovations in the public sphere
on capital’s practices and vice versa have been too numerous to count.

Technological changes within capitalism, to which capital contributes
and upon which capital voraciously feeds, derive, in short, from the
activities of several different agents and institutions. For capital,
these innovations create a vast domain of ever-changing possibilities
for sustaining or increasing profitability.

The processes of technological change have altered their character over
time. Technology became a special field of business. This first clearly
emerged in the nineteenth century with the rise of the machine-tool
industry. Generic technologies, like the steam engine and its offshoots,
were developed in a way that could be applied across multiple
industries. It was the profitability of the steam engine makers rather
than that of the different industries using steam power (for example,
transport, cotton factories and mining) that mattered, though plainly
the profitability of the one could not be achieved without that of the
other. The search for ever-newer and better forms of not only the steam
engine but also energy and power application quickly followed.

The search for generic technologies that could be applied almost
anywhere – in recent years think of fields such as computers,
just-in-time delivery systems and theories of organisation – became
important. A vast business of invention and innovation catering to all
and sundry sprang up, providing new technologies of consumption as well
as of production, circulation, governance, military power, surveillance
and administration. Technological innovation became big business, not
‘big’ necessarily in the sense of some vast consolidated corporation
(though examples of that sort now abound in fields like agribusiness,
energy and pharmaceuticals) but ‘big’ in the sense of multiple firms,
many of them small-scale start-ups and venture enterprises, exploring
innovation for innovation’s sake. Capitalist culture became obsessed
with the power of innovation. Technological innovation became a fetish
object of capitalist desire.

From the mid-nineteenth century onwards, this fetish drive for new
technological forms come what may also promoted the fusion of science
and technology. These two thereafter developed in a dialectical embrace.
Scientific understandings had always depended upon new technologies,
such as the telescope and the microscope, but the incorporation of
scientific knowledges into new technologies has lain at the heart of
what the business of technological innovation has been about.

This vast business became more and more adept at imposing sometimes
costly technological innovations on reluctant customers, often aided by
state regulation that tended to favour large firms rather than small
because the costs of regulatory compliance usually diminish with scale
of operation. EU regulations have, to take one example, forced small
shopkeepers and restaurants to adopt electronic machines for cash
transactions for tax and record-keeping purposes, putting them at a cost
disadvantage relative to chain stores. The diffusion of new technologies
occurs through a mix of consent and coercion. The development of
military technologies, on the other hand, has become nothing short of a
scandalous racket, whereby a vast military industrial complex feeds
endlessly at the trough of public finance while innovating for
innovation’s sake.

The path of technological evolution has not been random or accidental.
As Brian Arthur points out in _The Nature of Technology_, new
technologies become building blocks ‘for the construction of further new
technologies. Some of these in turn go on to become possible building
blocks for the creation of yet newer technologies. In this way, slowly
over time, many technologies form from an initial few, and more complex
ones form using simpler ones as components. The overall collection of
technologies bootstraps itself upward from the few to the many and from
the simple to the complex. We can say that technology creates itself out
of itself.’ Arthur calls this process ‘combinatorial evolution’ and I
think that is a good name for it. New technologies are, however,
‘created mentally before they are constructed physically’ and when we
look at the mental and conceptual processes involved, we see
technological evolution as mental problem solving put into practice. A
problem arises and is identified, a solution is demanded and the
solution invariably combines earlier solutions to other problems in a
new configuration. The new configuration often has spillover effects
elsewhere because it creates what Arthur calls ‘opportunity niches’ –
arenas where an innovation from one place might be meaningfully applied
in another.¹

Spontaneous development of innovation centres (some regions, cities and
towns have a remarkable record for innovation) occurs because, as was
long ago noted by commentators such as Jane Jacobs, the fortuitous
co-presence of different skills and knowledges of the sort that Arthur
regards as necessary for innovation to occur is more likely to be found
in a seemingly chaotic economy characterised by innumerable small
businesses and divisions of labour.² Such environments have historically
been far more likely to spawn new technological mixes than a
single-dimensional company town. More recently, however, the deliberate
organisation of the research universities, institutes, think tanks and
military R&D units in a given area has become a basic business model
through which the capitalist state and capitalist corporations pursue
innovation for competitive advantage.

But what is strange about Arthur’s otherwise informative presentation on
the logic of technological evolution is his avoidance of any critical
discussion of the range of human purposes that technologies are supposed
to serve. He waxes lyrical, for example, about the design sophistication
of the F-35 Lightning II aircraft without any mention of its relation to
warfare and the ‘human purpose’ of geopolitical domination. To Arthur
the aircraft merely presents a particular set of difficult technical
challenges that needed to be solved.

Similarly, there is no critique of the specific capitalistic form the
economy takes and certainly no questioning of the purposive drive of
capital to maximise profits, facilitate endless capital accumulation and
reproduce capitalist class power. Nevertheless, Arthur’s theory of
relatively autonomous technological evolution has deep implications for
understanding how the economic engine of capital functions. It sheds
considerable light on the contradictions that technological changes now
spawn for the perpetuation and reproduction of capital. There are some
important transitions occurring.

The shift from a machine to an organic model of the economy has
implications for economic theory. ‘Order, closedness, and equilibrium as
ways of organizing explanations are giving way to open-endedness,
indeterminacy, and the emergence of perpetual novelty.’³ Arthur here
instinctively echoes Alfred North Whitehead’s astute observation that
nature itself (and human nature is no exception) is always about the
perpetual search for novelty.⁴ As a result, Arthur continues,
‘technologies are acquiring properties we associate with living
organisms. As they sense and react to their environment, as they become
self-assembling, self-configuring, self-healing, and “cognitive,” they
more and more resemble living organisms. The more sophisticated and
“high-tech” technologies become, the more they become biological. We are
beginning to appreciate that technology is as much metabolism as
mechanism.’

This shift from a mechanical to an organic (or chemical) metaphor is
significant. The ‘new economy’ that Arthur sees appears more natural
than the mechanical rationality superimposed on the world from the
Enlightenment onwards. This is nothing short of a reversion to (perhaps
‘recuperation of’ would be a better phrasing) more ancient ways of
understanding the relation between technology and nature. But it is not
backward-looking or nostalgic and it eschews the sentimentality and
mysticism of so-called ‘new age’ cultural thinking. The ‘new principles’
that must enter into economics, Arthur implies, are organic and
process-based forms of thinking and theorising. Ironically (and Arthur
would doubtless be shocked to hear this), this was the form of political
economy that Marx long ago pioneered in _Grundrisse_! Only in this way,
Arthur suggests, will we be able to grasp the ‘qualities of modern
technology, its connectedness, it adaptiveness, its tendency to evolve,
its organic quality. Its messy vitality.’⁵

The implications of this analysis of technology for how we understand
the evolving character of the economic engine that is capital are
profound:

The coming of new technologies does not just disrupt the status quo by
finding new combinations that are better versions of the goods and
methods we use. It sets up a train of technological accommodations and
of new problems, and in so doing it creates new opportunity niches that
call forth fresh combinations which in turn introduce further
technologies – and further problems … The economy therefore exists
always in a perpetual openness of change – in perpetual novelty. It
exists perpetually in a process of self-creation. It is always
unsatisfied … The economy is perpetually constructing itself.⁶

New technological configurations displace the old and in so doing
initiate phases of what the economist Joseph Schumpeter famously dubbed
‘gales of creative destruction’.⁷ Whole ways of life and modes of being
and thinking have to drastically alter to embrace the new at the expense
of the old. The recent history of deindustrialisation and its
association with dramatic technological reconfigurations is an obvious
case in point. Technological change is neither costless nor painless and
the cost and the pain are not evenly shared. The question always to be
asked is: who gains from the creation and who bears the brunt of the
destruction.

So what role do the distinctive needs and requirements of capital play
in this process? Curiously, Arthur ignores the specificities of this
question in his otherwise perceptive study. There are within the history
and logic of capital, I would argue, five dominant but overlapping
technological imperatives. Let us consider these briefly.

1. The organisation of cooperation and divisions of labour in ways that
maximise efficiency, profitability and accumulation. From simple
beginnings in Adam Smith’s example of the pin factory, this has over
time grown to encompass much of what is now covered in management and
organisation theory, as well as in the articulation of techniques of
optimal corporate management. The increasing complexity and fluidity of
which Arthur speaks are here everywhere in evidence and the technologies
involved are in perpetual flux, with increasing emphasis upon the
software and the organisational forms assumed by contemporary forms of
capital. The mix of command and control and market coordinations is
unstable but effective.

2. The need to facilitate speed-up and acceleration of capital
circulation in all its phases, along with the need to ‘annihilate space
through time’, has spawned an astonishing range of technological
revolutions. Shortening the turnover time of capital in production and
in the market and shortening the lifetime of consumer products
(culminating in a shift from the production of things that last to the
production of spectacles that are ephemeral) have been imperatives in
capital’s history, largely enforced by competition. It is here that
technology’s relation to the production of nature becomes most clearly
apparent as sheep are bred to yield lamb in one year instead of three
and hogs breed at an accelerated rate. The increasing speed of transport
and communications reduces the friction and barrier of geographical
distance, making the spatiality and temporality of capital a dynamic
rather than a fixed feature of the social order. Capital literally
creates its own space and time as well as its own distinctive nature.
The mobility of the different forms of capital (production, commodities,
money) and of labour power is also perpetually subject to revolutionary
transformation. We will return to this topic later (see Contradiction
12).

Revolutionary transformations in the means of communication have
paralleled those occurring in transportation and in more recent times
have accelerated beyond belief. Instantaneous information and news
availability make this a potent force for affecting policies and
politics. Control over the means of communication has become a vital
aspect to the reproduction of capitalist class power and the new media
technologies (the social media in particular) have potentialities as
well as pitfalls for the dynamics of class struggle, as has become all
too apparent in recent uprisings in Cairo, Istanbul and other cities
around the world.

3. Technologies of knowledge production and dissemination, for data and
information storage and retrieval, are crucial for the survival and
perpetuation of capital. They not only provide the price signals and
other forms of information that guide investment decisions and market
activity, but also preserve and promote the necessary mental conceptions
of the world that facilitate productive activity, guide consumer choices
and stimulate the creation of new technologies.

Capital’s memory bank is indispensable. It is already vast. Its
exponential growth has to be matched by the exponential growth of
sophisticated technologies to handle, process and act upon it. The basic
information contained in land registers, contracts, legal judgments,
educational and medical records etc. has long been crucial for the
functioning of capital. Information of this sort provides, in addition,
the raw data out of which a working (but in many respects fictitious)
model of a national economy can be built. This data (joblessness, trade
deficits, stock market gyrations, growth figures, manufacturing
activity, capacity utilisation and the like) permits the health of the
national economy to be assessed and provides a basis upon which
strategic decisions of both businesses and state agencies can (for
better or for worse) be based. Agencies like the World Bank and the IMF
at times seem to be drowning in the mass of data they produce. A whole
host of ‘experts’ come into being to help us to understand the trends.
The introduction of new information-processing technologies, such as
computerised trading on Wall Street (and the more recent turn to
nano-technologies), has had immense implications for how capital
operates.

4. Finance and money form a crucial domain for the functioning of
capital (see Contradiction 2). It is only in money terms that profits
and losses can be exactly calculated and it is in money terms that most
economic decisions are made. While the technologies of money remained
fairly constant over long historical periods of time, there is no
question that innovation in this domain picked up remarkably from the
1930s onwards. In recent years innovations in finance and banking have
shown a tendency to explode into exponential growth with the advent of
computerisation, electronic moneys and banking, and a proliferation of a
whole new range of investment vehicles. The trend to create fictitious
capitals that circulate freely has accelerated remarkably alongside all
manner of predatory practices within the credit system that have
contributed to a wave of accumulation by dispossession and speculation
in asset values. Nowhere else do we see so dramatically the acute
interaction between new hardware possibilities, the creation of new
organisational forms (private equity firms and hedge funds and a host of
complicated state regulatory agencies) and, of course, an astonishing
rate of software development. The technologies of the world’s monetary
and financial system are an acute source of stress at the same time as
they are a field of capitalist endeavour unsurpassed in these times in
importance and in ‘messy vitality’.

5. Finally, there is the question of work and labour control. This is a
crucial arena for capital and I will take it up in detail shortly.

Did technologies have to evolve in the way they did? There clearly were
choices made that liberated technological innovation from the kinds of
constraints that had inhibited the deployment of new technologies in
earlier places and times (the failure to deploy technological
discoveries in China being the most conspicuous example). And there have
certainly been examples of intense resistance to new technological
configurations on moral and ethical grounds, everything from the
struggle of the Luddites against the introduction of machines to the
revolt of the physicists against the possibility of nuclear weapons.
Current controversies rage over the ethics and inadvisability of genetic
engineering and genetically modified foods. Such questions, however, do
not seem to deter the evolutionary trajectory of technological change.
This is why I designate this kind of contradiction as ‘moving’ – it is
not stable or permanent but perpetually changing its spots. For this
reason it becomes crucial to evaluate where the processes of
technological change are at right now and where they might move to in
the future.

Arthur asks, for example, ‘Could this process of constant evolution of
technology and remaking of the economy ever come to a halt?’ His answer
is yes in principle. But the actual prospects for a halt are exceedingly
remote. The decentralised dynamic of technological evolution is too
strong and the field of possible discoveries of the perpetual novelty in
nature far too wide for any halt to technological and economic evolution
to occur in the immediate future.

The pipeline of technologies coming in the next decade is reasonably
predictable. And current technologies have future improvement paths that
will be followed more or less predictably. But overall, just as the
collection of biological species in the far future is not predictable
from the current collection, the collective of technology in the
economic future is not predictable. Not only can we not forecast which
combinations will be made, we also cannot forecast which opportunity
niches will be created. And because potential combinations grow
exponentially, this indeterminacy increases as the collective develops.
Where three thousand years ago we could say with confidence that the
technologies used a hundred years hence would resemble those currently
in place, now we can barely predict the shape of technology fifty years
ahead.⁸

So where, in this process of ‘combinatorial evolution’, lies _the_
contradiction or contradictions that might threaten profitability and
endless capital accumulation? There are, I want to suggest, two
contradictions of huge import for the future prospects of capital. The
first concerns technology’s dynamic relation to nature. This will be the
subject of Contradiction 16. The second concerns the relationship
between technological change, the future of work and the role of labour
in relation to capital. This is the contradiction we will examine here.

Control over the labour process and the labourer has always been central
to capital’s ability to sustain profitability and capital accumulation.
Throughout its history, capital has invented, innovated and adopted
technological forms whose dominant aim has been to enhance capital’s
control over labour in both the labour process and the labour market.
This attempted control encompasses not only physical efficiency but also
the self-discipline of the labourers employed, the qualities of labour
supplied in the marketplace, the cultural habits and mentalities of
workers in relationship to the work they are expected to do and the
wages they expect to receive.

Many industrial innovators have had labour control as their primary
goal. A Second Empire French industrialist renowned for his innovations
in the machine-tool industry openly proclaimed that his three goals were
increasing precision in the labour process, increasing productivity and
disempowering the worker. It is for this reason, doubtless, that Marx
argued that technological innovation was a crucial weapon in class
struggle and that many an innovation had been adopted by capital with
the sole aim of breaking strikes. There certainly arose with this the
fetish belief on the part of capital that the solution to
ever-increasing profitability was endless technological innovation
directed towards the disciplining and disempowerment of the worker. The
factory system, Taylorism (with its attempted reduction of the worker to
the status of a ‘trained gorilla’), automation, robotisation and the
ultimate displacement of living labour altogether respond to this
desire. Robots do not (except in science fiction accounts) complain,
answer back, sue, get sick, go slow, lose concentration, go on strike,
demand more wages, worry about work conditions, want tea breaks or
simply refuse to show up.

Capital’s fantasy of total control over labour and the labourer has its
roots in material circumstances, most particularly in the dynamics of
class struggle in all of its manifestations both within and outside of
the production process. The role of technologically induced unemployment
in regulating the wage rate, the pursuit of ever-cheaper goods for the
sustenance of the labour force (the Walmart phenomenon) to make lower
wages more acceptable, the assault upon any hint of a basic social wage
as encouraging idleness on the part of labour and the like form a domain
of class struggle where technological interventions and mediations
become crucial. This is what makes Arthur’s presentation so strange,
because never once do these elementary and obvious historical facts
(satirised so wonderfully in Charlie Chaplin’s _Modern Times_) enter
into his account of the combinatorial evolution that does indeed play
such a critical role in the details of technological change.

So here is the central contradiction: if social labour is the ultimate
source of value and profit, then replacing it with machines or robotic
labour makes no sense, either politically or economically. But we can
see all too clearly what the mechanism is that heightens this
contradiction to the point of crisis. Individual entrepreneurs or
corporations see labour-saving innovation as critical to their
profitability vis-à-vis competitors. This collectively undermines the
possibility of profit.

In a recent book Martin Ford shapes an argument around exactly this
problem. As the cutting edge of technological dynamism shifts from
mechanical and biological systems to artificial intelligence, so we will
see, he argues, a huge impact upon job availability not only in
manufacturing and agriculture but also in services and even in the
professions. Aggregate demand for goods and services will consequently
collapse as jobs and incomes disappear. This will have catastrophic
effects upon the economy unless some way is found for the state to
intervene with targeted redistributive stimulus payments to those large
segments of the population that have become redundant and disposable.

André Gorz had earlier made exactly this same argument though from a
different political perspective:

Micro-economic logic would want these savings in working time to be
translated into savings in wages for those companies where such
economies are achieved: producing at lower costs, these companies will
be more ‘competitive’ and will be able (in certain conditions) to sell
more. But from the macro-economic point of view, an economy which,
because it uses less and less labour, distributes less and less wages,
inexorably descends the slippery slope of unemployment and
pauperization. To restrain its slide, the purchasing power of households
has to cease to depend on the volume of work which the economy consumes.
Though they perform a decreasing number of hours of work, the population
has to earn the wherewithal to purchase a growing volume of goods
produced: the shortening of working time must not bring about a
reduction in purchasing power.⁹

The details that Ford cites to back up his general claim are impressive.
There is clear empirical evidence of inexorable exponential growth of
computer capacity and speed. This has roughly doubled every two years
over the last three decades or so. The growth of this computer capacity
does not depend on the construction of a technology that has the ability
to think as we do. It arises out of the fact that the computer is
‘unimaginatively fast’, and getting faster and faster all the time.
Speed-up has always been, as we have seen, a crucial aim of
technological innovation in relation to capital and the world of
computers is no exception. As a result of the exponential growth in
computer power, ‘entire traditional job categories are at risk of being
heavily automated in the not too distant future’. The idea that the new
technologies will create jobs at a pace to compensate for these losses
‘is pure fantasy’. Furthermore, the idea that it will only be the
low-paying routine jobs that will be eliminated and not high-paying
skilled jobs (radiologists, doctors, university professors, airline
pilots and the like) is misguided. ‘In the future, automation will fall
heavily on knowledge workers and in particular on highly paid workers.’
Ford concludes: ‘Allowing these jobs to be eliminated by the millions,
without any concrete plan to handle the issues that will result, is a
clear recipe for disaster.’ ¹⁰

But what sort of disaster are we looking at? Larger and larger segments
of the world’s population will be considered redundant and disposable as
productive workers from the standpoint of capital and will have a hard
time surviving both materially and psychologically. Alienated from any
prospect of a meaningful existence in the realm of necessary labour as
defined by capital, they will have to look elsewhere to construct a
meaningful life. On the other hand, output will be increasing, but where
will the corresponding increase in demand come from? This is what
bothers Ford most of all:

_Who_ is going to step forward and purchase all this increased output? …
automation stands poised to fall across the board – on nearly every
industry, on a wide range of occupations, and on workers with graduate
degrees as well as on those without high school diplomas. Automation
will come to the developed nations and to the developing ones. The
consumers that drive our markets are virtually all people who either
have a job or depend on someone who has a job. When a substantial
fraction of these people are no longer employed, where will market
demand come from?¹¹

This is a typical Keynesian-style question of demand management and it
threatens a crisis for capital of the sort that racked the global
economy in the 1930s. What happens when we restate Ford’s claims against
the background of the contradictory unity between production and
realisation? Marx interestingly identifies a similar difficulty, but he
does so from the perspective of production. As more and more
labour-saving devices are applied, so the value-producing agent – social
labour – tends to decline quantitatively, ultimately destroying socially
necessary labour and the production of value and with it the basis of
profitability. The same result arises from both sides of the
contradictory unity between production and realisation. Profitability
erodes and endless capital accumulation collapses in both cases. Ford in
an appendix recognises that there may be some sort of broad similarity
between his argument and that of Marx, but he does not understand what
it is and is, of course, at pains to distance himself from the damaging
consequences of any such association. But the potential range of
counteracting forces and solutions looks very different from the two
perspectives within the contradictory unity.

Ford, for example, is desperately concerned to save capital from
succumbing to the potential disaster that looms. He actually favours the
spread of consumerism (no matter how mindless and alienating) to absorb
the ever-cheapening products that a wholly automated capital can
produce. He seeks to square the circle of supply and demand disparities
by creating a state-mandated tax system to recuperate the productivity
gains created by the new technologies. These funds are then
redistributed as purchasing power to the dispossessed masses on an
incentivised basis. In return for the funds people are expected to
commit to creative or worthy social activities and contribute to the
common good. Programmes of this sort already exist. The poverty grants
in Argentina and Brazil redistribute money to poor families provided
that they can prove that their children are attending school.
Structuring such incentivised redistributions effectively may be
difficult, but in Ford’s view it is critical to avoid the culture of
dependency that is often associated with straight welfare payments or a
straight guaranteed income no matter whether one works or not.
Nevertheless, redistributions and the creation of purchasing power are
the only means to create sufficient demand to match the ever-increasing
supply of goods and services. This is, concurs André Gorz, ‘the only way
of giving meaning to the decrease in the volume of socially necessary
work’.¹²

Marx, on the other hand, saw a number of possible antidotes to the
tendency of profit rates to fall as the result of labour-saving
innovations: the opening up of entirely new product lines that were
labour-intensive; a pattern of innovation that was devoted as much to
capital saving as to labour saving; a rising rate of exploitation on the
labour forces still employed; the prior existence or formation of a
class of consumers who produced nothing; a phenomenal rate of growth in
the total labour force which would augment the mass of capital being
produced even though the individual rate of return was falling. Whether
Marx thought these countervailing forces were sufficient to stave off
the falling value of production and falling profits indefinitely is not
clear.

Developmental paths of this sort have effectively held off falling
profits for some time now. The absorption of the peasantries of China,
India and much of South-East Asia (along with Turkey and Egypt and some
Latin American countries, with Africa still the continent with massive
untapped labour reserves) into the global labour force since 1980 or so,
along with the integration of what was the Soviet Bloc, has meant a huge
increase (rather than decrease) in the global wage labour force over and
beyond that supplied by population growth. The rising rates of
exploitation with the creation of horrific labour conditions in China,
Bangladesh, Vietnam and elsewhere are also palpable, while the demand
problem has largely been taken care of by way of a vast expansion of
credit.

So there appears to be no immediate cause for panic from the standpoint
of either production or realisation. But from the standpoint of the
long-term future of capital, it does seem as if we exist at a ‘last
frontier’ for labour absorption throughout global capitalism. In the
advanced capitalist countries there has been a massive movement of women
into the labour force over the last fifty years and internationally
there are few areas left (mainly in Africa and South and Inner Asia)
where massive reserves of labour power are to be found. Nothing on the
scale of the recent huge expansion of the global labour force will ever
be possible again. Meanwhile, the accelerating speed-up over the last
few years of automation and the application of artificial intelligence
to routine services (like airline check-ins and supermarket checkouts)
appears, on the other hand, to be just the beginning. Automation is now
identifiable in fields such as higher educational instruction and
medical diagnostics and the airlines are already experimenting with
pilotless planes. The contradiction between value production on the one
hand and runaway labour-saving technological innovation on the other is
headed into more and more dangerous territory. This danger confronts not
only an increasingly disposable population facing no foreseeable
employment opportunities but also (as even Ford clearly sees) the
reproduction of capital itself.

The last three recessions in the United States, for example, beginning
in the early 1990s, have been followed by what are euphemistically
referred to as ‘jobless recoveries’. The most recent deep recession has
led to the creation of long-term unemployment on a scale not seen in the
USA since the 1930s. Similar phenomena are observable in Europe and the
capacity for labour absorption in China – a key Communist Party policy
orientation – appears to be limited. Both the evidence of recent trends
and the evaluation of future prospects point in one direction: massive
surpluses of potentially restive redundant populations.

This has some serious implications, both theoretical and political, that
require elaboration. Money (see Contradiction 2) is a representation of
the value of social labour (the latter being understood as the quantity
of that labour which we supply to others via the exchange value market
system). If we are moving towards a world in which social labour of this
sort disappears, then there is no value to be represented. The
historical representation of value – the money form – is then entirely
free from its obligation to represent anything other than itself. The
neoclassical economists argued (when they bothered at all with the
question) that Marx’s labour theory of value is irrelevant because
capital responds only to money signals and not to value relations. There
was, they argued, no point bothering with the idea of value even if it
was a plausible concept (which most felt it was not). They were, I
believe, wrong in this judgement. But if the developments outlined above
do occur, then the neoclassical argument _contra_ the value theory will
become more and more correct, to the point where even the most orthodox
Marxists will have to give up the value theory. Conventional economists
will doubtless crow with delight at this. What they do not realise is
that this means the demise of the one restraint that has prevented the
descent of capital into total lawlessness. The recent evidence of a
contagious predatory lawlessness within capitalism is a sign of the
weakening regulatory role of social labour. This weakening has been
occurring for some time. One crucial break occurred with the abandonment
of a metallic base to the world’s monetary system in the early 1970s:
thereafter the relation of the world’s money to social labour became at
best tangential and we have the long chain of financial and commercial
crises around the world after the mid-1970s to prove it.

The money form has acquired a good deal of autonomy over the last forty
years. Fiat and fictitious values created by the world’s central banks
have taken over. This leads us back to some reflections on the relation
between the path of technological evolution we have here described and
the evolution of monetary technologies. The rise of cyber moneys, like
Bitcoin, in some instances seemingly constructed for purposes of
money-laundering around illegal activities, is just the beginning of an
inexorable descent of the monetary system into chaos.

The political problem posed by the question of technology for
anti-capitalist struggle is perhaps the most difficult to confront. On
the one hand we know all too well that the evolution of technologies,
marked as it is by a good deal of autonomous ‘combinatorial’ logic of
the sort that Arthur describes, is a form of big business in which class
struggle and inter-capitalist and interstate competition have played
leading roles for the ‘human purpose’ of sustaining military dominance,
class power and perpetual accumulation of capital. We also see that
capital’s actions are steering closer and closer to the abyss of the
loss of social labour as an underlying regulatory principle that
prevents the descent of capital into lawlessness. On the other hand we
also know that any struggle to combat worldwide environmental
degradation, social inequalities and impoverishment, perverse population
dynamics, deficits in global health, education and nutrition, and
military and geopolitical tensions will entail the mobilisation of many
of our currently available technologies to achieve non-capitalistic
social, ecological and political ends. The existing bundle of
technologies, saturated as they are in the mentalities and practices of
capital’s search for class domination, contains emancipatory
potentialities that somehow have to be mobilised in anti-capitalist
struggle.

In the short term, of course, the left is bound to defend jobs and
skills under threat. But, as the miserable history of the noble
rearguard action fought against deindustrialisation in the 1970s and
1980s demonstrates, this will likely be a losing battle against a newly
emerging technological configuration from the very beginning. An
anti-capitalist movement has in the current conjuncture to reorganise
its thinking around the idea that social labour is becoming less and
less significant to how the economic engine of capitalism functions.
Many of the service, administrative and professional jobs the left
currently seeks to defend are on the way out. Most of the world’s
population is becoming disposable and irrelevant from the standpoint of
capital, which will increasingly rely upon the circulation of fictitious
forms of capital and fetishistic constructs of value centred on the
money form and within the credit system. As is to be expected, some
populations are held to be more disposable than others, with the result
that women and people of colour bear most of the current burden and will
probably do so even more in the foreseeable future.¹³

Martin Ford correctly poses the question: how will the resultant
disposable and redundant population live (let alone provide a market)
under such conditions? A viable long-term and imaginative answer to this
question has to be devised by any anti-capitalist movement. Commensurate
organised action and planning to meet the new eventualities and the
provision of sufficient use values must be thought through and gradually
implemented. This has to be done at the same time as the left has also
to mount a rearguard action against the technologies of increasingly
predatory practices of accumulation by dispossession, further bouts of
deskilling, the advent of permanent joblessness, ever-increasing social
inequality and accelerating environmental degradation. The contradiction
that faces capital morphs into a contradiction that necessarily gets
internalised within anti-capitalist politics.


Contradiction 9


Divisions of Labour

The division of labour should, by rights, be positioned as one of the
foundational features of what capital is all about. It refers to the
human capacity to disaggregate complex productive and reproductive
activities into specific but simpler tasks that can be undertaken by
different individuals on a temporary or permanent basis. The specialised
work of the many individuals is reunited into a working whole by way of
organised cooperation. Throughout history, divisions of labour have been
changing and evolving depending on both the internal and the external
conditions affecting a particular society. The central problem the
division of labour poses is the relation between the parts and the whole
and who (if anyone) takes responsibility for the evolution of the whole.

Capital has seized upon the division of labour and reshaped it
dramatically to its own purposes throughout its history. It is for this
reason that I include this contradiction under the heading of ‘moving’,
since it is perpetually in the course of being revolutionised in the
world that capital commands. The division of labour now in place is
radically different to the point of being almost unrecognisable from
that which prevailed in, say, 1850. The evolution in the division of
labour under capital has, however, a very special character since, as
with everything else, it is oriented primarily towards sustaining
competitive advantage and profitability, which have nothing necessarily
to do – except coincidentally – with improving the qualities of working
and living or even enhancing human welfare more generally. If
fundamental improvements to living and working occur, as indeed they
clearly do, then this is either a collateral effect or a consequence of
political demands and pressures emanating from restive and discontented
populations. After all, the vast increase in ever-cheaper physical
output that more efficient divisions of labour produce has to be
consumed somehow and somewhere if the value produced is to be realised.
On the other hand there are plenty of collateral damages (for example,
in environmental conditions) to be taken into account also.

Contradictions within the division of labour are a dime a dozen. There
is, however, a general and important distinction between the technical
and the social division of labour. By the former I mean a separate task
within a complex series of operations that anyone in principle can do,
like minding a machine or mopping the floor, while by the latter I mean
a specialised task that only a person with adequate training or social
standing can do, like a doctor, software programmer or hostess at a
five-star restaurant. I cite this last example to emphasise that the
divisions and definitions that exist often depend as much on social,
cultural and interpersonal skills and the presentation of self as they
do on technical expertise.

There are all sorts of other distinctions of note, such as those due to
nature (for example, childbearing) or to culture (for example, the
position of women in society); between city (urban) and country (rural);
mental and manual; social (throughout society in general) and detail
divisions (within a firm or corporation); blue collar and white collar;
skilled and unskilled; productive and unproductive; domestic (household)
versus wage-based; symbolic versus material and so on. There are then
sectoral classifications between primary (agriculture, forestry, fishing
and mining), secondary (industry and manufacturing), tertiary (services
and the finance, insurance and real estate – FIRE – sectors that have
surged to prominence in recent times) and what some like to refer to as
a fourth sector made up of increasingly important cultural and
knowledge-based industries. As if this is not enough, the classification
of different industries and occupations in censuses typically run to
more than 100 items.

To the degree that such distinctions and oppositions can be a source of
tension and antagonism, they can become embroiled in and heightened into
contradictions that play some sort of role in crisis formation and
resolution. Certainly, when we consider movements of revolt it would be
rare indeed not to find the causes as well as the active participants
rooted in one or other of these oppositions or based in certain sectors.
In socialist theory, of course, it has traditionally been the industrial
proletariat (the ‘productive’ labourers) within the overall division of
labour that has been favoured as the vanguard of revolutionary
transformation. Bank clerks, domestic workers and street cleaners have
never been thought of as revolutionary agents whereas miners, car
workers, steelworkers and even schoolteachers have.

Most of these dualisms turn out to be crude distinctions that have
limited purchase in helping us to understand an increasingly complex and
intricate world that is constantly subject to revolutionary
transformation. It is, however, both useful and important at the outset
to register how the technical and social bases of these distinctions
intersect, since the categories involved in the definition of the
division of labour have always intermingled technical and social
considerations in ways that are often confusing and misleading. There
has been a long history, for example, of defining skilled labour in
gendered terms such that any task that women could perform – no matter
how difficult or complex – was classified as unskilled simply because
women could do it. Worse still, women were often allocated these tasks
for so-called ‘natural’ reasons (everything from nimble fingers to a
supposedly naturally submissive and patient temperament). For this
reason, men in the workshops of Second Empire Paris strongly resisted
the employment of women since they knew that this would lead to the
reclassification of their work as unskilled and worthy only of a lower
rate of remuneration. While the issue at that time was very specific,
this is almost certainly a key factor in determining differential rates
of remuneration in the contemporary global labour market. The fact that
there has been an extensive feminisation both of low-wage labour and of
poverty worldwide testifies clearly to the importance of these sorts of
judgements, for which there is no technical basis whatsoever. The
question of gender has also entered into extensive debates over the
proper role to be assigned to housework versus wage labour. While this
is an important issue within capitalism and is doubtless implicated in
many personal crises within households, it has had very little direct
impact on the development of capital, except for a long-standing general
trend to broaden the market by commodifying more and more domestic tasks
(such as cooking, cleaning, washing one’s hair and getting nails clipped
and manicured). The campaign over wages for housework would, in any
case, seem to be seriously askew from an anti-capitalist perspective
because it merely deepens the penetration of monetisation and
commodification into the intimacies of daily life rather than using
household work as a lever to try to decommodify as many forms of social
provision as possible.

It is here that the contradictions of capital and of capitalism
intersect. It has long been the case that specific trades have often,
for example, been strongly and sometimes even exclusively associated
with particular ethnic, religious or racial groups in a population. It
is not only gender that is involved in shaping distinctions within the
division of labour. These associations which continue to be in evidence
are not merely residuals from a very complicated past. Many software
programmers and developers (an entirely new occupational category) come
from South Asia and the Philippines specialises in the provision and
export of women domestic workers to many different countries in the
world (from the USA to the Gulf States and Malaysia). The extensive
migrations of labour that have occurred both historically and in recent
times have frequently been channelled in such a way as to link certain
places of origin with specific occupations in the receiving country. The
National Health Service in Britain simply could not function without the
immigration of different groups from what was once the British Empire.
In recent years migrant streams (mainly women) from Eastern Europe
(Poland, Lithuania, Estonia and the like) have been recruited wholesale
into various facets of the so-called ‘leisure’ industries throughout
much of Europe including Britain (everything from cleaning hotels to
waitressing and bartending). Mexican and Caribbean migrants specialise
in harvesting the crops on both the east and the west coasts of the USA.

The allocation of different people to different tasks is associated with
differential rates of remuneration. Ethnic, racial, religious and gender
prejudices and discriminations become deeply embroiled in how the labour
market as a whole gets segmented and fragmented and how pay gets
determined. Jobs that are considered dirty and demeaning, for example,
are typically low-paid and left to the most disadvantaged and vulnerable
migrants (often those who have no legal status). Skilled worker status
is often automatically accorded migrants with software qualifications
from South Asia. What is even more invidious is that the rate of
remuneration also varies according to gender, race and ethnicity for
working in the same occupation and on identical tasks.

Struggles over status within the division of labour and the recognition
of skills are in effect struggles over differential life chances for the
worker and, by extension – and here is the core of the problem – over
profitability for the capitalist. From the standpoint of capital it is
useful if not crucial to have a labour market that is segmented,
fragmented and internally highly competitive. This poses barriers to
coherent and unified labour organisation. Capitalists can and often do
deliberately operate a divide and rule politics by fostering and
inciting interethnic tensions, for example. Competition between social
groups jockeying for position within the division of labour becomes a
primary means by which labour in aggregate gets disem-powered and
capital comes to exercise greater and more complete control over both
the labour market and the workplace. Typical forms of trade union
organisation along sectoral rather than geographical lines also inhibit
unified action on the part of labour, even when the unions themselves
strive to go further than simply serving the interests of their own
members.

The historical dynamics of class struggles within capitalism as a whole
over skills, their specification and their rate of remuneration is one
of the most important histories yet to be properly written from a
critical perspective. The following remarks are therefore preliminary.

When capital came upon the scene as a primary as opposed to occasional
form of accumulation and found it necessary to gain control of labour
processes in industrial production, it found at hand a division of
labour and a skill structure that were strongly rooted in the trades,
resting on artisan labour. The ‘butcher, the baker and the candlestick
maker’ were the sorts of occupations within which labourers could hone
their skills and seek to secure their future social positions. Most of
the population in Europe in the early years of capitalism was employed
in agriculture (as a landed or landless peasantry) or in services
(primarily domestic servants and retainers) to monarchs, landed
aristocracy and merchant capitalists. The labour of serving demanded its
own brand of interpersonal, domestic and socio-political skills.
Town-based artisan labour in the trades embraced a whole range of
different occupations, some of which were regulated by a guild and the
apprenticeship system. The guild system conferred monopoly power over
access to a skill that was based on a specific technical expertise.
Carpenters learned how to use their tools, as did jewellers,
clockmakers, iron masters, weavers, blacksmiths, tapestry artists,
shoemakers, nail and gun makers and the like. Through corporatist guild
organisation, groups of workers could assure and maintain a higher
standing in the social order and a higher rate of remuneration for their
work.

Capital plainly had to do battle with this monopoly power of labour over
its conditions of production and its labour process. It fought the
battle on two fronts. First, it gradually asserted its own monopoly
power with private property over the means of production, so depriving
labourers of the means to reproduce themselves outside of the
supervision and control of capital. Many different craft workers could
then be brought together under the direction of the capitalist into a
process of collective labour to produce anything from nails to steam
engines and locomotives. While the narrow technical basis and associated
skills of the individual tasks did not change that much, the
organisation of production through cooperation and the division of
labour brought these different tasks together to reap remarkable gains
in efficiency and productivity. The costs of commodities in the
marketplace fell rapidly to outcompete the traditional craft and
artisanal forms of production.

This was the division of labour that was not only extensively analysed
but also lauded to the heavens by Adam Smith in _The Wealth of Nations_,
published in 1776. In the celebrated case of the pin factory, Smith
emphasised how the organised division of labour within the production
process led to immense improvements in technical efficiency and labour
productivity. By taking advantage of workers’ differing skills and
talents, the overall increase in productivity and profitability within
what Marx later called ‘the detail division of labour’ within the firm
was assured. On this basis Smith went on to infer that the extensive
resort to social divisions of labour between firms and across sectors
was bound to have a similar effect. In this case, as Marx was later at
considerable pains to point out, the coordinating mechanism could no
longer be the individual capitalist organising cooperative activity
according to rational principles of design, but a more chaotic and
anarchistic set of coordinations in which volatile price signals in the
market became crucial to determinations of quantitatively rational
divisions of productive activity in different firms and sectors. Smith,
recognising this, urged the state generally not to intervene in price
fixing (except in the case of public utilities and natural monopolies)
and to follow a policy of laissez-faire to ensure that the hidden hand
of the market could do its work with maximal efficiency. To this day
theorists and policymakers have continued to mistakenly place great
faith in an ‘efficient market hypothesis’ for the coordination of not
only production but also the financial activities that came so badly
unstuck in September of 2008. Marx concluded that the chaotic anarchy of
the marketplace would be a constant source of the upsetting of
equilibrium in prices and that this would render the social division of
labour unstable if not crisis-prone.

The other, and I think far more profound and far-reaching, attack upon
the potential monopoly powers of labour arose out of the evolutionary
path of capitalist-inspired technological change. Much of this evolution
directly or indirectly aimed to undermine the power of labour, both in
the workplace and in the labour market. The bias of technological change
has all along been against the interests of labour and in particular
against the kinds of power that labour acquired through the acquisition
of scarce and monopolisable skills. One important direction in
capital–labour relations has been towards deskilling, a phenomenon that
Marx noted in _Capital_ and which was brought back centre stage in Harry
Braverman’s influential and controversial book _Labor and Monopoly
Capital_, published in 1974.¹ Braverman argued that capital,
particularly in its monopoly form, had a vested interest in degrading
skills and so destroying any sense of pride that might attach to working
for capital, while disempowering labour particularly at the point of
production. There had been a long history of struggle over this. In the
nineteenth century the ideologists of capital – Charles Babbage and
Andrew Ure in particular – were much cited by Marx as evidence of
capital’s penchant for deskilling. Braverman likewise made much of
Frederick Taylor’s efforts at scientific management to disaggregate
production processes to the point where a ‘trained gorilla’ would be
able to undertake production tasks. The ‘science’ involved here was one
in which time and motion studies were brought together with techniques
of specialisation to simplify all the tasks, to maximise the efficiency
and minimise the costs of production in any given sector or individual
firm.

Both Marx and Braverman recognised that some reskilling would be
required to implement the extensive organisational and technical changes
involved in deskilling the mass of the workers. The introduction of the
assembly line empowered the engineers who installed it and managed it,
just as the engineers involved in robotisation or the deployment of
computers had to acquire new skills to undertake their tasks. Critics of
Marx and of Braverman have pointed out, correctly, that the writings of
Babbage, Ure and Taylor were essentially utopian tracts that were never
fully implemented, in part because of intense resistance on the part of
workers and in part because the evolutionary path of technological
change was and is not uniquely directed to labour control.

New technologies have often called for redefinitions of skill through
which certain segments of labour can be advantaged. This turns out to be
much more important than either Marx or Braverman allowed. What is on
capital’s agenda is not the eradication of skills per se but the
abolition of _monopolisable_ skills. When new skills become important,
such as computer programming, then the issue for capital is not
necessarily the abolition of those skills (which it may ultimately
achieve through artificial intelligence) but the undermining of their
potential monopoly character by opening up abundant avenues for training
in them. When the labour force equipped with programming skills grows
from relatively small to super-abundant, then this breaks monopoly power
and brings down the cost of that labour to a much lower level than was
formerly the case. When computer programmers are ten-a-penny, then
capital is perfectly happy to identify this as one form of skilled
labour in its employ, even to the point of conceding a higher rate of
remuneration and more respect in the workplace than the social average.

In the same way that the evolution of technology has trended through its
own autonomous dynamic towards greater and greater complexity over time,
so divisions of labour have multiplied rapidly and been qualitatively
transformed. This has not been a simple linear evolution, in part
because the dynamics of class struggle has been engaged, though more
often than not to capital’s advantage. In the US steel industry, for
example, the number of specialised (and to some degree therefore
monopolisable) skills was very large indeed in the 1920s but became far
smaller, particularly after the labour legislation of the 1930s that
created the National Labor Relations Board, which had powers to resolve
interjurisdictional disputes over which skill was qualified to do what
in a particular industry. The contemporary steel industry has a much
simpler and more streamlined skill set than was the case in earlier
times. On the other hand specialisms in, say, medicine or banking and
finance have proliferated, while the emergence of whole new sectors
associated with electronics and computerisation has spawned an immense
range of new occupations and job specifications. The range of
specialisms within the state regulatory apparatus (in the Food and Drug
Administration or in all those institutions such as the Controller of
the Currency and the Security and Exchange Commission) has also grown
astronomically in recent times.

The rapid extension and the explosive increase in complexity of both the
detail and the social divisions of labour have become _the_ fundamental
feature of a modern capitalist economy. This evolution has not occurred
as a consequence of overall conscious design and decision (there is no
Ministry of the Division of Labour to mandate anything). It has evolved
in parallel with technological and organisational changes impelled by
the systemic forces earlier identified. And this despite the
simplifications of occupational specifications achieved in some sectors
of industry (such as steel and cars) and the loss of anachronistic
occupations (such as that of lamplighter and, in advanced countries,
those of water carrier and rag picker). Significant increases in labour
productivity and in the volume and variety of production have been
achieved by these means. One further consequence has been increasing
economic interdependence within larger and larger populations spread
over larger and larger geographical areas and the emergence of an
international division of labour that also requires consideration. This
implies rising problems of coordination in the social division of labour
and the increasing likelihood of cascading disruptions in response to
the volatility of market signals. Coordinations through command, control
and contractual supply relations back down a commodity supply chain have
consequently become more common in certain lines of production:
corporate demands for inputs (for example, the car industry’s need for
engines, parts, tyres, windscreens, electronics, etc.) are specified and
contracted for outside of the market. But with increasing simplification
of tasks and increasing complexity of coordinations come increasing
risks of misfires and of unintended consequences. This introduces a
whole new layer in the division of labour and a vast army of new
occupations involving logistical, legal, financial, marketing,
advertising and other business services. Questions of security and
safety (in everything from airlines to pharmaceuticals and food
supplies) also become more pressing, as does the apparatus for
surveillance, monitoring and quality control of different activities.
Proliferating divisions of labour within the economy are paralleled by
proliferating bureaucratic divisions of regulatory and administrative
authority not only within a typical state apparatus but also internally
within many institutions, such as hospitals, universities and school
systems.

The division of labour as a whole has undergone a metamorphosis over the
last half-century. As a result, many of the inquiries available to us
from nineteenth-century critics like Karl Marx, Ferdinand Tönnies, Emile
Durkheim and Max Weber do not address some of the central contemporary
issues. Studies of the division of labour in the past largely focused on
industrial organisation and factory labour in particular national
contexts and the findings of those studies still surely stand. But the
increasing complexity and proliferating geographical range of divisions
of labour entail a qualitative leap in problems of coordination. Further
problems arise because of the proliferation of state surveillance and
bureaucratic authority functions and the wide-ranging shifts in the
forms of organisation in civil society. Many of these divisions of
labour and of authority interlock and feed off each other, while still
others acquire a hierarchical position vis-à-vis one another. We are
also increasingly subject to what Timothy Mitchell calls ‘the rule of
experts’.² Expert knowledge has always played a critical role in the
history of capital and the power of the expert is hard to challenge.
Earlier signs of this – the ‘organisation man’, the rule of the
‘mandarins’ and the like – drew attention to an emerging autocratic and
hierarchical streak within the division of labour. Arguably, the role of
experts has increased exponentially over recent decades and this poses a
serious problem for the transparency and legibility of the world in
which we live. We all depend on experts to fix our computer, diagnose
our illnesses, design our transport systems and ensure our security.

In the 1970s a new perspective was introduced to the discussion with the
rise of a so-called ‘new international division of labour’. David
Ricardo, appealing to the doctrine of comparative advantage, had long
ago insisted on the benefits in efficiency to be gained from
specialisation within and trade between countries. The specialisations
partly depended on natural factors (it is no more possible to grow
bananas and coffee in Canada than it is possible to mine copper or
extract oil where there is none). But they also derived from social
features such as labour skills, institutional arrangements, political
systems and class configurations, along with the brute facts of colonial
and neocolonial plunder and geopolitical and military power.

But there is no question that after 1970 or so the global map of the
international division of labour underwent a dramatic set of mutations.
The industrial districts that had been the heartlands of capital’s
global dominance after 1850 were disrupted and dismantled. Productive
capital began to move offshore and the factories of Japan, South Korea,
Singapore, Taiwan and then, after 1980, even more spectacularly, China
joined the new centres of factory labour in Mexico, Bangladesh, Turkey
and many other parts of the world. The West became broadly
deindustrialised, while the East and the global South became centres for
industrial value production alongside their more traditional role of
primary commodity producers and extractors of resources for the
industrialising world. The curious feature of these mutations is that
industrialisation, which had always been a sure pathway to rising per
capita incomes in the past, was now in some instances, such as that of
Bangladesh, more associated with the perpetuation of poverty than with
the turn to affluence. The same was true for those countries that rose
to prominence because of their natural resources in oil or mining. They
were plagued by the so-called ‘resource curse’ in which rents and
royalties were hijacked by an elite, leaving the mass of the population
in abject poverty (Venezuela before Chávez being a prime example). The
West became more and more focused on rent extraction through the
development of finance, insurance and real estate, alongside a
consolidating regime of intellectual property rights, cultural products
and corporate monopolies (like Apple, Monsanto, the big energy
companies, pharmaceuticals etc.). Knowledge-based activities that drew
upon a labour force trained in what Robert Reich calls ‘symbolic labor’
(as opposed to manual labour) also became more central.³ As all these
changes occurred, so there seemed to be a slow tectonic shift in the
power relations and geopolitical configuration of the global economy.
The flow of wealth from East to West that had prevailed for some two
centuries was reversed and China increasingly became the dynamic centre
of a global capitalism as the West, after the financial crash of 2008,
lost much of its momentum.

So wherein lie the central contradictions in all of this? Plainly, the
reversal of wealth flows and the reconfiguration of geopolitical powers
pose incidental dangers for global conflicts that were not there before.
While these conflicts are rooted in economic conditions and have
significant ramifications for those conditions, I do not subscribe to
the view that economic and military conflicts arise out of the
contradictions of capital as such. The degrees of autonomy that exist in
how the territorial logic of state power works within the global state
system are far too loosely arranged for any simple economic determinism
to work. A major conflagration in the Middle East, for example, would
undoubtedly be rooted in the facts of oil production and the different
geopolitical and geo-economic interests that cluster around the
exploitation of this key global resource, and it certainly could have a
huge economic impact (as was the case with the oil embargo of 1973). But
it would be wrong to infer from this that the contradictions of capital
are in themselves a root cause of any such conflict.

To be sure, also, the increasing complexity in the division of labour
opens up new vulnerabilities. Small disruptions in a supply chain can
have very large consequences. A strike in a key car-parts factory in one
region of the world can bring the whole production system to a halt
everywhere. But it can also be more plausibly argued that the increasing
complexity and geographical proliferation of ties within a global
division of labour provide far stronger insurance against local
calamities. In the pre-capitalist past, a failure of the grain harvest
in Russia would mean local famine and starvation, but there is now a
world market in grains that can be drawn upon to compensate for local
failure. There are no technical reasons for local famines in our times
precisely because of the way the global division of labour works. When
famines do occur (as, sadly, they too often do), it is invariably due to
social and political causes. The last great famine in China, which may
have killed some 20 million people at the time of the ‘great leap
forward’, occurred precisely because China was then by political choice
isolated from the world market. Such an event could not now happen in
China. This should be a salutary lesson for all those who place their
anti-capitalist faith on the prospects for local food sovereignty, local
self-sufficiency and decoupling from the global economy. Freeing
ourselves from the chains of an international division of labour
organised for the benefit of capital and the imperialist powers is one
thing, but decoupling from the world market in the name of
anti-globalisation is a potentially suicidal alternative.

The central contradiction in capital’s use of the division of labour is
not technical but social and political. It is summed up in one word:
_alienation_. The undoubted and astonishing gains in productivity,
output and profitability that capital achieves by virtue of its
organisation of both the detail and the social division of labour come
at the cost of the mental, emotional and physical well-being of the
workers in its employ. The worker, Marx for one suggests, is typically
reduced to a ‘fragment of a man’ by virtue of his or her attachment to a
fixed position within an increasingly complex division of labour.
Workers are isolated and individualised, alienated from each other by
competition, alienated from a sensual relation to nature (from both
their own nature as passionate and sensuous human beings and that of the
external world). To the degree that intelligence is increasingly
incorporated into machines, so the unity between mental and manual
aspects of labouring is broken. Workers are deprived of mental
challenges or creative possibilities. They become mere machine
operators, appendages of the machines rather than masters of their fates
and fortunes. The loss of any sense of wholeness or personal authorship
diminishes emotional satisfactions. All creativity, spontaneity and
charm go out of the work. The activity of working for capital becomes,
in short, empty and meaningless. And human beings cannot live in a world
devoid of all meaning.

Sentiments of this sort about the human condition under the rule of
capital are not unique to Marx. Similar ideas are to be found in the
writings of Weber, Durkheim and Tönnies. Even Adam Smith, the great
champion of the division of labour and celebrator of its contribution to
human efficiency, productivity and growth, worried that the assignment
of workers to a single task within a complex division of labour was
likely to condemn the worker to ignorance and stupidity. Later
commentators like Frederick Taylor, less concerned than Smith with
‘moral sentiments’, were less worried: it would be perfectly fine with
him if all workers acted like trained gorillas rather than passionate
human beings. Capitalists too, as the novelist Charles Dickens noted,
liked to think of their workers as ‘hands’ only, preferring to forget
they had stomachs and brains.

But, said the more perceptive nineteenth-century critics, if this is how
people live their lives at work, then how on earth can they think
differently when they come home at night? How might it be possible to
build a sense of moral community or of social solidarity, of collective
and meaningful ways of belonging and living that are untainted by the
brutality, ignorance and stupidity that envelops labourers at work? How,
above all, are workers supposed to develop any sense of their mastery
over their own fates and fortunes when they depend so deeply upon a
multitude of distant, unknown and in many respects unknowable people who
put breakfast on their table every day?

The proliferation and increasing complexity in the division of labour
under capital leave little scope for personal development or
self-realisation on the part of the labourer. Our collective capacity to
explore freely our species potential as human beings appears blocked.
But even Marx, who is at his grimmest in describing the alienations that
arise out of capital’s use of divisions of labour, sees glimmers of
possibility in the conditions that capital’s division of labour
dictates. It is not, he suggests, all doom and gloom on the side of
labour and that in part for reasons that capital itself was bound to
furnish. Rapid evolutions in divisions of labour under the influence of
strong currents of technological change would require, he argued, a
flexible, adaptable and to some degree educated labour force. ‘That
monstrosity, the disposable working population held in reserve, in
misery, for the changing requirements of capitalist exploitation, must
be replaced by the individual man who is absolutely available for the
different kinds of labour required of him: the partially developed
individual, who is merely the bearer of one specialized social function,
must be replaced by the totally developed individual, for whom the
different social functions are different modes of activity he takes up
in turn.’⁴ For this purpose capital would require an educated and
adaptable rather than specific kind of labour power and if labourers
must be educated who knows what this ‘totally developed individual’
might read and what political ideas he or she might get into their
heads? The insertion of the educational clauses into the English Factory
Act of 1864 was clear evidence for Marx of the need for the state to
step in and on capital’s behalf ensure that some moves were made towards
the education of the ‘totally developed individual’. Similarly, while
the abuses of women’s employment in the Industrial Revolution were easy
to spot and dwell upon, Marx also saw progressive possibilities in the
long run for the construction of a ‘a new and higher form’ of family
life and of gender relations on the basis of what capital both offered
and required of women in the workplace.

Within this formulation lies the question, of course, of what it is that
a ‘totally developed individual’ might want or need to know and who is
going to teach it to him or her. This is a question that is central to
the field of social reproduction, which we will consider shortly. But it
is a problem that demands at least a mention here. From the standpoint
of capital, labourers will need to know only that which is necessary to
follow instructions and do their job within a division of labour that
capital devises. But once labourers can read, then the danger is that
they will read and dream and even act upon all sorts of ideas culled
from an immense variety of sources. For this reason ideological controls
upon the flow of knowledge and of information become essential, along
with schooling in the right ideas supportive of capital and its
requirements for reproduction. But it is hard, if not impossible, for
the educated and totally developed individual not to wonder about the
nature of the totality of a human society in which their own activity of
labouring is but a minuscule part and what it might mean to be human in
a world of such fragmentation and partitioning as to make it hard to
distil any direct sense of the meaning of a life. I suspect it was for
this reason that even capital allowed that a mild dose of humanist
education in literature and the arts, in cultural understandings and
religious and moral sentiments might provide an antidote to the
anxieties generated from loss of meaning at work. The fragmentations and
divisions of labour necessary to the ever-expanding diversity of
occupational niches offered up by capital pose serious psychological
problems. But what is so stunning about the neoliberal era is how even
this mild concession to human needs has been contemptuously thrust aside
in the name of a supposedly necessary austerity. State subsidies to
cultural activities are cynically dismantled, leaving the financial
support for all such activities to the self-serving philanthropy of the
rich or the equally self-serving sponsorship of the corporations.
Culture sponsored by IBM, BP, Exxon and the like becomes the name of the
cultural game.

It also turns out that the labourers themselves, as inherently
passionate and sociable human beings, have something to say not only
about their objective situation but also about their own subjective
state of mind. The objective conditions of alienation can, even without
capital’s help, be turned around by labourers themselves as they grasp
opportunities to humanise labour processes and their general conditions
of employment through the struggles they engage in. They may demand and
in some instances even be accorded respect by their employers at the
same time as they are objectively exploited. Subjectively, the forms of
social bonding and solidarity necessary for survival down in the mines
or around the steel furnaces are translated into pride in a dangerous
and difficult job well done. Community solidarities mirror such
sentiments and help counter the individualistic isolation that
free-market processes tend to emphasise. It is possible even under the
iron rule of capital that workers can take pride in their work and their
role and assume an identity as a worker of a certain sort. They patently
do ask, just as much as anyone else, what the meaning of the kind of
life to which they are condemned might be and who it is that is in
charge of an evolutionary process that either casts them aside into the
ranks of the unemployed as disposable beings or offers them a job title
that sounds so weird as to be as incomprehensible as it is patently
meaningless. Workers employed by capital do not have to feel totally
alienated. But when meaningful jobs disappear, then the clear sense of
being exploited is dangerously supplemented by a growing sense of total
alienation as to their meaningless position in a make-work world.

This does not imply that the balance between alienation on the one hand
and coping and compromise on the other is fixed. In the advanced
capitalist countries, such as the United States, Britain, Germany,
Canada, Japan and Singapore, the trends in the division of labour have
favoured the production of an educated workforce capable of engaging
flexibly in a wide range of different labour processes. This, coupled
with a long history of struggle over the rights of labour and a
multitude of fights against the alienations visited upon them by
capital, has created a situation in which a significant proportion of
the workforce in these countries is highly trained in at least
elementary skills and if not handsomely at least comfortably
remunerated. By way of contrast, the labour conditions in the clothing
factories in Bangladesh, the electronics factories of southern China,
the _maquila_ factories strung along the Mexican border or the chemical
complexes in Indonesia are much closer to those with which Marx was so
familiar. We could insert contemporary accounts of labour conditions in
and around these factories that would not seem out of place in
_Capital_.

The transformations in work and social life wrought by the neoliberal
counter-revolution that has gathered pace throughout the advanced
capitalist world since the late 1970s has had devastating effects on
large segments of the population that have been left behind and rendered
disposable and dispensable by a combination of technological changes and
offshoring. Lost in a world of long-term unemployment and decay of
social infrastructures and loss of communal solidarities, large segments
of the population are deeply alienated, largely given to passive
resentments punctuated by occasional eruptions of sometimes violent and
seemingly irrational protest. All it will take is for the volcanic
protests from the Swedish suburbs to Istanbul and São Paulo to coalesce
to reveal the vast magma of alienation bubbling underneath. Capital will
then be confronted with a political crisis that will be almost
impossible to manage without draconian autocratic repressions that will
in turn exacerbate rather than assuage the discontent. Uneven
geographical developments in the division of labour and the parallel
increase in social inequality in life chances are exacerbating that
sense of alienation, which, if it becomes active rather than passive,
will surely pose a major threat to the reproduction of capital as it is
currently constituted. Society will then have to face the stark choice
between an impossible reform and an improbable revolution.


Contradiction 10


Monopoly and Competition: Centralisation and Decentralisation

Read any economics text or popular defence of capitalism and the word
‘competition’ will almost certainly very soon crop up. In popular
defences as well as in more serious theoretical works, one of the great
success stories of capitalism is that it supposedly takes the natural
proclivity of human beings to compete, unleashes it from social
constraints and harnesses it through the market to produce a dynamic and
progressive social system that can function for the benefit of all.
Monopoly power (of the sort that Google, Microsoft and Amazon wield
these days) and its cognates like oligopoly (of the sort that the ‘Seven
Sisters’ major global oil companies possess) and monopsony (the power
that Walmart and Apple exert over their suppliers) all tend to be
presented (if they are mentioned at all) as aberrations, as unfortunate
departures from a state of happy equilibrium that should be achieved in
a purely competitive market.

This biased view – for such I maintain it is – is supported by the
existence of anti-trust and anti-monopoly legislation and commissions
which proclaim how bad monopolies are and from time to time set out to
break them up in order to protect the public from their negative
effects. At the beginning of the twentieth century, for example, a wave
of ‘trust-busting’ led by the indomitable figure of Teddy Roosevelt
occurred in the USA. In the 1980s the break-up of AT&T’s monopoly in
telecommunications was mandated in the USA and now in both Europe and
North America questions are being asked concerning the excessive market
power of Google, Microsoft and Amazon. In the case of so-called ‘natural
monopolies’ (mainly public utilities and transport links like canals and
railways, which cannot be organised competitively) Adam Smith advised
government regulation to prevent price gouging. The stated aim of public
policy is to prevent monopoly pricing and to ensure the benefits of
innovation, rising productivity and low prices that supposedly derive
from inter-capitalist competition. The maintenance of a competitive
environment through state action is generally touted as an essential
policy stance for any healthy capitalist economy. In particular,
achieving a competitive position in international trade is frequently
cited as a major goal of public policies. If only a pure and perfect
competitive market could be created, free of the distortions of monopoly
power, then all, it is said, would be well.

This amazingly influential story has held sway for more than two
centuries, ever since Adam Smith articulated it so persuasively and
brilliantly in _The Wealth of Nations_. It constitutes _the_ founding
myth of liberal economic theory. The liberal political economists
mounted a crusade against state interventions in price-fixing markets
and against monopoly power from the late eighteenth century onwards.
Keynes did not depart too much from it. Even more surprisingly, it is
accepted as gospel in Marx’s _Capital_, though in Marx’s case the
reasoning runs that if Adam Smith’s utopian tale was correct, then
things would not turn out to be for the benefit of all: the result would
be to deepen the class divide of wealth and power and ensure that
capital would become ever more crisis-prone as well as powerful.

In the wake of the crisis of 2007–9 it became very difficult for
economists to stick with their customary storyline. The bankers in
pursuit of their individual interests plainly did not contribute to the
general welfare and in the USA the Federal Reserve bailed out the banks
but not the people. This has now led to an admission that monopoly power
is more than an aberration but a systemic problem that arises out of
what economists refer to as ‘rent seeking’. ‘To put it baldly,’ says the
economist Joseph Stiglitz, ‘there are two ways to become wealthy: to
create wealth or to take wealth away from others. The former adds to
society. The latter typically subtracts from it, for in the process of
taking it away, wealth gets destroyed.’¹ Rent seeking is nothing more
than a polite and rather neutral-sounding way of referring to what I
call ‘accumulation by dispossession’.

The virtue of Stiglitz’s somewhat truncated account of rent seeking or
accumulation by dispossession is that it recognises the seamless way in
which monopoly power in economic transactions is paralleled by monopoly
power in the political process. Take the case of the United States.
Regressive taxes and write-offs; regulatory capture (in which the foxes
are put in charge of the henhouse); acquiring or leasing state or
private assets at discount prices; inflated cost-plus contracts with
state agencies; writing legislation to protect or subsidise particular
interests (energy and agribusiness); buying political influence through
campaign contributions – these are all political practices that give a
free hand to big moneyed and monopolistic interests while permitting
them to plunder the public treasury at the expense of the taxpayer.
These political practices supplement conventional rent seeking in land
and property markets; rents on resources and on patents, licences and
intellectual property rights; plus excess returns due to monopoly
pricing. Then there are all the quasi-legal ways of gaining excess
profits. The creation of financial markets that lack any transparency or
in which adequate information is lacking creates a fog of
misunderstanding in which sharp practices are impossible to curb. Real
money has been made out of fictitious accounting (as Enron showed so
dramatically). When we add in the proliferation of abusive practices
such as predatory lending in housing markets that transferred billions
in asset values from the public to the financiers, abusive credit card
practices, hidden charges (on phone and medical bills), as well as
practices that skirt if not infringe the law, we end up with a vast
array of practices where big corporations and big moneyed interests add
to their wealth hand over fist even as the economy as a whole collapses
and then stagnates. As Stiglitz remarks, ‘Some of the most important
innovations in business in the last three decades have centered not on
making the economy more efficient but on how better to ensure monopoly
power or how better to circumvent government regulations intended to
align social returns and private rewards.’²

What is missing from Stiglitz’s account of rent seeking as a strategy
(though not from his account of the social outcomes) is the demolition
of a wide range of democratic rights, including economic rights to
pensions and health care, and free access to vital services such as
education, police and fire protection, and state-funded programmes (like
nutritional supplements and food stamps in the case of the USA) that
have hitherto helped to support low-income populations at an adequate
standard of living. The neoliberal assault on all these rights and
services is a form of dispossession that passes the public expenditure
savings on to the ‘not needy but greedy’ class of corporate heads and
billionaires. And all of this has been accomplished by resort to a
consolidated class power that monopolises both the economy and the
political process while monopolising most of the media, reducing a
supposed ‘free market in ideas’ to a series of factional squabbles about
trivia. And yet economic orthodoxy still insists that the free market is
the god in whom we must necessarily trust and monopoly an unfortunate
aberration that we could, if we put our minds to it, avoid.

The view I shall take here, however, is that _monopoly power is
foundational rather than aberrational to the functioning of capital and
that it exists in a contradictory unity with competition_. This is a
rather unusual stance to take and it goes well beyond Stiglitz’s
account, but there is good reason to believe that it is the correct
formulation. Not only does it accord with the singular fact that most
capitalists if given the choice prefer to be monopolists rather than
competitors and that they persistently go out of their way to try to
procure as much monopoly power as they possibly can. It also gets to the
core of the contradictory unity between competition and monopoly in the
history of capital.

So how are we to understand this contradictory unity? The most obvious
place to begin is at that point where the two are indistinguishable or,
to be more exact, where they are fused and the contradiction is latent
rather than antagonistic. This point lies in the nature of private
property, which confers a monopoly over the use of a commodity upon its
owner. The monopoly power inherent in private property forms the basis
for exchange and by extension for competition. This may seem elemental,
trivial even, but it becomes far less so when it is recognised that the
class power of capital rests entirely on the assemblage of all of these
individual monopolistic property rights into a social order where the
capitalist class can be defined vis-à-vis labour by its _collective
monopoly over the means of production (or, in its updated version, the
means of financing)_. What is lacking in the usual discussion of
monopoly is the concept and the reality of _class_ monopoly power (the
collective power of capital), including class monopoly rents, as applied
to both economic and political processes.

The role of the standard story in which competition features so large
and monopoly not at all then becomes clearer. It obscures the monopoly
basis of class power in private property and conveniently evades
questions of class power and class struggle (as is the case in almost
all economics textbooks). Capital is ideally construed as a wondrous
series of molecular and competitive collisions of individual capitalists
moving freely and hunting for profitable opportunities within a chaotic
sea of economic activity. The reality of the international competition
that is touted as so beneficial to all is that it exerts a downward
pressure on wages to the benefit of capital!

Unlike the case of technological change more generally, which can
plausibly be depicted as progressive and irreversible, the balance
between monopoly and competition oscillates erratically back and forth.
It sometimes seems cyclical over time rather than unidirectional and is
subject to the political whims and leanings of state management and
intervention. Marx thought that the end point of competition was bound
to be monopoly power and that there might be distinctive laws governing
the centralisation of capital, but he did not elaborate. Lenin famously
saw capital moving into a new phase of monopoly power associated with
imperialism at the turn of the twentieth century when the big industrial
cartels combined with finance capital to dominate the leading national
economies (these were the trusts that Teddy Roosevelt strove to break
up). This view re-emerged in the 1960s with Paul Baran and Paul Sweezy’s
book _Monopoly Capitalism_ in the United States and in the work of
various theoreticians of communist parties in Europe.³ The rising power
of monopolies was again associated with strong currents of a centralised
imperialism. In the 1960s it was the large corporations (such as the big
three car manufacturers in Detroit or state-run enterprises in Europe)
that dominated national markets and were thought to exercise excessive
monopoly power. It was the large corporations, like United Fruit in
Central America or ITT in Chile, that exercised monopoly power
internationally and stood behind coups and the military regimes like
that in Chile that did the bidding of the imperialist powers.

Capital oscillates, as Giovanni Arrighi pointed out, between the two
extremes of the supposedly ruinous effects of unregulated competition
and the excessive centralising powers of monopolies and oligopolies.⁴
The crisis of the 1970s (that on the surface exhibited a peculiar
combination of stagnation and inflation) was widely interpreted as a
typical crisis of monopoly capital, whereas the deflationary crisis of
the 1930s, it can be said, was produced by ruinous competition. The
state of the contradictory unity between monopoly and competition at any
one historical phase has to be established, not presumed. While the
neoliberal turn that began in the 1970s opened up new forms of
international competition though globalisation, the current situation in
many sectors of the economy (pharmaceuticals, oil, airlines,
agribusiness, banking, software, the media and social media in
particular, and even box retailing) suggests strong tendencies towards
oligopoly if not monopoly. It is, perhaps, testimony to the moving
character of this contradiction that a degree of monopoly power (such as
that exercised by Google) is now deemed in certain circles a worthy
departure from a state of pure competition. It allows for rational
calculation, standardisation and advance planning rather than the chaos
of unstable market coordinations in an uncertain world. On the other
hand, Google’s abuse of its monopoly position (allowing the National
Security Administration access to its data on private individuals)
illustrates the negative potentialities that go with such a
concentration of power.

The example of private property as monopoly power is particularly
instructive in the case of land and property ownership. What are
monopolised are not only the land and the property but a unique spatial
location. No one else can put their factory down where mine is already
located. An advantageous location (with privileged access to transport
links, resources or markets) gives me a certain monopoly power in
competition with others. The result, conventional economists ultimately
had to concede when forced to study the matter, was a peculiar kind of
competition called ‘monopolistic competition’. The term is apt since it
describes a condition in which all economic activity is competitively
grounded in particular spaces with unique qualities. Naturally, this
form of competition is treated as a footnote in economic theory rather
than as basic to economic life, even though all productive economic
activity is ultimately grounded in space. Standard economic thinking
prefers a model in which all economic activity occurs on the head of a
pin and no monopoly due to spatial location exists. Differential spatial
qualities – more fertile land, better-quality resources, superior
locational advantages – do not apparently matter. Nor does the
perpetually changing structure of spatial relations primarily brought
about by infrastructural investments in things like transport systems.

These absences have serious consequences for understanding how the
contradictory unity of competition and monopoly works. It is often
presumed, for example, that multiple small enterprises producing a
similar product indicate a state of intense competition. This is not the
case under certain spatial conditions. Two bakeries 300 yards apart
might suggest intense competition. But if there is a deep and
fast-flowing river between them, then each baker will have monopoly
power on their side of the river. This monopoly power will disappear if
the king builds a bridge across the river, but it will then be
reinstated if a local lord imposes a steep toll on the bridge or if the
river becomes a political boundary and stiff tariffs on bread are placed
upon commerce across it. For this reason, the eighteenth-century
political economists waged a campaign against tolls and tariffs,
understanding that they were a hindrance to competition. The global
regime of free trade sought by the USA after 1945 and culminating in the
World Trade Organization agreements is a continuation of this policy.

But the role of transport costs as a form of ‘protection’ for local
monopolies has long been diminishing. The reduction of these costs has
been crucial to capital’s history. Containerisation from the 1960s
onwards played a vital role in changing the geographical range of
competition, as did reductions in political barriers to trade. The US
car industry, with its big three companies located in Detroit, appeared
to constitute an all-powerful oligopoly in the 1960s, but by the 1980s
its power had been undermined by foreign competition from West Germany
and Japan as the spatial conditions of trade relations changed
dramatically both physically and politically. The 1980s saw the advent
of the global car as parts could be produced all over the world and
merely assembled somewhere like Detroit. The advent of fierce
international competition plus automation left Detroit a wasteland. The
history of the brewing trade is another of my favourite examples. Highly
localised in the eighteenth century, it became regionalised thanks to
the railways in the mid nineteenth century, before going national in the
1960s and global, thanks to containerisation, in the 1980s.

The field of monopolistic competition has clearly been changing and, as
in the case of uneven geographical development, the spatial and
geographical organisation of production, distribution and consumption is
itself a way of orchestrating the contradictory relation between
monopoly and competition. I now eat vegetables from California in Paris
and drink imported beers from all over the world in Pittsburgh. As
spatial barriers diminished through the capitalist penchant for ‘the
annihilation of space through time’, many local industries and services
lost their local protections and monopoly privileges. They were forced
into competition with producers in other locations, at first relatively
close by, but then much further away.

Capitalists should presumably welcome such a restoration of competition.
But as has already been noted, it is a peculiar fact that most
capitalists, given the choice, prefer to be monopolists. They have
therefore had to find other ways to construct and preserve a
much-coveted monopoly position.

The obvious answer is to centralise capital in mega-corporations or to
set up looser alliances (as in airlines and cars) that dominate markets.
And we have seen plenty of that. The second path is to secure ever more
firmly the monopoly rights of private property through international
commercial laws that regulate all global trade. Patents and so-called
‘intellectual property rights’ have consequently become a major field of
struggle through which monopoly powers more generally get asserted. The
pharmaceutical industry, to take a paradigmatic example, has acquired
extraordinary monopoly powers in part through massive centralisations of
capital and in part through the protection of patents and licensing
agreements. And it is hungrily pursuing even more monopoly powers as it
seeks to establish property rights over genetic materials of all sorts
(including those of rare plants in tropical rainforests traditionally
collected by indigenous inhabitants). The third path is by ‘name
branding’ so that a monopoly price can be charged for a shoe with a
swoosh on it or a wine with a certain château name on the label.

As monopoly privileges from one source diminish so we witness a variety
of attempts to preserve and assemble them by other means. There continue
to be, however, some spatially circumscribed markets that facilitate
monopoly pricing for certain activities: a hip operation in Belgium
costs $13,360 (including the round-trip airfare from the USA) while an
identical procedure in the USA costs over $78,000! There is, obviously,
a lot of monopoly pricing going on in the US case relative to that of
Belgium (almost certainly due to different state regulatory policies).
Personal services of this sort have remained partially immune from
spatial competition in spite of the rise of medical tourism and the
outsourcing of many services to call centres like those in India. These
protected markets may crumble, however, in the face of the application
of artificial intelligence.

Capital is, we can conclude, in love with monopoly. It prefers the
certainties, the quiet life and the possibility of leisurely and
cautious changes that go with a monopolistic style of working and living
outside of the rough and tumble of competition. For this reason also,
capital loves commodities that are unique, so particular that they can
command a monopoly price. Capital goes out of its way to appropriate
such commodities and to foster their production, frequently garbing them
in the raiments of pure aesthetic pleasure. The capitalist class builds
an art market as an investment sphere where monopoly pricing reigns
supreme, just as it does with investments in professional sports like
football, hockey and baseball. It even commodifies, if it can, the
unique qualities of nature and gives them monetary value subject to the
regime of private property. As the anarchist geographer Elisée Reclus
complained as long ago as 1866:

At the seashore, many of the most picturesque cliffs and charming
beaches are snatched up either by covetous landlords or by speculators
who appreciate the beauties of nature in the spirit of a money changer
appraising a gold ingot … Each natural curiosity, be it rock, grotto,
waterfall, or the fissure of a glacier – everything, even the sound of
an echo – can become individual property. The entrepreneurs lease
waterfalls and enclose them with wooden fences to prevent non-paying
travelers from gazing at the turbulent waters. Then, through a deluge of
advertising, the light that plays about the scattering droplets and the
puffs of wind unfurling curtains of mist are transformed into the
resounding jingle of silver.⁵

The same applies to unique cultural objects and cultural and historical
traditions. The commodification of history, culture and tradition may
appear obnoxious but it underpins a vast tourist trade in which
authenticity and uniqueness are highly valued, even as they are subject
to the hegemony of market valuations. And more significant is the
systematic branding of many consumer commodities as unique and special
(even when such claims are dubious at best) so as to allow a monopoly
price to be put upon them. The items or effects produced cannot be so
unique or special as to be entirely outside of the monetary calculus of
course, so even Picassos, archaeological artefacts and aboriginal art
objects must have their price. For more common commodities, the aim is
to set one brand apart as a superior toothpaste, shampoo or car. The
idea is to use product differentiation as a way to secure a monopoly
price. The reputation and the public image of a commodity becomes just
as if not more important than its material use value. From this arises
the immense importance of advertising, which is nothing more than an
industry struggling to squeeze monopoly prices out of an otherwise
competitive situation. Nearly one-sixth of the jobs in the United States
are now in advertising or selling, an industry that is dedicated to the
production of monopoly rents through the production of image and
reputation of particular commodities.

There is an interesting geographical version of this same phenomenon.
Cities like Barcelona, Istanbul, New York and Melbourne get branded, for
example, as tourist destinations or as hubs for business activities by
virtue of their unique characteristics and special cultural qualities.
If there are no particularly unique features to hand, then hire some
famous architect, like Frank Gehry, to build a signature building (like
the Guggenheim Museum in Bilbao) to fill the gap.⁶ History, culture,
uniqueness and authenticity are everywhere commodified and sold to
tourists, prospective entrepreneurs and corporate heads alike, yielding
monopoly rents to landed interests, property developers and speculators.
The role of the class monopoly rent that is then gained from rising land
values and property prices in cities like New York, Hong Kong, Shanghai,
London and Barcelona is hugely important for capital in general. The
gentrification process that is then unleashed is, worldwide, a critical
part of an economy based as much on accumulation through dispossession
as on creating wealth through new urban investments.

In cultivating monopoly power, capital realises far-reaching control
over production and marketing. It can stabilise the business environment
to allow for rational calculation and long-term planning, the reduction
of risk and uncertainty. The ‘visible hand’ of the corporation, as
Alfred Chandler terms it, has been and continues to be just as important
to capitalist history as Adam Smith’s ‘invisible hand’.⁷ The ‘heavy
hand’ of state power exercised broadly in support of capital also plays
its part.

Monopoly power is strongly associated with the centralisation of
capital. On the other hand competition generally entails
decentralisation. It is useful here to consider this cognate relation
between the centralisation and decentralisation of political-economic
activities as a subset of the contradictory unity between monopoly and
competition. In this instance it is also vital to see the relation
between centralisation and decentralisation in terms of a contradictory
unity. It has often proved the case, for example, that decentralisation
is one of the best means to preserve highly centralised power, because
it masks the nature of this centralised power behind a veneer of
individual liberty and freedom. In a way this was what Adam Smith was
advocating: a centralised state could amass far greater wealth and
economic power by liberating decentralised individualised market
freedoms. This is something that the Chinese state has recognised over
the last few decades. In this case the decentralisation has been
political (the decentralisation of powers to regions, cities down to
townships and villages) as well as economic (the liberation of state and
village enterprises and the banking system in both wealth creation and
rent seeking). Giovanni Arrighi’s book _Adam Smith in Beijing_ dwells on
this point at length.⁸ But in this instance the crude assumption that
decentralisation is inherently more democratic has to be seriously
questioned, since there is no sign of the centralised Communist Party
relinquishing any of its powers.

There are two ways in which we can think about the contradictory unity
between decentralisation and centralisation in political-economic life.
The first is sectoral. It focuses primarily on the power of associated
capitals – the visible hand of the capitalist corporation in particular
– and the massing of money capital as ‘the common capital of the class’
(in Marx’s words), particularly within the credit and financial system.⁹
The latter cannot function, however, without the singular backing of
state power. The ‘state–finance nexus’ (the unity of the Central Bank
and the Treasury Department in the case of the USA) sits at the apex of
this structure. It is endowed with supreme monopoly power designed to
support the banking industry and the financial system at the expense, if
necessary, of all else, including the people. It is backed ideologically
by the innumerable think tanks (the Heritage Foundation, the Manhattan
Institute, the Cato Institute, the Ohlin Foundation) that promote
pro-capitalist and right-wing views. Critiques of this vast
centralisation of class monopoly power abound on both left and far-right
wings of the political spectrum. That the Federal Reserve and the IMF
have been totally dedicated to the protection of the class monopoly
power of a financial oligarchy is now undeniable. Although the evidence
for this is overwhelming, the mask such think tanks and the media
construct around these institutions as the grand protectors of
individual market freedoms goes a considerable way to successfully
hiding their class character from the general public. The organisation
of ‘the common capital of the class’ through the centralisation of the
financial system takes us back to the central contradictions in the
money form.

The second sphere in which the powerful forces of centralisation and
decentralisation collide is geographical, resulting in uneven
geographical development and the projection of economic, political and
ultimately military power of class alliances in one space upon those in
another. Hence the inner relation between monopoly, centralisation,
imperialism and neocolonialism. We will probe further into this angle
when we consider uneven geographical development explicitly.

The two ways in which the decentralising and centralising tendencies of
capital play out are not independent of each other. The massing of
centralised financial powers in the major centres of global finance (New
York, London, Tokyo, Shanghai, Frankfurt, São Paulo etc.) is of
significance, as is the long history of the flourishing of innovations
in new territories like Silicon Valley, Bavaria, the so-called ‘Third
Italy’ in the 1980s and so on, where the seeming liberty of manoeuvre
and lack of regulatory control allow things to happen that might
otherwise get constrained by stifling and dominant powers of state and
corporate capital grown obese. So pervasive and palpable has this
tension been that policymakers now seek to capture the possibilities of
knowledge-based, cultural and creative economies by centralised
initiatives that support the decentralisation and deregulation of
economic and political power. This is what the central state’s creation
of ‘special economic zones’ in China and India is supposed to be about.
Elsewhere, development is left to local initiatives on the part of
increasingly entrepreneurial local state or regional metropolitan
apparatuses. The hope is to replicate the conditions that sparked the
innovations behind the digital revolution and the rise of the so-called
‘new economy’ of the 1990s, which, in spite of the way it crashed and
burned at the close of the century, left in its wake a radical
reordering of capitalist technologies. This is what the geographical
concentration of venture capital in regions such as Silicon Valley is
supposed to accomplish. While the chequered success of such policies
should give us pause, this is, nevertheless, a fine illustration of how
capital seizes upon certain contradictions, like that between
centralisation and decentralisation or between monopoly and competition,
and turns them to its own advantage.

So what, then, are the political implications of these findings for
anti-capitalist politics? We first must recognise how successful capital
has generally been in managing the contradictions between monopoly and
competition, as well as between centralisation and decentralisation, to
its own advantage, even as it uses crises to do so. It is, I think,
clear that no feasible alternative future social order will be able to
abolish these contradictions. The only interesting question is how to
work with them. But we should beware the trap of thinking of the
oppositions as being independent rather than contradictory unities. It
is false to presume, for example, that decentralisation is democratic
and centralisation is not. By pursuing the chimera of pure
decentralisation (as some on the left are these days wont to do), there
is a strong possibility of opening the way to a hidden centralised
monopoly control. By pursuing the other chimera of totally rationalised
centralised control, others on the left point the way to an unacceptable
and totalitarian stagnation. Capital has organically arrived at a way to
balance and rebalance the tendencies towards a monopolistic
centralisation and decentralised competition through the crises that
arise out of its imbalances.

It has also learned something else of considerable importance. Capital
changes the scale at which it operates in such a way as to locate powers
and influence at that scale which are most advantageous for the
reproduction of its own powers. When, in the United States, the cities
and the states were too strong in the first half of the twentieth
century, capital looked mainly to the federal level for support, but by
the end of the 1960s when the federal government was proving too
interventionist and prone to regulation, capital gradually moved to
support state rights and it is in the states that the Republican Party
is now most fiercely waging its populist pro-capitalist agenda. In this
regard the anti-capitalist left has much to learn from capital at the
same time as it combats it. Interestingly, much of the anti-capitalist
as opposed to social democratic left prefers in these times to wage its
war at the micro scale, where autonomista and anarchist formulations and
solutions are most effective, leaving the macro level almost bare of
oppositional powers. An inordinate fear of centralisation and of
monopolisation predominates in such a way as to hamstring
anti-capitalist opposition. The dialectical but contradictory relation
between monopoly and competition cannot be effectively mobilised for
anti-capitalist struggle.


Contradiction 11


Uneven Geographical Developments and the Production of Space

Capital strives to produce a geographical landscape favourable to its
own reproduction and subsequent evolution. There is nothing odd or
unnatural about this: after all, ants do it, beavers do it, so why
shouldn’t capital do it? The geographical landscape of capitalism is,
however, rendered perpetually unstable by various technical, economic,
social and political pressures operating in a world of immensely
changeable natural variation. Capital must perforce adapt to this wildly
evolving world. But capital also has a key role in shaping that world.

The contradictions between capital and labour, competition and monopoly,
private property and the state, centralisation and decentralisation,
fixity and motion, dynamism and inertia, poverty and wealth, as well as
between different scales of activity, are all writ large and given
material form in the geographical landscape. Among all these diverse
forces, though, priority has to be accorded to a combination of the
molecular processes of endless capital accumulation in space and time
(the daily ebb and flow of competitive entrepreneurial and corporate
activity engaging in the circulation and accumulation of capital) and
the attempt to organise the space of the landscape in some systematic
way through the exercise of state powers.

The geographical landscape that capital makes is not a mere passive
product. It evolves according to certain rough and ready rules which –
like those that govern the combinatorial evolution of technologies –
have their own autonomous but contradictory logic. How the landscape
evolves affects capital accumulation as well as how the contradictions
of capital and of capitalism are manifest in space, place and time. The
independent manner in which the geographical landscape evolves plays a
key role in crisis formation. Without uneven geographical development
and its contradictions, capital would long ago have ossified and fallen
into disarray. This is a key means by which capital periodically
reinvents itself.

Capital and the capitalist state play a leading role in producing the
spaces and places that ground capitalist activity. It takes a lot of
capital to build a railway, for example. If the railway is to be
profitable, then other capitals must use it, preferably for the lifetime
of the investment fixed in it. If this does not happen, then the railway
goes bankrupt and the capital invested in it is lost or at least
devalued. So capital needs to use the railway once it is built. But why
does capital need a railway?

Time is money for capital. Traversing space takes both time and money.
Economy of time and money is a key to profitability. A premium is
therefore placed on innovations – technical, organisational and
logistical – that reduce the costs and time of spatial movement. The
producers of new technologies are well aware of this. They concentrate a
lot of their autonomous effort upon developing new ways to reduce costs
or time of capital circulation. Technologies that accomplish these goals
will command a ready market. What Marx called the ‘annihilation of space
through time’ is one of the holy grails of capital’s endeavours.

Cost and time reductions can be accomplished in two ways. The first
entails continuous innovations in transport and communications
technologies. The history of such innovations under capitalism (from
canals to jet aircraft) has been outstanding. The impacts depend,
however, on the kind of capital being moved around. Money in its credit
form now flits around the world instantaneously. It was not always so.
Our own era is marked by the far superior mobility of money capital due
to information technologies. Commodities are generally less mobile.
There is a huge difference between, say, the live transmission of a
World Cup football match and lugging around bottled water, steel
girders, furniture or perishable items like soft fruit, hot pork pies,
milk and bread. Commodities are variably mobile depending upon their
qualities and transportability. Production, with some exceptions like
transportation itself, is the least mobile form of capital. It is
usually locked down in place for a time (in some instances, like
shipbuilding, the time may be considerable). But the sewing machines
used in sweatshop shirt production are more easily moved around than a
steel or car plant. The locational constraints in primary sectors like
agriculture, forestry, mining and fishing are very special for obvious
reasons.

Lower costs in transport and communications can facilitate dispersal and
decentralisation of activity across larger and larger geographical
spaces. The near-elimination of transport costs and times as a factor in
location decisions permits capital to explore differential profit
opportunities in widely disparate places. Divisions of labour within a
firm can be decentralised to different locations. Offshoring becomes
possible and the monopolistic element in competition is reduced.
Regional specialisations and divisions of labour become even more marked
because small differences in costs (such as local taxes) translate into
higher profits for capital.

New geographical patterns to production typically arise out of the
sharpened spatial competition facilitated by cheaper and more efficient
transport and communications. Start-ups in, say, South Korea – where
steel production is much cheaper because of lower-cost labour, easier
access to raw materials and markets, and the like – drive out the more
costly and the less efficient industries in older regions such as
Pittsburgh and Sheffield. In the car industry it was not only the
introduction of foreign competition that undermined Detroit, but also
the setting up of new plants in Tennessee and Alabama, where labour
costs were lower and trade union power weaker. In the nineteenth century
cheap food grains from North America inflicted severe damage on UK and
European agricultural interests. This happened because the newly minted
railways and steam ships greatly reduced the cost and time of movement
of agricultural commodities after 1850 or so, much as containerisation
did for world trade after 1970. Deindustrialisation (the nether side of
geographical expansion) has been going on for a very long time.

The second way to reduce the time and cost of movement is for
capitalists to locate so as to minimise their costs of procuring means
of production (including raw materials) and labour supplies and of
getting to market. What are called ‘agglomeration economies’ arise when
many different capitals cluster together (for example, the car parts and
tyre industries locate close to car plants). Different firms and
industries can share facilities, access to labour skills, information
and infrastructures. Positive benefits arise which all firms can take
advantage of (one firm trains workers that other firms can then hire
right away without having to train them first, for example). Labour is
likewise drawn to the opportunities of dynamic centres, even in the
absence of the forces that push them off the land. Urban agglomerations
are in effect constructed spatial environments favourable to
collectively sustaining particular sets of productive activities.

Agglomeration produces geographical centralisation. The molecular
processes of capital accumulation converge, as it were, on the
production of economic regions. The boundaries are always fuzzy and
porous, yet the interlocking flows within a territory produce enough
structured coherence to mark the geographical area off as somehow
distinctive. In the nineteenth century cotton meant Lancashire
(Manchester), wool meant Yorkshire (Leeds), stainless steel meant
Sheffield and metalworking meant Birmingham. Structured coherence
usually extends well beyond economic exchanges to encompass attitudes,
cultural values, beliefs and even religious and political affiliations.
The necessity to produce and maintain collective goods requires that
some system of governance be brought into existence and preferably
formalised into systems of administration within the region. If the
state did not already exist, then capital would have to create something
like it to facilitate and manage its own collective conditions of
production and consumption. Dominant classes and hegemonic class
alliances can form and lend a specific character to political as well as
to economic activity within the region.

Regional economies form a loosely connected mosaic of uneven
geographical development within which some regions tend to become richer
while poor regions get poorer. This happens because of what Gunnar
Myrdal calls circular and cumulative causation.¹ Advanced regions draw
new activity to themselves because of the vibrancy of their markets, the
greater strength of their physical and social infrastructures and the
ease with which they can procure their necessary means of production and
labour supplies. Resources exist (in the form of an increasing tax base)
to invest further in physical and social infrastructures (such as public
education) and these attract even more capital and labour to come to the
region. Transport routes are created that focus on the region because
this is where the traffic is. As a result, even more capital is
attracted. Other regions, by contrast, are underserved if not
increasingly bereft of activities. They get caught in a downward spiral
of depression and decay. The result is uneven regional concentrations of
wealth, power and influence.

There are, however, limits to continuous centralisation through
agglomeration. Overcrowding and rising pollution, administrative and
maintenance costs (rising tax rates and user fees) take a toll. Rising
local costs of living lead to wage demands that may ultimately make a
region uncompetitive. Labour may become better organised in its
struggles against exploitation because of its regional concentration.
Land and property prices escalate as a rentier class cashes in on their
command over increasingly scarce land. New York City and San Francisco
are dynamic but high-cost locations, while Detroit and Pittsburgh now
are not. Labour is better organised in Los Angeles now than it is in
Detroit (in the 1960s it was the other way round).

When local costs rise rapidly, capitalists look for other spaces in the
global economy to ply their trade. This is particularly so when new
technological and production mixes are emerging and labour struggles are
acute. From the late 1960s onwards, for example, Silicon Valley steadily
displaced Detroit as an epicentre of the US capitalist economy. Bavaria
likewise displaced the Ruhr in Germany and Tuscany displaced Turin in
Italy, while new global players like Singapore, Hong Kong, Taiwan, South
Korea and, eventually, China moved far ahead in the global stakes for
competitive pre-eminence in certain lines of production. These moves
generated crises of devaluation that reverberated throughout other
regions of the global economy. The Midwest ‘rust belt’ that was once the
heart of industrial capital in the USA contrasts with a rising ‘sun
belt’. Regional crises of employment and production typically signal
crucial moments when power shifts are occurring within the forces
producing the geographical landscape of capital. This, in turn, usually
signals a radical shift in the evolution of capital itself.

Capital must be able to withstand the shock of the destruction of the
old and stand ready to build a new geographical landscape on its ashes.
Surpluses of capital and labour must be available for this purpose.
Fortunately, capital, by its very nature, perpetually creates such
surpluses, often in the form of mass unemployment of labour and an
overaccumulation of capital. The absorption of these surpluses through
geographical expansion and spatial reorganisation helps resolve the
problem of surpluses lacking profitable outlets. Urbanisation and
regional development become autonomous spheres of capitalist activity,
requiring large investments (usually debt-financed) that take many years
to mature.

Capital typically turns to these avenues for the absorption of capital
and labour surpluses at times of crisis. State-funded infrastructural
projects are set in motion during crises to re-kindle economic growth.
The US government tried to mop up surplus capital and unemployed labour
in the 1930s by setting up future-oriented public works projects in
hitherto undeveloped locations. Some 8 million people were employed in
the WPA programmes in the 1930s in the United States. The Nazis built
the autobahns in Germany for similar reasons at the same time. The
Chinese, after the financial crash of 2008, spent billions on urban and
infrastructural projects to absorb surpluses of both capital and labour
in order to compensate for the crash in export markets. Whole new cities
were designed and built. The Chinese landscape has been radically and
dramatically transformed as a result.

In this way, capital develops what I call ‘spatio-temporal fixes’ to the
capital and labour surplus absorption problem.² ‘Fix’ here has a double
meaning. A certain portion of the total capital gets fixed literally and
physically in and on the land for a relatively long period of time. But
‘fix’ also refers metaphorically to how long-term investments in
geographical expansions provide a solution (a ‘fix’) for crises of
overaccumulation of capital. So how and when do these two meanings
collide?

The organisation of new territorial divisions of labour, of new resource
complexes and of new regions as dynamic spaces of capital accumulation
all provide new opportunities to generate profits and to absorb
surpluses of capital and labour. Such geographical expansions often
threaten, however, the values already fixed in place elsewhere. This
contradiction is inescapable. Either capital moves out and leaves behind
a trail of devastation and devaluation (for example, Detroit). Or it
stays put only to drown in the capital surpluses it inevitably produces
but cannot find profitable outlets for.

Resort to credit financing heightens this contradiction at the same time
as it purports to solve it. Credit makes territories vulnerable to flows
of speculative capital that can both stimulate and undermine capitalist
development. Territorial indebtedness became a global problem after 1980
or so, and many of the poorer countries (and even some major powers,
like Russia in 1998 and Argentina after 2001) found it impossible to
repay their debts. Many poor countries, like Ecuador and even Poland
(behind the Iron Curtain), were lured into becoming ‘sinks’ for surplus
capitals for which they were then held liable. The indebted country has
to bear the cost of any subsequent devaluation of capital while the
creditor country is protected. The resources of indebted countries can
then be plundered under the draconian rules of debt repayment. The
current case of Greece is a horrible example of this process carried to
extremes. The bondholders are prepared to rip to shreds and feed
relentlessly upon whole states that have been rash enough to fall into
their clutches.

The export of capital typically has longer-term effects relative to the
movement of ‘hot’ credit moneys. Surpluses of capital and labour are
sent elsewhere to set capital accumulation in motion in the new regional
space. Surpluses of British capital and labour generated in the
nineteenth century found their way to the United States and to the
settler colonies, like South Africa, Australia and Canada, creating new
and dynamic centres of accumulation which generated a demand for goods
from Britain.

Since it may take many years for capitalism to mature in these new
territories (if it ever does) to the point where they too begin to
produce surpluses of capital, the originating country can hope to
benefit from this process for a not inconsiderable period of time. This
is particularly the case with investments in railways, roads, ports,
dams and other infrastructures that mature slowly. But the rate of
return on these investments eventually depends upon the evolution of a
strong dynamic of accumulation in the receiving region. Britain lent to
the United States in this way during the nineteenth century. Much later,
the United States, via the Marshall Plan for Europe (West Germany in
particular) and Japan, clearly saw that its own economic security
(leaving aside the military aspect of the Cold War) rested on the active
revival of capitalist activity in these other spaces.

Contradictions arise because these new dynamic spaces of capital
accumulation ultimately generate surpluses and need to find ways to
absorb them through further geographical expansions. This can spark
geopolitical conflicts and tensions. In recent times we have witnessed
cascading and proliferating spatio-temporal fixes primarily throughout
East and South-East Asia. Surplus capital from Japan started to course
around the world in the 1970s in search of profitable outlets, followed
shortly thereafter by surplus capital from South Korea and then Taiwan
in the mid-1980s. While these cascading spatio-temporal fixes are
recorded as relationships between territories, they are in fact material
and social relations between regions within territories. The formal
territorial difficulties between Taiwan and mainland China appear
anachronistic beside the growing integration of the industrial regions
of Taipei and Shanghai.

Capital flows from time to time get redirected from one space to
another. The capitalist system remains relatively stable as a whole,
even though the parts experience periodic difficulties (such as
deindustrialisation here or partial devaluations there). The overall
effect of such interregional volatility is to temporarily reduce the
aggregate dangers of overaccumulation and devaluation even though
localised distress may be acute. The regional volatility experienced
since 1980 or so seems to have largely been of this type. At each step,
of course, the issue arises as to which will be the next space into
which capital can profitably flow and why and which will be the next
space to be abandoned and devalued. The general effect can be
misleading: since capital is always doing well somewhere, the illusion
arises that all will be well everywhere if we only readjust the form of
capital to that predominant in Japan and West Germany (the 1980s), the
United States (the 1990s) or China (after 2000). Capital never has to
address its systemic failings because it moves them around
geographically.

A second possible outcome, however, is increasingly fierce international
competition within the international division of labour as multiple
dynamic centres of capital accumulation compete on the world stage in
the midst of strong currents of overaccumulation (lack of markets for
realisation) or under conditions of competing scarcities for raw
materials and other key means of production. Since they cannot all
succeed, either the weakest succumb and fall into serious crises of
localised devaluation or geopolitical struggles arise between regions
and states. The latter take the form of trade wars, currency and
resource wars, with the ever-present danger of military confrontations
(of the sort that gave us two world wars between capitalist powers in
the twentieth century). In this case, the spatio-temporal fix takes on a
much more sinister meaning as it transmutes into the export of localised
and regional devaluations and destruction of capital (of the sort that
occurred on a massive scale in East and South-East Asia and in Russia in
1997–8). How and when this occurs will depend, however, just as much
upon the explicit forms of political action on the part of state powers
as it does upon the molecular processes of capital accumulation in space
and time. The dialectic between the territorial logic and the
capitalistic logic is then fully engaged.

So how does the relative spatial fixity and distinctive logic of
territorial power (as manifest in the state) fit with the fluid dynamics
of capital accumulation in space and time? Is this not the locus of an
acute and abiding contradiction for capital, perhaps the apogee of the
contradiction between fixity (the state) and motion (capital)? Recall:
‘In order for capital to circulate freely in space and time, physical
infrastructures and built environments must be created that are fixed in
space.’ The mass of all this fixed capital increases over time relative
to the capital that is continuously flowing. Capital has periodically to
break out of the constraints imposed by the world it has constructed. It
is in mortal danger of becoming sclerotic. The building of a
geographical landscape favourable to capital accumulation in one era
becomes, in short, a fetter upon accumulation in the next. Capital has
therefore to devalue much of the fixed capital in the existing
geographical landscape in order to build a wholly new landscape in a
different image. This sparks intense and destructive localised crises.
The most obvious contemporary example of such devaluation in the USA is
Detroit. But many older industrial cities in all the advanced capitalist
countries and beyond (even north China and Mumbai) have had to remake
themselves as their economic bases have been eroded by competition from
elsewhere. The principle here is this: capital creates a geographical
landscape that meets its needs at one point in time only to have to
destroy it at a later point in time to facilitate capital’s further
expansion and qualitative transformation. Capital unleashes the powers
of ‘creative destruction’ upon the land. Some factions benefit from the
creativity, while others suffer the brunt of the destruction.
Invariably, this involves a class disparity.

So where is state power in all of this and by what distinctive logic
does it intervene in processes of landscape formation? The state is a
bounded territorial entity formed under conditions that had little to do
with capital but which is a fundamental feature of the geographical
landscape. Within its territory it has a monopoly of the legitimate use
of violence, sovereignty over the law and the currency, and regulatory
authority over institutions (including private property), and it is
blessed with the power to tax and redistribute incomes and assets. It
organises structures of administration and governance that at the very
minimum address the collective needs of both capital and, more
diffusely, the state’s citizens. Among its sovereign powers perhaps the
most important is defining and conferring rights of citizenship under
the law upon its inhabitants and thereby introducing the category of
illegal alien or ‘_sans-papiers_’ into the equation. This creates a
separate population vulnerable to unthinkable and unrestricted
exploitation by capital. As a bounded entity, the question of how the
state’s borders were established and how they are patrolled in relation
to the movements of people, commodities and money becomes paramount. The
two spatialities of state and capital sit awkwardly with and frequently
contradict each other. This is very clear in the case, for example, of
migration policies.

The interests of the capitalist state are not the same as those of
capital. The state is not a simple thing and its various branches do not
always cohere, although key institutions within the state do typically
play a directly supportive role in the management of capital’s economy
(with treasury departments usually in alliance with central banks to
constitute the state–finance nexus). The governance of the state depends
upon the nature of its political system, which sometimes pretends to be
democratic and is often influenced by the dynamics of class and other
social struggles. The practices that constitute the exercise of state
powers are far from monolithic or even coherent, which means that the
state cannot be construed as a solid ‘thing’ exercising distinctive
powers. It is a bundle of practices and processes assembled together in
unbounded ways since the distinction between the state and civil society
(for example, in a field like education, health care or housing) is
highly porous. Capital is not the only interest to which the state must
respond and the pressures upon it come from a variety of interests.
Furthermore, the ruling ideology behind state interventions (usually
expressed as an economic and policy orthodoxy) can vary considerably.
There is, also, an interstate system. Relations among states can be
hostile or collaborative as the case may be, but there are always
geo-economic and geopolitical relations and conflicts that reflect the
state’s distinctive interests and lead state practices into forms of
action that may or may not be consistent with capital’s interests.

The logic that attaches to the territoriality of state power is very
different from the logic of capital. The state is, among other things,
interested in the accumulation of wealth and power on a territorial
basis and it was Adam Smith’s genius to advise and generally persuade
statesmen that the best way to do this was to unleash and rationalise
the forces of capital and the free market within its territory and open
its doors to free trade with others. The capitalist state is one that
broadly follows pro-business policies, albeit tempered by ruling
ideologies and the innumerable and divergent social pressures mobilised
through the organisation of its citizens. But it also seeks to
rationalise and use the forces of capital to support its own powers of
governmentality over potentially restive populations, all the while
enhancing its own wealth, power and standing within a highly competitive
interstate system. This rationality contrasts with that of capital,
which is primarily concerned with the private appropriation and
accumulation of social wealth. The constructed loyalty of citizens to
their states conflicts in principle with capital’s singular loyalty to
making money and nothing else.

The kind of rationality the state typically imposes is illustrated by
its urban and regional planning practices. These state interventions and
investments attempt to contain the otherwise chaotic consequences of
unregulated market development. The state imposes Cartesian structures
of administration, law, taxation and individual identification. The
technocratic and bureaucratic production of space in the name of a
supposedly capitalist modernity has been, however, the focus of virulent
critiques (most notably that of Henri Lefebvre³). What tends to be
produced is a soulless, rationalised geographical landscape against
which populations periodically revolt. But the application of state
powers to these purposes never did run smooth. They are all too easily
subverted, co-opted and corrupted by moneyed interests. Conversely, the
foundational interests of the state in, for example, the case of
national security can be subverted by capital and turned into a
permanent feeding trough for capitalist ambitions – hence the historical
role of the infamous ‘military–industrial complex’ in the development of
capital.

States can use their powers to orchestrate economic life not only
through their command over infrastructural investments but also through
their powers to create or reform basic institutions. When, for example,
local banking was supplanted by national banks in Britain and France in
the nineteenth century, the free flow of money capital across the
national space altered regional dynamics. More recently, the abolition
in the United States of restrictive local banking laws, followed by a
wave of takeovers and mergers of regional banks, changed the whole
investment climate in the country away from local and into a more open
and fluid construction of regional configurations. Reforms in the
organisation of international banking coupled with information
technologies have over the last forty years revolutionised the global
mobility of finance capital.

There has been a long-standing impulse towards the transformation of the
geographical scale at which capitalist activity gets defined. Just as
the coming of the railways and the telegraph in the nineteenth century
completely reorganised the scale and diversity of regional
specialisations, so the more recent round of innovations (everything
from jet transport, containerisation and the internet) has changed the
scales at which economic activity gets articulated. In the 1980s much
was made of the ‘global car’, with parts produced almost anywhere in the
world being assembled rather than produced at the final factory. This is
now normal practice in many lines of production so that labels like
‘made in the USA’ no longer make much sense. The corporate shift to the
global scale is far more emphatic now than it was in the past.

The sovereign powers of the state over capital and money flows have
definitively been eroded over the last few decades. This does not mean
the state is powerless, but rather that its power is more contingent on
that of finance capital and the bondholders. State powers and practices
have been more and more directed to satisfying the demands of
corporations and bondholders, often at the expense of citizens. This
entails strong state support for the creation of a good business climate
favourable to capital. The result in many instances is that states can
be doing very well while their populations fare poorly. This even
applies, somewhat surprisingly, to countries like Germany, where wage
repression contains working-class consumption at the same time as
German-based capital and the country’s financial state look to be in
very good shape.

Changes in the molecular movement of capital are also putting strong
pressures upon the scale at which state power might be constructed.
Political reterritorialisations such as the European Union become not
only more practicable but more and more of an economic necessity. These
political shifts are not a simple function of material transformations
in space relations: matters are far more complicated than that. But
changing space relations on the part of capital circulation and
accumulation do have transformative implications for the new political
configurations (for example, the formation of NAFTA, Mercosur, the
European Union, as well as the expansion of what used to be the G7 to
the G20 as a decision-making body).

The geographical landscape of capitalism (as opposed to that of capital)
is plainly shaped by a multitude of interests as individuals and groups
seek to define spaces and places for themselves against the background
of the macroeconomic processes of uneven geographical development that
the rules of capital accumulation and state power jointly effect.
Capital has to be somewhat sensitive to the wants and needs of the
populations it exploits, of course, and even if it were not, social and
class struggles would surely force it to the table to compromise with
critics and tamp down on some of its wilder ambitions. It is, however,
all too easy to blame the victims for what happens when capital leaves
town. The ruling narrative is that it was greedy unions, profligate
politicians, bad managers and the like who forced capital out. But it
was capital and not people that abandoned and deindustrialised Detroit,
Pittsburgh, Sheffield, Manchester, Mumbai and the like. While there have
been obvious examples of mismanagement and heightened class conflicts in
this or that region or city, it is preposterous to claim that these can
account for the total devastation of industrial regions that had for
generations been the backbone of capital accumulation in so many
different parts of the world. For this we have to thank the neoliberal
counter-revolution that began in the 1970s and has intensified to this
day.

Uneven geographical developments conveniently mask the true nature of
capital. Hope can spring eternal because there is always a successful
neighbourhood, region or state where things are going right even in the
midst of multiple calamities. Macro crises get disaggregated into
localised events that others elsewhere care or even know very little
about. Major crises in Indonesia or Argentina pass by but the rest of
the world says ‘Too bad’ or ‘So what?’ Particular rather than systemic
explanations of crises dominate thinking. Argentina, Greece or Detroit
should reform their ways, it is said, but capital gets off scot-free.

There is something else remarkable about the landscape of capital that
plays a vital ideological role in contemporary life and politics. The
capitalist city, for example, is built as a work of art in its own
right, replete with fabulous architecture and competing iconic meanings.
The mansions and penthouses of the ‘masters of the universe’ working now
in palatial offices in gleaming skyscrapers in global financial centres
contrast with the older industrial architecture of the traditional
factories. Spectacular palaces of consumerism and the perpetual creation
of postmodern urban spectacle contrast with suburban sprawl and gated
communities, which in turn contrast with tenement housing, working-class
and immigrant neighbourhoods and, in many cities of the world, large
tracts of self-help housing. The capitalist city is the high point of
capital’s attempt to appear civilised and to represent the grandest of
human aspirations.

There is a sense in which this claim is effective. We can marvel at the
product and admire the views of Paris, Barcelona, Hong Kong and Shanghai
in part because this urban spectacle hides the processes and the human
labour that went into its production. Capital does not, apparently, want
to have its own distinctive image. Judging from anti-capitalist
cartoons, it would be far from flattering! The city landscape of
capitalism exists as a diversionary image of another world closer to
some transcendental sense of human longing and desire. To look upon
Venice, Rome, Istanbul, San Francisco, Brasilia, Cairo or Lagos is to
look upon the hopes, achievements and chronic failures of that human
endeavour. And it is not only the great cities that we are talking of
here. The different rural landscapes that have been carved out around
the world can inspire as much affection, loyalty and admiration as any
city. The English countryside, the French _paysage_, the Tuscan
villages, the Argentinian pampas, the rolling plains of the Tigris
valley in Anatolia, the endless cornfields of Iowa, the soya bean
plantations of Brazil, all form palimpsests of the human endeavour
increasingly though by no means uniquely mobilised by and for capital.

How powerful a force has uneven geographical development been for
challenging capital to reinvent itself? Without uneven geographical
development capital would surely have stagnated, succumbed to its
sclerotic, monopolistic and autocratic tendencies and totally lost
legitimacy as the dynamic engine of a society that has pretences to
being civilised even as it is in danger of heading towards barbarism.
Unleashing interurban, interregional and international competition is
not only a primary means whereby the new comes to supplant the old, but
a context in which the search for the new, billed as the search for
competitive advantage, becomes critical to capital’s capacity to
reproduce itself. Above all, uneven geographical development serves to
move capital’s systemic failings around from place to place. Those
failings are a perpetually moving target.

The homogeneity now being imposed by an international order dominated by
the central banks and a few international institutions, such as the IMF,
is from this perspective potentially devastating for capital’s future
chances of survival. Capital could not long survive the advent of a
strong centralised global government unless, as has happened in China,
that government not only orchestrated but liberated interregional and
interurban competition. Given the constraints now imposed upon them by
the international disciplinary apparatus, there is no chance that
Greece, Portugal, Spain and Italy can rise from the ashes as did West
Germany and Japan after the Second World War to reinvigorate the
capitalist dynamic. They may recover somewhat, but it cannot be anything
other than an anaemic recovery. Whether unchaining uneven geographical
development can today work by itself as a panacea for capital’s malaise
is doubtful, given the storm clouds of systemic stagnation that are
gathering strength and darkening the future. Instead, we see an emergent
unholy alliance between state powers and the predatory aspects of
finance capital to create a form of ‘vulture capitalism’ that is as much
about cannibalistic practices (economies of dispossession) and forced
devaluations as it is about achieving harmonious global development. The
vultures, like the hedge funds and the private equity funds, will feed
off the destruction of ways of life in whole territories if necessary.

Capital survives not only through a series of spatio-temporal fixes that
absorb the capital surpluses in productive and constructive ways, but
also through the devaluation and destruction administered as corrective
medicine to those who fail to keep up and who fail to pay off their
debts. The very idea that those who irresponsibly lend should also be at
risk is, of course, dismissed out of hand. That would require calling
the wealthy property-owning classes everywhere to account and insisting
that they look to their responsibilities rather than to their
inalienable rights to private property and accumulation without limit.
The sinister and destructive side of spatio-temporal fixes (just look at
how Greece is being pillaged and devastated) becomes just as crucial to
capital as its creative counterpart in building a new landscape to
facilitate the endless accumulation of capital and the endless
accumulation of political power.

So what, then, should an anti-capitalist movement make of all this? It
is first vital to recognise that capital is always a moving target for
opposition because of its uneven geographical development. Any
anti-capitalist movement has to learn to cope with this. Oppositional
movements in one space have often been defanged because capital moved to
another. Anti-capitalist movements must abandon all thoughts of regional
equality and convergence around some theory of socialist harmony. These
are recipes for an unacceptable and unachievable global monotony.
Anti-capitalist movements have to liberate and coordinate their own
dynamics of uneven geographical development, the production of
emancipatory spaces of difference, in order to reinvent and explore
creative regional alternatives to capital. Different social movements
and resistances are emerging from within the framework of capital’s
uneven geographical development, from Stockholm and Cairo to São Paulo,
Shanghai, Paris and London. These constitute a mosaic of different but
loosely interconnected seedbeds for transformations of capitalism
towards an anti-capitalist future. How they might be put together is the
question. We live in chaotic and volatile times, particularly with
respect to uneven geographical developments. It is not unreasonable to
expect that resistances and oppositions will be equally chaotic,
volatile and geographically specific.


Contradiction 12


Disparities of Income and Wealth

An analysis of the Internal Revenue Service income tax returns for New
York City in 2012 showed that the average income of the top 1 per cent
in that year was $3.57 million, while half of the population in this
extremely high-rent and high-cost-of-living city were trying to get by
on $30,000 a year or less. In three days the ultra rich made more money
than most New Yorkers made in a year. By any standards, this level of
income inequality is astonishing, surely making New York City one of the
most unequal cities in the world. On the other hand these figures should
not surprise anyone, given the enormous earnings of the leading hedge
fund managers (five of whom earned, in the wake of the crisis, more than
$3 billion each in 2009) and the huge bonuses customarily doled out by
the leading banks in the city. Nationally, as might be expected, the
income disparities are nowhere near as dramatic, even though they had
been increasing markedly since the 1970s or so.

There is no point here in attempting anything other than a highly
simplifed account of aggregate global trends in inequalities of wealth
and income. Struggles over distribution of the social wealth have been
incessant throughout the history of capitalism. Outcomes have varied
greatly from one state, region or city to another, as different groups
have struggled for advantage against others as well as against dominant
groups and classes for what they regard as their fair and proper share
of the product of social labour. Given the powers of the state to
extract taxes and to redistribute wealth and income, much has depended
on which faction or political alliance holds state power and what it
does with it.

Struggles over distributional shares have often been fierce and the
outcomes hard to predict. In the wake of a coup, such as that which
occurred in Chile in 1973, it was to be expected that distributional
shares would shift dramatically towards greater inequality as the elites
that backed the coup cashed in. In Russia, a small band of oligarchs
collared, in an astonishing act of pillage, most of the natural resource
wealth of the country after the collapse of 1989. The ex-Soviet Union
now boasts one of the highest concentrations of billionaires – an
authentic oligarchy – in the world. In Britain after 1945, however, a
Labour government built a welfare state that supported the least
affluent for a whole generation, much as the Scandinavians had done
before them. The strong influence of communism during the Cold War over
social policies in the capitalist world, coupled with strong social
democratic impulses within that world (deriving from a history of
working-class organisation and a sharpened class consciousness), meant
capitalist states in general had to put a floor under conditions of life
for whole populations. The welfare state that resulted was far from
being socialist. It had strong elements of gender bias and was
paternalistic and even pro-capitalist to the extent that it became
demeaning, punitive and bureaucratic in its approach to its own
clientele. To be a ward of the welfare state was more often than not
unpleasant and inhuman, even as some state benefits (like social
security and old age pensions) brought more security to everyone. This
was the kind of state that was criticised by the progressive left and
then later obligingly abolished during the Thatcherite neoliberal
counter-revolution of the 1980s. The collapse of communism in 1989
removed the external pressure on states to either look to the well-being
of their populations or face strong political opposition.

Even in the absence of such dramatic realignments, the to and fro of
social struggles between classes and ethnic/racial groupings, along with
the fluctuating conditions of boom and slump in the economy, have
impacts on distributional arrangements that vary a great deal from one
part of the world to another. The distribution of income and wealth in
Nordic countries, for example, has until recently been much more
egalitarian than that in the United States, even before the Reagan
revolution started to shift the balance of concern away from labour and
the poor towards subsidising and rewarding capital. But both the USA and
Sweden are solidly capitalist. Capital seems to work just fine in a
variety of distributional settings.

This variability and adaptability of capital to complex configurations
of distribution does double duty when inserted into the incredible
complexity and diversity of social groupings that can exist throughout
capitalism in general. Gender, sexual, racial, ethnic, religious,
cultural, national and place-bound distinctions are everywhere in
evidence and questions of status, skills, talents, respect and
admiration for achievements and values confer differential opportunities
and life chances both for individuals and for distinctive ethnic,
racial, sexual and religious social groups within capitalist social
formations. To the degree that these characteristics are associated with
differential access to and remunerations in, for example, labour
markets, wide-ranging differentiations in economic and political power
result.

Not all economic distinctions within capitalism are attributable to
capital. But neither is capital innocent when it comes to fomenting
conflict within and among social groups. This is one of the crucial
levers it has to consolidate its control over labour. On the other hand
capital often appears indifferent as to which particular social
differentiations to support and which to discriminate against. It tends
to support whatever form of social emancipation gains traction (such as
gay rights and multiculturalism in recent years) provided that this does
not challenge overall strategies of labour control and provided that it
forms a distinctive niche market to be exploited. But the fact that
these social distinctions take on economic and material forms leads
inevitably to fierce competition over distributional shares among social
groups within a population. We are here positioned at one of those key
and sometimes confusing and confounding points of interaction where
capital and capitalism cannot be kept clearly asunder. This is
particularly the case with regards to questions of race. Racial issues
in many parts of the world (such as the United States) have long been so
intertwined with questions of class as to make the two mutually
reinforcing if not sometimes indistinguishable categories.

A good deal also depends on dominant ideas as to what might constitute
‘just’ or ‘ethically acceptable’ disparities in wealth and income and by
what means injustices might be rectified. Concerns of this sort are not
confined to workers alone. There has been a long tradition of bourgeois
reformism in which the presence of appalling misery and poverty, even
when it is no threat to public health (as it was in cholera epidemics
that did not stop at class boundaries), is judged unacceptable in any
civilised society. Polls repeatedly show, for example, that most
Americans have strong egalitarian views and that they are committed not
only to equality of opportunities (as the right wing ritualistically
maintains) but also to equality of outcomes. In a 2005 survey of more
than 5,000 people in the United States, the respondents, irrespective of
political party or of income, said they believed on average that the top
20 per cent should own no more than 32 per cent of the wealth. When
shown (without attribution) the wealth distribution from Sweden (where
38 per cent of the wealth is held by the top 20 per cent) and parallel
data from the United States (where 84 per cent of the wealth is held by
the top 20 per cent), 92 per cent of respondents preferred the Swedish
distribution. The repondents, it turned out, had little or no idea of
what the actual distribution of wealth in the USA actually was. They
believed that the top 20 per cent controlled 58 per cent of the wealth
rather than the 84 per cent which was actually the case. Either way,
this was a far cry from the 32 per cent they thought would be fair.¹

So why is there so little political movement in the USA to rectify this
lopsided distribution in the face of their beliefs as to what should be?
The answer mainly lies in the intense popular hostility towards state
interventions. This prevents the one institution capable of rectifying
income and wealth disparities from doing very much about it. In the
debate over Obama’s health care law, for example, Republicans did not
oppose the principle of universal access to decent health care, but
violently denounced the right of the ‘nanny’ state to mandate it or to
mandate individual behaviours. And so it goes with any tax proposals to
redistribute from the rich to the poor. In recent times the
redistributions have actually been in the other direction in the name of
austerity, budget deficit reduction, tax cutting and mandating a smaller
and less intrusive government. It is hard not to conclude that capital’s
intense interest in putting a downward pressure on wages lies behind
these budgetary and fiscal manoeuvres.

Struggles over the distribution of wealth and income are not the only
kinds of distributional struggles that matter. Struggles for
recognition, respect, true equality before the law, over citizenship
rights and cultural and religious freedoms, over proper political
representations, educational opportunities and access to job
opportunities and even over the right to be lazy are ongoing. Many of
these struggles are collectively waged by particular segments of the
population seeking redress or advantage as the case may be (for example,
women, LGBT groups, racial, ethnic or religious minorities, senior
citizens, trade unions, chambers of commerce, to say nothing of the
social and political institutions that seek to defend the interests of
labour). The flux and flow of these social struggles produces diverse
outcomes, many of which have side implications for the distribution of
wealth and income. Access to educational opportunity, for example, has
clear impacts on future income distributions.

Capitalism, taken as a whole, is riven with such conflicts and
struggles. But the questions I wish to pose here are far narrower. In
what ways does capital, understood as the organisation of the economic
engine of capital circulation and accumulation, rest upon certain basic
principles for the distribution of wealth and income? Are the
identifiable large-scale shifts in income distributions that have
occurred over the last forty years attributable to the way the internal
contradictions of capital have been reconfigured? Finally, does the
plainly intensifying contradiction between poverty and wealth pose a
threat to the reproduction of capital?

The statistical evidence confirms the adaptability of capital to wildly
disparate distributional arrangements. But while there clearly is no
unique distribution of income and wealth that might be considered
optimal from the standpoint of the reproduction and growth of capital,
no one believes that perfect equality of distribution is possible. It
has been suggested, on the other hand, that grossly lopsided
distributions might spell trouble not only because of the social
instability and unrest they may provoke (a fear the IMF and the Davos
conferences of the global capitalist elites frequently invoke), but
because the historical evidence suggests gross inequalities might be a
harbinger of a macroeconomic crisis to come. This is so because the
contradictory unity between production and realisation becomes far
harder to keep in balance when realisation depends on the vagaries and
discretionary habits of wealthy people as opposed to the solid and
reliable non-discretionary demands of the working poor. The last time
the USA experienced equivalent levels of inequality to those now
prevailing was the 1920s and this clearly played an important role in
fomenting if not triggering the depression of the 1930s. The situation
today seems broadly comparable. Can we hope to get out of the current
stagnation without radically reordering distributional arrangements?

Consider some recent trends in distribution. An Oxfam media briefing
offers the following capsule description:

Over the last thirty years inequality has grown dramatically in many
countries. In the US the share of national income going to the top 1%
has doubled since 1980 from 10 to 20%. For the top 0.01% it has
quadrupled to levels never seen before. At the global level, the top 1%
(60 million people) and particularly for the more select few in the top
0.01% (600,000 individuals – there are around 1200 billionaires in the
world) the last thirty years has been an incredible feeding frenzy. This
is not confined to the US, or indeed to the rich countries. In the UK
inequality is rapidly returning to levels not seen since the time of
Charles Dickens. In China, the top 10% now take home nearly 60% of the
income. Chinese inequality levels are now similar to those in South
Africa, [the most unequal country on earth, where incomes are]
significantly more unequal than at the end of apartheid. Even in many of
the poorest countries, inequality has grown rapidly. Globally the
incomes of the top 1% have increased 60% in twenty years. The growth in
income for the top 0.01% has been even greater.

The crisis of 2007–9 onwards made matters worse: ‘The top 100
billionaires added $240 billion to their wealth in 2012 – enough to end
world poverty four times over.’² Billionaires have erupted all over the
place, with large numbers now recorded in Russia, India, China, Brazil
and Mexico, as well as in the more traditionally wealthy countries in
North America, Europe and Japan. One of the more significant shifts is
that the ambitious no longer have to migrate to the affluent countries
to become billionaires – they can simply stay at home in India (where
the number of billionaires has more than doubled over the last few
years), Indonesia or wherever. As Branko Milanovic concludes, we are
witnessing the rise of a global plutocracy in which global power ‘is
held by a relatively small number of very rich people’.³ The threat to
the contradictory unity between production and realisation in the global
economy is palpable.

Yet by other measures the world is a much more equal place than it once
was. Millions of people have escaped from poverty. Much of this has been
due to the phenomenal growth of China, along with substantial bursts of
growth in the other so-called BRIC countries (Brazil, Russia and India).
Disparities in the global distribution of wealth and income _between_
countries have been much reduced with rising per capita incomes in many
developing parts of the world. The net drain of wealth from East to West
that had prevailed for over two centuries has been reversed as East Asia
in particular has risen to prominence as a powerhouse in the global
economy. The recovery of the global economy (anaemic though it was) from
the traumas of 2007–9 had largely been based by 2013 on the rapid
expansions in so-called ‘emerging’ markets (mainly the BRIC countries).
This shift had even extended to Africa, which was the one part of the
world that seemed to have escaped almost entirely from any effects of
the crisis. The uneven impact of the crisis within Europe, however,
meant rapidly widening disparities in economic well-being between
southern and northern countries. But none of these trends seemed very
stable. At the mere mention of a shift in Federal Reserve monetary
policy in mid-2013, for example, there was an immediate outflow of
capital from emerging markets such that the latter went into a swoon,
only to revive when the Fed announced it was rethinking its policies.

There has been a double movement over the last forty years: on the one
hand a general trend towards a levelling up in per capita wealth and
incomes across states (apart from those, like Greece, hit hard by the
recent crisis) and on the other dramatic increases in income and wealth
disparities among individuals and social groups in almost every country
of the world. Very few states or regions have bucked this trend and for
the most part in backwaters of the global economy (for example, a
country like Bhutan or, for a while, the state of Kerala in India). Only
in Latin America have we seen some reductions in social inequality as a
result of state policies. Disparities in monetary wealth are far harder
to get a handle on compared to incomes. But in some respects monetary
wealth is more important, since it has a long-standing rather than a
volatile relation to political power. The monetary measure of wealth is
difficult because the valuation of certain assets – everything from art
collections to expensive jewellery and property – is often a matter of
guesswork and in any case fluctuates wildly, as in the case of the
market value of stocks and shares. In most countries the distribution of
monetary wealth seems even more lopsided than the distribution of
incomes.

Why these general global trends? Has there been something going on
within the contradictory evolution of capital that would make them
inevitable, or even necessary for the survival and reproduction of
capital? Do increasingly lopsided wealth and income distributions within
so many countries signal the existence of a moving contradiction and, if
so, what sort of movement is it (for example, cyclical or linear)? Does
this movement account for rising levels of unrest and social instability
(as witnessed in 2013 from Stockholm to Istanbul and a hundred or so
cities in Brazil)? Is it a harbinger of a grumbling and still unfolding
macroeconomic crisis?

To answer these questions requires first that we establish how
inequality is foundational for capital. The inequality derives from the
simple fact that capital is socially and historically constructed as a
class in dominance over labour. The distribution of income and of wealth
between capital and labour has to be lopsided if capital is to be
reproduced. Distributional equality and capital are incompatible.
Certain distributional disparities actually precede the rise of capital.
Workers must be dispossessed of ownership and control over their own
means of production if they are to be forced into wage labour in order
to live. This distributional condition precedes the production of
surplus value and it must be maintained over time. Once capital
circulation and accumulation become general, the wage level has to be
kept within limits that permit profit making. Any drive to maximise
profits means driving down wage rates or increasing labour productivity.
Fierce competition between capitals leads to a general reduction in
wages no matter whether individual capitalists will it or not. The
distributional share between wages and profits is a product of some mix
of labour scarcities and the state of class struggle. The resultant
configuration is geographically uneven.

A sufficient share of the total output of social value must flow to the
capitalist class to (a) incentivise the capitalists by showering them
with conditions of consumption worthy of some leisure class and (b)
provide them with sufficient surplus to keep the economic engine of
capital working and expanding powerfully and smoothly. The ‘Faustian
dilemma’ that lurks within the breast of every capitalist between
personal enjoyment and reinvestment can be resolved only with
considerable surplus generation and appropriation. A disproportionate
amount of the surplus must always flow to capital at the expense of
labour. This is the only way for capital to be reproduced.

The superior economic resources that accrue to capital allow it and it
alone to invest and create jobs in a purely capitalist economy. This
provides the right-wing rationale for public policies (taxation
arrangements in particular) that favour capital over labour. While the
uneven income distribution may appear unfair, it is said, it actually is
advantageous to labour because capital is in command of job creation and
the more the capitalist class possesses the more job creation there will
be. Unfortunately, this is not the whole story. Capital reinvests in job
creation only when that activity is profitable. The last three
recessions in the United States have been followed by jobless recoveries
because profitable opportunities were lacking even though wage rates
were falling and labour surpluses were everywhere in evidence. Capital
either ‘warehoused’ its cash or used its surplus incomes for speculative
gains on the stock market, in property, in asset purchases (resources
and land in particular) or in playing a casino game with new and
unstable financial instruments. If it invested in production at all, it
was more likely to invest in labour-saving technologies that increased
unemployment rather than in job creation.

Meanwhile, the increasing concentration and centralisation of incomes
and wealth within a capitalist class permitted it to exercise
disproportionate influence and control over the media (public opinion)
and the capitalist state apparatus. Capital procured privileged access
to protection by a state which claims a monopoly over the legitimate use
of violence and a monopoly over the means of money creation. It uses
these privileges to protect its interests and perpetuate its power.
Central banks always bail out banks but they never bail out the people.
This is what the drift towards the formation of a global plutocracy and
the incredible increases in the disparity of wealth and income in most
countries around the world signal.

On the other side of the class divide, the neediness of workers accounts
for very little or nothing as far as capital is concerned, except when
the total aggregate demand exercised by workers is insufficient for the
realisation of capital accumulation in the market. Capital is most
immediately interested in keeping wage rates as low as possible. This
defines a central contradiction, as we earlier saw, between realisation
and production. The capitalist ability to manage the wage rate rests
upon the availability of an ‘industrial reserve army’ of surplus
workers. The function of this reserve is to supply the labour power
required for future expansion of capital while acting as a dead weight
upon the aspirations of those already employed as they struggle to
improve rates of remuneration and working conditions. The industrial
reserve army is of two sorts. First, there are the unemployed workers.
Technological changes that enhance labour productivity produce layoffs
and unemployment. Capital thus acquires considerable power over the
supply of surplus labour at the same time as it manages its own level of
demand. In other words, capital is committed as much to the production
of unemployment as it is to job creation. Providing tax incentives to
capital to reinvest can just as easily lead to the elimination of jobs
as to their creation (a fact that is rarely mentioned in political
discussions on the subject even though it is as plain as a pikestaff to
any worker who has been laid off for technological reasons).

Second, there were and still are latent reserves in the form of
extensive peasant populations, the self-employed, women and children who
have yet to be subjected to wage labour. The recent vast increase of
wage labour in China has entailed a transformation of this kind. Africa
still constitutes a vast potential reserve of labour that has yet to be
mobilised. Much of the growth that has occurred in the BRIC countries
and elsewhere has entailed a mobilisation of this latent reserve. In the
advanced capitalist countries the mobilisation of women into the labour
force earlier performed an analogous function even as the pool of
surplus rural labour was early on drained dry. This latent reserve is
not necessarily available in situ. From the 1960s onwards, the Germans
turned to Turkey, the French to the Maghreb, the Swedes to the former
Yugoslavia, the British to their former Empire and the USA to Mexico for
immigrant labour. When a rising anti-immigrant fervour among the working
classes grabbed hold, capital migrated to the Mexican _maquilas_, the
Chinese and Bangladeshi factories, in a mass movement to wherever
surplus labour was to be had. Even when capital does not migrate, the
very threat that it might do so often serves to keep labour quiescent in
its demands.

The intricate details of this need not detain us. All that matters is
that we clearly register by what general means capital can keep the
distributive share of labour in check and can manage it, even in the
face of strong currents of organised opposition and the danger of
triggering a realisation crisis by stifling workers’ effective demand.
That it has done so over the last forty years by some mix of
labour-saving technological changes and an alleatory globalisation is
obvious even as conditions of fiercer international competition have put
downward pressures upon profit rates in spite of rising rates of
exploitation of labour power. The net effect has been a global trend
towards the reduction in the share of labour in the social product. This
is what underpins increasing disparities in the individual distribution
of wealth and income almost everywhere we look.

There is, however, another piece of the puzzle that has to be put in
place. The obvious advantage that capital derives from the presence of a
vast reserve of surplus labour poses the problem of how does the reserve
population live when it is unemployed? In the case of latent reserves,
this problem is often dealt with by what is called ‘partial
proletarianisation’. Where labour reserves are drawn from rural regions,
then workers can return to their rural base when thrown out of work and
eke out a living there as they have always traditionally done. Much of
the cost of reproduction and child rearing is also borne in the rural
areas on the basis of remittances sent home by urban workers. This has
been true of China, for example. It also applies to migrant
(particularly undocumented) workers in the USA who return to Mexico,
where they were born, when they are laid off or get sick (from excessive
exposure to pesticides, for example). But, obviously, this does not work
when whole families migrate into the city and cut their rural ties.
Informal economies spring up (including those that entail criminal
activities) to sustain life on marginal terms in low-cost accommodation
in shacks, shanty towns and favelas. The unemployed eke out a living
however they can in the urban slums. What this does, of course, is to
define a way and standard of life and, even more importantly for
capital, a cost of living that defines a lower bound for wage levels in
the formal sector. That lower bound can be approached to the degree that
workers can easily be recruited from the surplus that survives in the
informal sector.

In the advanced capitalist countries this lower bound to wage levels is
fixed by the level of social welfare and unemployment insurance
established out of a long history of class struggle. This has led
right-wing theorists to argue that unemployment arises because the
standard of living available to the unemployed is too generous. The best
way to attack unemployment is to reduce unemployment benefits! Employers
who cannot profitably produce because wage levels are too high will then
increase employment opportunities at these lower wage levels. There is
some evidence that something like this can indeed happen. The problem,
of course, is that wage levels throughout the whole labour force
diminish without necessarily generating much new employment, thus
contributing to the rising rate of exploitation of labour and, other
things being equal, higher profits for capital and widening income
disparities. This was one of the effects of President Clinton’s reform
of the welfare system in the United States and the introduction of
‘workfare’ requirements in 1995. The far more punitive conditions of
welfare for the unemployed end up, of course, increasing the vast pool
of poverty-ridden unemployed who cannot find a job because none are
being generated in the face of the twin forces of globalisation (and
competition with massive latent reserves) and labour-saving
technological changes. Clinton has been handsomely rewarded since by
business organisations, earning some $17 million in 2012 from speaker’s
fees mainly from business groups.

The neoliberal approach to labour force management takes this tack. It
comprises a broad offensive against all those institutions – such as
trade unions and socialist political parties – that had for long
struggled to protect labour from the worst impacts of periodic bouts of
widespread unemployment. The conditions prevailing within the labour
reserve have, as a consequence, deteriorated markedly since the 1980s
for political and strategic reasons. Capital in effect has been
deepening income inequalities and poverty in order to sustain itself.

This story is a gross oversimplification, but it provides a neat
illustration of how the contradictory unity of production and
realisation has been manifest historically through the cyclical movement
in income disparities from relatively narrow to explosively expansive.
It was also paralleled by shifts in economic orthodoxy. Keynesian demand
management dominated economic thinking in the 1960s, as we earlier
remarked, whereas monetarist supply-side theories came to dominate after
1980 or so.

This brings us back to the question of what level of social inequality
is acceptable and desirable within capitalism. Complete economic
egalitarianism is plainly impossible, in contrast to liberal political
theory, which advocates (in theory) for equality in political, legal and
citizenship rights. The separation between economic and political rights
is palpable. But at what point does the contradiction between the
production of wealth and poverty here identified as foundational for
capital sharpen and become the locus of crisis formation? There are two
ways in which crises might be produced.

Chronic inequalities produce imbalances between production and
realisation. The lack of effective demand among the masses slows down or
blocks the easy circulation of capital. The politics of austerity,
widely being applied throughout much of the capitalist world in recent
times, reduces effective demand and hinders the creation of profit
opportunities. This explains the current situation in the USA, where
business profits have been at an all-time high, while reinvestment has
been weak. The second way is for unacceptable levels of inequality to
fuel social discontent and revolutionary movements. This threat is not
confined to situations of absolute deprivation. It can arise out of
relative deprivation, particularly when that deprivation is tied to the
inferior economic condition of some specific religious, ethnic, gendered
or racial group. The labour unrest and the urban uprisings of the 1960s
in the United States were of this sort. The social unrest in Brazil in
2013 arose at a time of modest reductions in inequality and could
partially be attributed to rising expectations among hitherto
marginalised populations and the failure of public services and
facilities to keep up with their demands.

None of this explains the astonishing concentrations of wealth among an
emergent global plutocracy at the top of the income distribution. But
there is a structural explanation for this and it pivots around the
rising role of merchant, media and financial capital. Rapidly evolving
information technologies and space–time revolutions in communications
have revolutionised the possibilities for the geographical mobility of
money capital in particular. The emphasis within capital has shifted as
a result towards global financialisation. The dynamic shifts occurring
across several of capital’s contradictions have in effect interacted in
such a way as to widen disparities in income and wealth via this
financialisation. Let me elaborate.

There have been several bouts of financialisation throughout capital’s
history (the latter half of the nineteenth century, for example). What
makes the current phase special is the phenomenal acceleration in the
speed of circulation of money capital and the reduction in financial
transaction costs. The mobility of money capital relative to that of
other forms of capital (commodities and production in particular) has
dramatically increased. Capital’s penchant for the annihilation of space
through time here has a large role to play. This, says Craig Calhoun in
a recent essay, ‘facilitates the “creative destruction” of existing
structures of capital (e.g. specific modes of industrial production) and
spurs the development of new technologies’, which in turn spurs ‘the
development of new products, production processes and new sites of
production’. Uneven geographical developments become even more
pronounced as capital searches out and moves to newer and lower-cost
locations. The pressure asserted by finance ‘drives investment towards
ever more short-term profits and undercuts long-term and deeper growth.
It also produces speculative bubbles and busts. It increases market
pressure on firms bringing less than median returns to capital, driving
disinvestment from still-profitable older businesses and thus driving
down wages and reducing the tendency of industrial capitalism to share
profits through rising wages. _It intensifies inequality_’ (my
emphasis). But rapid-fire financialisation also ‘leads to returns on
invested wealth that far outstrip returns on employment. It rewards
traders more than material producers … It makes all other sorts of
businesses pay more for financial services. The 2010 bonus pool for
securities industry employees in New York City alone was $20.8 billion;
the top 25 hedge fund managers earned $22.7 billion. And this was after
the market meltdown revealed the damage that financialisation was doing
to the larger economy.’⁴ Traders of all sorts benefit, not only those
trading in money. Those trading in information and all the accoutrements
of the economy of spectacle and the manufacturing of images and fetish
desires are also part of the deal, as well as all those who trade in
futures, no matter how fictitious these turn out to be. The merchants
and the rentiers as well as the financiers are repositioned as the
arbiters of capital accumulation relative to industrial capital. This is
how the distribution of wealth and income became so distorted from the
1970s onwards.

But this has made capital itself less secure, more volatile and more
crisis-prone, because of the resultant tensions between production and
realisation of social value when the main arbiters of capital
accumulation have little or nothing to do with actual production. The
engine of capitalism has been groaning under the strain. The engine
could easily blow up (China would almost certainly be the epicentre for
that) or grind to a halt (as seems to be the more likely outcome in
contemporary Europe and Japan).

There is, in all of this, a deep irony. Historically, industrial capital
waged a mighty struggle to free itself from the chains of the landlords
who extracted rent, the usurious financiers and the merchants who looked
to rob or buy cheap and sell dear in unevenly constructed markets.
Twenty-first-century capitalism seems to be busy weaving a net of
constraints in which the rentiers, the merchants, the media and
communications moguls and, above all, the financers ruthlessly squeeze
the lifeblood out of productive industrial capital, to say nothing of
the workers employed. It is not that industrial capital disappears. It
has merely become subservient to capital in its other more fantastic and
virulent forms.

A form of capital has emerged that is ruthlessly dynamic in the field of
technological changes and in the globalisation of social relations, yet
which not only pays no mind to the conditions under which social labour
produces but even seems not to care too much whether production takes
place at all. However, if all capitalists seek to live off rents,
interest, profit on merchant’s and media capital, or even worse just on
speculating in asset values or living off capital gains (as most of the
top 1 per cent of income earners do in the USA), without producing
social value, then the only possible outcome is a calamitous crisis. A
political economy of this kind also betokens the concentration and
centralisation of immense economic wealth, power and privilege among the
merchant and media capitalists, the financiers and the rentiers. The
emergence of such a plutocracy is, sadly, all too plain to see. The fact
that it does so well while the mass of the people does so badly is hard
to disguise. The big question is if and when a mass political movement
of the dispossessed might arise to repossess that which has been lost.

This leaves us with one critical residual question: if the immense
disparities of wealth and income now emerging are a reflection of the
rise of this new form of capital, then what were the contradictions that
made for the rise of this new form of capital? This is a crucial
question that will be taken up later in the context of the dangerous
contradictions. It was not, I shall hope to show, a mere accident of
history.

The political implications of all this for an anti-capitalist strategy
are simple enough but far-reaching. If, for example, the poll data for
the United States is at all emblematic, then there will be massive
public support for a reform movement that produces far more egalitarian
outcomes than is currently the case, even as it demands that the state
not be the vehicle to accomplish this. There would be and is widespread
support for worker-control initiatives, solidarity economies and
autonomous communitarian and cooperative structures. The example of
Mondragon, the largest and most long-lasting workers’ cooperative in
Europe, with its collective management bragging, until very recently, an
income disparity of no more than three to one (compared to the 350 to
one in a typical US corporation) is appealing.

In this case we also see the potential value of a very important
category of political action. This is the idea of ‘revolutionary
reform’. Plainly, the reduction of wealth and income disparities from
their current levels would not challenge the reproduction of capital one
wit. Indeed, such a reduction, it can be plausibly argued, is absolutely
necessary for capital to survive in the present conjuncture because the
current disparities threaten to become an absolute contradiction by
virtue of escalating imbalances between the capacity to manage the
contradictory unity between production and realisation. But, if the
theory of capital’s necessary inequalities is correct, then there will
come a point where a programme to reduce wealth and income inequalities
will threaten the reproduction of capital. Once a move towards a profit
squeeze gets under way, then it can ultimately threaten to squeeze the
lifeblood out of capital to compensate for the way capital
systematically sucks the lifeblood out of labour. Nobody knows exactly
where the breaking point might lie, but it will surely be well before
the levels of equality preferred in the US public opinion polls are
reached. A reform movement around reducing social inequality can become
the cutting edge for revolutionary transformation.


Contradiction 13


Social Reproduction

Once upon a time it could reasonably be said that capital cared not a
wit about the neediness of the worker, leaving it to the initiative and
ingenuity of the workers to reproduce themselves biologically,
psychologically and culturally on the basis of the pittance of a wage
that capital provided. The workers for the most part conveniently
obliged because they had no option. This was the situation that Karl
Marx encountered and it was probably for this reason that he left the
question of the social reproduction of the labour force to one side in
his theorising of capital’s political economy. But plainly, if labourers
do not reproduce themselves or are overworked to a premature death down
the mines and in the factories (or commit suicide from overwork, as has
been regularly happening in Chinese factories) and if capital’s easy
access to a labour surplus is somehow blocked, then capital cannot
reproduce. Marx recognised this danger when he clearly saw that limits
had to be put upon the exorbitant length of the working day and
murderous rates of exploitation and that state legislation on this point
was just as important to protect the reproduction of capital as it was
to protect the lives of the labourers. The contradiction between the
conditions required to ensure the social reproduction of the labour
force and those needed to reproduce capital has always been latently
present. But over the last two centuries it has evolved to become a far
more prominent and complex contradiction, loaded with dangerous
possibilities and full of far-reaching but uneven geographical
manifestations and consequences.

This contradiction became more prominent with the rise of the factory
system and the increasing complexity and roundaboutness of capital’s
production systems. While traditional artisanal skills were of
diminishing importance, capital became much more interested in the
procurement of a modestly educated workforce, one that was literate,
flexible, disciplined and complicitous enough to fulfil the variety of
tasks demanded of it in the machine age. The insertion of education
clauses in the English Factory Act of 1864 was a sign of this increasing
interest of capital in the workers’ capacities and powers and this
entailed limited interventions in the life of workers outside of the
factory. Within capitalism as a whole, this concern for the reproduction
of labour power of adequate qualities coincided in many parts of the
world with a political project on the part of a reformist bourgeoisie to
create a ‘respectable’ working class that would refrain from riot and
revolution and succumb to the blandishments that capital could offer.
The growth of public education, along with the ‘gas and water’ socialism
that prevailed politically in many parts of the capitalist world,
certainly eased the lot of the regularly employed worker and did so in
such a way as to permit the extension of political representation (the
right to vote and thereby influence public policies) to the point of
universal suffrage.

The increasing interest in the education of the workforce and the
mobilisation of financial resources to accomplish this task has been a
major feature in capital’s history. But it has not been a disinterested
history nor has it evolved without complications deriving from the
dynamics of class struggle between capital and labour. For what has been
at stake here, as earlier noted, is what it is that capital wishes the
working classes to be educated in and what it is that the working
classes themselves want and desire to know. In early English and French
history, for example, the autodidact, the self-educated labourer, was a
permanent thorn in capital’s side, given to often wildly divergent
socialist utopian ideas about alternatives to the form of life that
capital offered and prepared to take political if not revolutionary
action to bring some anti-capitalist alternative into existence. The
incredible flourishing of emancipatory and utopian tracts and sects in
France during the 1830s and 1840s (associated with names like Fourier,
Saint-Simon, Proudhon, Cabet, etc.) was paralleled across the English
Channel by a more sober but nonetheless persistent literature on worker
rights and the necessity to construct institutional solidarities such as
trade unions and various modes of political agitation (Chartism) and
organisation, some of which was supported by utopian thinkers and
practitioners such as Robert Owen. If this was what constituted the
education of the working classes, then capital wanted none of it. But
faced with the persistent pursuit of self-education on the part of at
least an influential segment of the working classes, capital had to come
up with something to put in its place. As Mr Dombey put it in Charles
Dickens’s _Dombey and Son_, he had no objection to public education
provided it taught the worker his proper place in society. Marx, for his
part, while critical of much of the socialist utopian literature,
learned mightily from it and likewise sought to create a whole
anti-capitalist knowledge field that would provide a fount of ideas for
anti-capitalist agitation. Heaven forbid that the workers would read
such stuff.

While public education has done much to meet capital’s demand for
ideological conformity combined with the production of skill sets
appropriate to the state of the division of labour, it has not
eradicated the underlying conflict. And this is so in part because state
interests also enter in to attempt to forge a sense of cross-class
national identity and solidarity that is at war with capital’s penchant
for some form of rootless cosmopolitan individualism, to be emulated by
both capitalist and worker alike. None of these contradictions of the
content for public education can easily be settled, but this does not
detract from the simple fact that investment in education and training
is a sine qua non for capital’s competitiveness. Massive investment in
education has, for example, been a striking feature of China’s recent
development, as it was earlier in Singapore and other East Asian states.
This was so because the profitability of capital rested more and more on
the increasing productivity of increasingly skilled labour.

But, as so often happens within the history of capital, education
ultimately became a ‘big business’ unto itself. The stunning inroads of
privatisation and fee paying into what had traditionally been public and
free education have placed financial burdens on the populace such that
those desirous of education have to pay for this key aspect of social
reproduction themselves. The consequences of creating a heavily
debt-encumbered educated labour force may take a considerable time to
work out. But if the street battles between students and authorities in
Santiago in Chile that began in 2006 and have continued to this day over
the expensive privatisation of both high school and advanced education
are anything to go by, then this too will likely be a simmering source
of discontent wherever it has been implemented.

The creation of a highly productive labour force gave rise to what is
called ‘human capital’ theory, which is one of the weirdest widely
accepted economic ideas that could ever be imagined. It found its first
expression in the writings of Adam Smith. The acquisition of productive
talents on the part of labour, he argued, through ‘education, study or
apprenticeship, always costs a real expense, which is a capital fixed
and realized as it were in his person. Those talents, as they make a
part of his fortune, so do they likewise that of the society to which he
belongs. The improved dexterity of a workman may be considered in the
same light as a machine or instrument of trade which facilitates and
abridges labour, and which, though it costs a certain expense, repays
that expense with a profit.’¹ The question, of course, is who foots the
bill for the creation of such talents – labour, the state, capital or
some institution in civil society (like the Church) – and who gets the
benefits (or ‘profits’ in Adam Smith’s parlance)?

To be sure, skilled and highly trained labour might reasonably expect a
higher rate of remuneration than unskilled labour, but that is a far cry
from accepting the idea that the higher wage is a form of profit on the
workers’ investment in their own education and skills. The problem, as
Marx pointed out in his acerbic criticism of Adam Smith, is that the
worker can only realise the higher value of those skills by working for
capital under conditions of exploitation such that it is, in the end,
capital and not the worker that reaps the benefit from the higher
productivity of labour.² In recent times, for example, worker
productivity has surged but the share of output going to labour has
declined, not increased. In any case, if what the worker truly possessed
in bodily form was capital, Marx pointed out, then he or she would be
entitled to sit back and just live off the interest of his or her
capital without doing a single day’s work (capital as a property
relation always has that option at hand). As far as I can tell, the main
point of the revival of human capital theory, at the hands of Gary
Becker in the 1960s, for example, was to bury the significance of the
class relation between capital and labour and make it seem as if we are
all just capitalists earning different rates of return on our capital
(human or otherwise).³ If labour was getting very low wages, it could
then be argued that this was simply a reflection of the fact that
workers had not invested enough effort in building up their human
capital! It was, in short, their fault if they were low-paid. Hardly
surprisingly, all the major institutions of capital, from economics
departments to the World Bank and the IMF, wholeheartedly embraced this
theoretical fiction for ideological and certainly not for sound
intellectual reasons. These same institutions have more recently
similarly embraced the wondrous fiction that the informal sector of
social reproduction which dominates in many cities of the developing
world is in fact a seething mass of micro-enterprises that need only a
dose of microfinance (at usurious rates of interest pocketed at the end
of the trail by major financial institutions) in order to become fully
fledged card-carrying members of the capitalist class.

For exactly the same reasons, I have profound objections to Bourdieu’s
characterisation of personal endowments (which are undeniably of great
importance in social life) as a form of capital called ‘cultural
capital’.⁴ While it is perfectly fine to emphasise the role of such
endowments in confirming status position in our society and thereby
contributing to the replication of class distinctions in the course of
social reproduction, to treat this as a form of capital in the sense we
are using this term here is confusing if not perverse. It would propose
that there is some way of accumulating monetary wealth and income by
learning to appreciate Scarlatti (if you are French) and Snoop Dogg if
you are American. Where the idea of cultural capital does enter in (but
this is not Bourdieu’s point) is in the branding and marketing of goods
and places in such a way as to command a monopoly rent (as in the case
of fine wines and perfect tourist destinations). But what we are dealing
with here is the manufacture of symbols of distinction which, if they
stick, can be a source of permanent monopoly rents and monetary gain.
Product differentiation to emphasise that my brand of toothpaste is
unique and special has always been a way to avoid the levelling effect
of market exchange. Who invents the symbolic world that lies behind the
branding of goods and places – a manipulative work that lies at the
heart of contemporary advertising and the tourism industry – then
becomes critical to the manipulation of human desires for monetary gain.
It is, of course, the capitalists who take the monetary gain and who pay
for the branding of their products. And in some instances they certainly
do not hesitate to attach signs of class and even more emphatically
seductive gender images to the qualities of their products. Capital
undoubtedly uses such signs of distinction in its sales practices and
pitches, but that does not mean that distinction is a form of capital,
as Bourdieu proposes, though it does often give rise to monopoly rents
if the distinction is unique and original (like a Picasso painting).

Capital and the capitalist state (though mainly the latter) have in
recent times taken a deep interest in aspects of social reproduction
that affect the competitive qualities of the labour force. If any
country is desirous of becoming wealthier by moving up the value-added
chain of production into fields of research and development, thereby
garnering the wealth to be tapped from command over intellectual
property rights, then this depends on having at one’s disposal a
well-educated and scientifically qualified labour force which must be
either trained at home (hence the immense significance of the research
universities in countries such as the USA) or imported from abroad. The
education of such a workforce has to begin early in life, which puts the
whole educational system in the cross-hairs of capital’s concerns,
although, as usual, capital is inclined not to pay for any of it if it
can possibly help it. In countries like Singapore and now China strong
state investment in education at all levels has been key to their
economic success.

The rapidly changing technological context, particularly the progress of
robotisation and artificial intelligence already noted, has radically
altered the kinds of skills that are advantageous to labour and
educational systems have often lumbered awkwardly to keep up with the
new demands. More than twenty years ago, for example, Robert Reich
pointed out an emergent division between knowledge-based
‘symbolic-analytic’ services, routine production and ‘in-person’
services. The ‘symbolic analysts’ included engineers, legal experts,
researchers, scientists, professors, executives, journalists,
consultants and other ‘mind workers’, who were primarily engaged in
collecting, processing, analysing and manipulating information and
symbols for a living. This group of workers, which Reich estimated made
up roughly 20 per cent of the labour force in the USA, occupied a
privileged position in part because they could practise their trade
almost anywhere in the world. They needed, however, to be well educated
in analytic and symbolic skills and much of this begins in the home,
where, loaded down with electronic gadgets, children learn at an early
age how to use and manipulate data and information adequate for an
emergent ‘knowledge-based’ economy.⁵ This group forms the core of a
relatively affluent though highly mobile upper middle class within
capitalism and one that increasingly tends to segregate itself (and to
enclose its processes of social reproduction) in privileged enclaves
away from the rest of society. By way of contrast, traditional
production workers (for example, in steel and car production) and
ordinary service workers have very little future, in part because those
are the jobs most likely to disappear and in part because even those
jobs that remain are likely to be low-wage with very scant benefits
simply because of the massive labour surpluses now available.

The long-standing interest in increasing labour productivity among at
least a certain segment of the workforce did not initially encompass all
of the worker’s cultural and affective life. Aspects of social
reproduction, such as the raising of children or caring for the sick and
elderly, continued in many instances and places to be very much the
individual worker’s affair and outside of market considerations, as were
many of the particular trappings of cultural life. But with the
complexities of capitalist industrialisation and urbanisation, the
capitalist state increasingly found itself necessarily embroiled in the
regulation and provision of public health, of education, social control
and even the cultivation of certain habits of heart and mind conducive
to self-discipline and citizenship among the populace at large.

While the whole field of social reproduction is, as Cindi Katz puts it,
‘the fleshy, messy, and indeterminate stuff of everyday life’, it is
‘also a set of structured practices that unfold in dialectical relation
with production, with which it is mutually constitutive and in tension’.
The contradictory unity between social reproduction and the reproduction
of capital crystallises out as a moving contradiction of singular
interest throughout the history of capital. What it is about now is
light years away from what it was in 1850. ‘Social reproduction,’ Katz
continues, ‘encompasses daily and long term reproduction, both of the
means of production and the labour power to make them work. At its most
basic, it hinges on the biological reproduction of the labour force,
both generationally and on a daily basis.’ It also encompasses the
production and reproduction of manual, mental and conceptual skills.⁶
All of this is achieved on the basis of the individual wage plus the
social wage provided by various state agencies (for example, education
and health care) and key institutions of civil society (for example, the
Church and a wide range of philanthropically supported NGOs).

From the standpoint of labour, social reproduction has a very particular
meaning. The labourers receive a money wage and it is their choice how
they spend it. What they spend it on and why were, in the early days, of
no interest to capital. But that is by no means true today, as we shall
see. How much labourers need to survive and reproduce themselves in part
depends upon how much labourers and their families and communities can
do for themselves. There is a vast amount of unpaid labour absorbed in
social reproduction, most of it, as feminists have repeatedly and quite
correctly pointed out, traditionally and even to this day being done by
women. Social reproduction is for capital a large and convenient sphere
in which real costs are externalised on to households and other communal
entities. Its costs weigh disproportionately on different groups in the
population. In the case of partial proletarianisation, as discussed
earlier for example, almost all the costs of child rearing and caring
for the sick and the aged are left to the household labours of peasant
or rural societies. Under conditions of social democracy, however,
political movements drove capital to internalise some of these costs
either directly (through pension, insurance and health care provisions
in wage contracts) or indirectly (through taxation on capital to support
the state provision of services via a welfare state).

Part of the neoliberal political programme and ethos in recent times has
been to externalise as much as possible the costs of social reproduction
on to the populace at large in order to raise the profit rate for
capital by reducing its tax burden. The argument has been that the
welfare state was becoming too costly and that tax relief for capital
would stimulate deeper and faster economic growth, which, when the
benefits were spread around, would make everyone better off. It never
worked out that way, of course, because the rich took virtually all of
the savings and passed on none of the benefits (except in the form of
some morally questionable therapeutic philanthropy).

Households are not, however, isolated entities. They are embedded in a
matrix of social interactions and social relations present in places.
Their labours are often shared – in middle-class US neighbourhoods, for
example, car-pooling, childcare, the staging of collective events like
park picnics, street fairs and block parties are all part of daily life
and there is even an associated constituency, soccer moms, who garner
political attention. There is a good deal of non-monetary exchange, of
mutual aid in evidence, spread across everything from helping to fix the
neighbour’s car to painting the patio and helping maintain common spaces
for communal enjoyment. How much of this occurs and through what
mechanisms can be immensely varied but it is undeniable that in many
parts of the world households conjoin in a whole range of practices of
mututal support to create some semblance of a common life. Such
practices get formalised in the establishment of community associations,
ethnic assemblies, religious organisations and the like, which pay
considerable attention to defining and maintaining (sometimes
repressively) the appropriate neighbourhood conditions for social
reproduction. Such associations can form the basis for larger social
movements and it is from them that much inspiration is drawn for the
idea that another life is possible to that given by pure market and
monetary transactions. While it would seem that the neoliberal assault
on state provision of social services might be counteracted by an
upsurge of practices of mutual aid, the evidence for the most part seems
otherwise – that the individualistic and self-centred profit-maximising
ethic through which neoliberalism works (along with other features such
as increased geographical mobility) has if anything diminished mutual
aid as a feature of a common social life except in communities that
define their ties in religious or ethnic bonding terms. None of this is
helped by the increasing predilection of consumers to treat their home
as a short-term speculative investment rather than as a place to create
a solid and settled life. It is also true that the modes of urban living
that capital typically produces (particularly with respect to dependence
on the car) are not very conducive to the creation of mutually
supportive social networks that can encourage more adequate and
fulfilling forms of social reproduction.

Behind all of this there lurks an incipient and potentially damaging
contradiction that we have encountered before in different guises.
Labourers and households are a significant source of effective demand
and they play a significant role in the realisation of values in the
market. If they are largely producing for themselves outside of the
market, then they do not buy in the market and they furnish less in the
way of effective demand. This is the problem with partial
proletarianisation and explains why, at some point, it often gives way
(usually under the pressure of capital) to full proletarianisation. If
the welfare state is dismantled, then bang goes a hefty chunk of
effective demand and the field for realisation of values shrinks. This
is the problem with austerity politics. The contradiction between
capital’s rising potential profitability in production and its falling
potential profitability due to insufficient effective demand intensifies
as attempts to manage the contradiction between social reproduction and
production lurch from one extreme to another.

In partial answer to this dilemma, there has been a long-standing trend
within the history of capital for household labour to be supplanted by
market-based transactions (everything from haircuts to takeaway or
frozen meals, fast foods, to dry-cleaning, entertainment and child and
old-age care). The privatisation of personal household labours into the
market sphere, along with increasing capital intensity of household
technologies (everything from washing machines and vacuum cleaners to
microwaves and, of course, houses and cars) that have to be purchased
with a considerable outlay (often debt-financed), has not only radically
transformed the nature of household economies but also revolutionised
processes of realisation of capital values in the market. The
commodifications in the housing markets of the world have opened up a
vast field of capital accumulation through the consumption of space for
social reproduction. Capital has long been concerned, as we have seen,
with promoting ‘rational consumption’, understood as that form of
household consumerism that fuels capital accumulation irrespective of
whether it meets real human wants and needs (whatever these might be) or
not. Social reproduction has increasingly been infected and in some
cases totally transformed by such considerations.

This elementary fact has prompted much reflection on the increasing role
of capital in dominating what Jürgen Habermas calls (following the
German philosopher Edmund Husserl) our ‘lifeworld’ or what Henri
Lefebvre analyses under the rubric of ‘everyday life’.⁷ The systemic
penetration of almost all aspects of our lifeworld by capital and its
products in one form or another has, of course, provoked resistance, but
for most of the world’s population it has proved a losing battle, even
when it was not actively welcomed. Arguments have been advanced on the
progressive left (socialist feminists in particular) that wages should
be paid for housework. Given that so much of that labour is performed
disproportionately by women, the political reasoning is clear, but it
unfortunately succeeds only in furthering the total monetisation of
everything, which ultimately plays into the hands of capital. Apart from
the sheer difficulty of monetisation of household tasks, it is unlikely
that such a measure would benefit the people, least of all women, who
will most likely continue to be excessively exploited even as they are
paid for their household labours.

Whereas it was perfectly reasonable, therefore, for the eminent French
historian Fernand Braudel to take the sphere of material life and
material reproduction of the common people in the late medieval period
as having little or nothing to do with capital or even with the market,
this formulation has no relevance to our own times except in those
increasingly remote areas of the world (for example, indigenous
societies or remote peasant populations) where capital has yet to exert
its dominant influence.⁸ The commodification of daily life and social
reproduction has proceeded apace and created a complex space for
anti-capitalist struggle.

The sphere of social reproduction has in fact almost everywhere become
the site of highly intrusive capitalist activities. The tentacles of the
state’s and capital’s influence and power now proliferate within the
spheres of social reproduction in many parts of the world in myriad
ways. Not all of these interventions are pernicious, of course. Social
reproduction is the site where the oppression of and violence against
women flourishes in many parts of the world, where educational
opportunities for women are denied, where violence and abuse of children
all too frequently occur, where intolerance breeds contempt for others,
where labour all too often transfers its own bitter experience of
violence and oppression in the labour process back on to others in the
household, where drink and drugs take their toll. It is for this reason
that a modicum of social regulation and even, perhaps, state
interventionism in the world of social reproduction become so necessary.
But this then constitutes a bureaucratic framing of daily life and of
social reproduction that leaves very little room for autonomous
development. Furthermore, the deeper material embedding of all processes
of production, exchange, distribution and consumption in the web of
social and biological life has produced a world where a contradiction
between a potentially alienating household consumerism of excess and the
consumption necessary for adequate social reproduction becomes every bit
as salient as the contradiction between the social reproduction of the
labour force and the reproduction of capital. How much of contemporary
social reproduction in, say, the United States is given over to training
as many people as possible in the insane arts of conspicuous consumption
and speculative finance as opposed to training them to be good and
well-educated workers?

What Randy Martin calls ‘the financialization of daily life’ has become
a conspicuous insertion into social reproduction over the last
generation.⁹ If we ask the elementary questions: how much social
reproduction is debt-financed and what are the implications of that
fact?, the answers are quite stunning. In many parts of the world the
usurious moneylender has always been a significant figure and continues
to be so up to this day. Social reproduction takes place in much of
India under the shadow of the looming power of the usurer. This is not
relieved by the arrival of the institutions of microcredit and
microfinance (which in some instances have driven people – mostly women
– to suicide as the only relief from their collective indebtedness). But
personal indebtedness associated with social reproduction has now become
a calamitous problem in one form or another almost everywhere. The huge
indebtedness of students in the United States is now being mimicked in
Britain, Chile and China, while borrowings to finance the conduct of
everyday life have been mounting at astonishing rates. In just a few
years personal debt in China has soared way beyond incomes from a base
of close to zero in, say, 1980.

This generalisation is cut across, however, by the uneven geographical
development of these contradictions. Some parts of the world (such as
the United States, where consumption accounts for more than 70 per cent
of GDP) seem to be more about furnishing the effective demand through an
alien consumerism that corrupts reasonable forms of social reproduction,
while others are focused more on the social reproduction of a labour
force that can churn out value without cease (for example, China, where
consumerism accounts for around 35 per cent of GDP). In divided cities
like Lagos, São Paulo and, yes, even New York, one part of the city is
given over to conspicuous consumption and the other to the reproduction
of an easily exploited but largely redundant because surplus labour
force. The study of social reproduction in these different environments
reveals a huge gap in both the qualities and meaning of household
activities, with hardly any commonalities between them. These divisions
produce some curious manifestations in the realm of bourgeois morality.
While moral opprobrium is cast upon the practices first in Pakistan and
later in India of having young children working for pennies on a ten- or
twelve-hour-day schedule to produce footballs to be kicked around by
players who earn millions, these very same moralists are totally blind
to the exploitation by capital of their own children as consumers in the
marketplace, even as those children are also being inculcated into the
dark arts of the deal, as well as stock market manipulations (money for
nothing) by pushing buttons on their keyboards. Google the case of
Jonathan Lebed to see what I mean. By the time he was fifteen years old
he had gained several million dollars from trading in penny stocks,
setting up chat rooms to promote stocks he had just bought and selling
at the higher price that his favourable ratings in the chat room
created. Prosecuted by the Securities and Exchange Commission, he simply
maintained that this was all that Wall Street did anyway; the SEC fined
him a small amount and dropped the whole project of prosecution like a
hot potato because Lebed was quite right.

The contradictions of social reproduction cannot be understood outside
of these geographically differentiated circumstances, even as they have
also dramatically changed their general character over time. The
contingencies of material activity, of cultural forms and local ways of
living, are of great import in many parts of the world. As Katz notes,
social reproduction ‘necessarily remains mainly place-bound’ in a
context where capital is highly mobile. The result is that ‘all sorts of
disjunctures occur across space, across boundaries, and across scale,
which are as likely to draw upon sedimented inequalities in social
relations as to provoke new ones’. Agricultural labourers are reproduced
in Mexico but end up working in the fields of California, women workers
raised in the Philippines play a large part in furnishing domestic
labour in New York City, mathematical engineers trained under communism
in what was once the Soviet Union end up in Cape Canaveral, while
software engineers educated in India go to Seattle.

Social reproduction is not only about labour skills and the organisation
of consumer habits. ‘The reproduction of the labour force calls forth a
range of cultural forms and practices that are also geographically and
historically specific,’ says Katz, and this includes all those
associated with knowledge and learning, mental conceptions of the world,
ethical and aesthetic judgements, relations to nature, cultural mores
and values, as well as the sense of belonging that underpins loyalties
to place, region and nation. Social reproduction also inculcates ‘the
practices that maintain and reinforce class and other categories of
difference’ and ‘a set of cultural forms and practices that works to
reinforce and naturalize the dominant social relations of production and
reproduction’. Through these social practices ‘social actors become
members of a culture they simultaneously help to create and construct
their identities within and against’.

‘The questions of social reproduction are,’ concludes Katz, ‘vexed and
slippery, but the arena of social reproduction is where much of the toll
of globalized capitalist production can be witnessed.’¹⁰ It is the field
where the creative destruction of capital is at its most insidious,
promoting, as it does, an alien consumerism and individualistic ways of
life conducive to what amounts to little more than crass and competitive
selfish greed, while pinning responsibility on its victims for their own
plight when they fail (as they inevitably must) to build up their own
supposedly human capital. It is the sphere where the reproduction of
inequality begins and, lacking any powerful subsequent counterforce,
ends. In the United States, for example, social mobility is almost at a
standstill, so everything rests on a social reproduction process that is
highly unequal and tightly channelled, if not outright discriminatory.
Where once upon a time the populace at large fended for itself to
reproduce itself without one iota of assistance from capital or the
state, the populace now has to reproduce itself in the midst of massive
corruptions and interventions of both state and capital in the
construction of a daily life oriented not only to fill the highly
differentiated slots (including that of ne’er-do-well) in a particular
kind of labour force but also to being a sink for a wide range of
unnecessary and unwanted products that capital produces and markets with
such flair.

There are those, of course, who see the contradiction and seek ways
around it. Some long for a return to indigenous ways of thinking and of
living, or at least see some hope of mounting a challenge to the crass
forms of contemporary social reproduction under fully organised
consumerist capitalism by building alternative communities on the basis
of networked households and workers’ associations. But capital’s
strategy to infect social reproduction with consumerism has been both
persistent and long-standing, as well as generously financed by an
advertising and promotional industry that will stop at nothing to get
products sold. ‘Get the women’ was the slogan of the new department
store owners in Second Empire Paris as they sought to acquire more
market power. More recently it has been ‘Get the kids and the younger
the better’ that has dominated much consumerist advertising. If children
are raised sitting in front of a TV or playing computer games or with an
i-Pad, then this has far-reaching implications for their psychological
and cultural attitudes, their mental conceptions of the world and their
possible future political subjectivities. Reproduction is a vexed
problem, says Katz, in part because it is so highly focused on the
reproduction of ‘the very social relations and material forms that are
so problematic’. For this reason, social reproduction is unlikely to be
a source of revolutionary sentiments. Yet so much rests upon it,
including oppositional politics.

The ubiquity of social reproduction makes it a central standpoint from
which to construct a critique of capital in one of its most insidious
forms. This was precisely Henri Lefebvre’s project in writing his
multi-volume _Critique of Everyday Life_.¹¹ He here set out to provide a
critique of individuality (the ‘private’ consciousness and
individualism); a critique of money (which he understood in terms of
fetishism and economic alienation); a critique of needs (psychological
and moral alienation from consumerism though not, of course, from
necessary consumption); a critique of work (alienation of the worker);
and, last but not least, a critique of the concept and ideology of
freedom (the power over nature and over human nature).

This points us towards a political form of anti-capitalist responses to
what has happened to daily life under capitalism and what has so
transformed social reproduction. The negation of multiple alienations
must be the cutting edge in any collective political response to the
degradations of daily life and the loss of autonomy in social
reproduction at the hands of capital and the capitalist state. This does
not imply that the only response to this situation is the isolated
individual household doing whatever it will. The alternative is the
embedding of households in a social network for purposes of managing and
advancing a common life replete with ‘civilised’ values. We will take up
this alternative in the conclusion. Meanwhile, Lefebvre’s last point –
the critique of freedom – also calls for careful attention, for it lies
at the crux of yet another of capital’s major contradictions, as we
shall see in the study of Contradiction 14.

But there is one thing that is certain. Any so-called ‘radical’ strategy
that seeks to empower the disempowered in the realm of social
reproduction by opening up that realm to monetisation and market forces
is headed in exactly the wrong direction. Providing financial literacy
classes for the populace at large will simply expose that population to
predatory practices as they seek to manage their own investment
portfolios like minnows swimming in a sea of sharks. Providing
microcredit and microfinance facilities encourages people to participate
in the market economy but does so in such a way as to maximise the
energy they have to expend while minimising their returns. Providing
legal title for land and property ownership in the hope that this will
bring economic and social stability to the lives of the marginalised
will almost certainly lead in the long run to their dispossession and
eviction from that space and place they already hold through customary
use rights.


Contradiction 14


Freedom and Domination

Stone walls do not a prison make,

Nor iron bars a cage;

Minds innocent and quiet take

That for an hermitage;

If I have freedom in my love

And in my soul am free,

Angels alone, that soar above,

Enjoy such liberty.

So wrote Richard Lovelace in his much-cited poem written from prison to
his lover Althea. Lovelace had been thrown into prison in 1642 for
petitioning Parliament to have a law regulating the clergy repealed. He
was jailed for exercising his freedom to petition Parliament. The timing
is important. It was during the first phase of the English Civil War
that curbed the power of the established Church and culminated in the
execution of King Charles I. It was a time when, as the historian
Christopher Hill puts it, the world was ‘being turned upside down’ by
political, religious and social movements that sought a way to relate
powerful ideas and ideologies about individual rights and liberty and
the management of collective and common interests for the supposed
common good (about which there was plenty of disagreement).¹ Whatever
the disagreements, the divine right of kings and of the established
Church (though not of the dissenters) was under fierce attack. But what
sort of body politic could and might replace it and with what freedoms?

The sentiments expressed in Lovelace’s poem are very much alive and
well. Most of us socialised into the ways of capital believe we are
blessed with a capacity for freedom of thought no matter what walls and
barriers surround us. We can easily imagine a situation or even a world
that is different from that which we currently inhabit. We can even
imagine active steps by which our world can be remade in a different
image. And if we are free to imagine alternatives, why cannot we freely
struggle to make our imaginings reality, even as we recognise that the
historical and geographical circumstances may not be particularly
propitious for proposing and pursuing alternatives? It is not only
followers of the right-wing libertarian novelist Ayn Rand who hold to
this view. Radicals of all stripes, including Marx, willingly subscribe
to it. After all, says Terry Eagleton in _Why Marx Was Right_, ‘the free
flourishing of individuals is the whole aim of his politics, as long as
we remember that these individuals must find some way of flourishing in
common’.² What separates Rand from Marx is that the latter saw the true
flourishing of individual creativity (an ideal that goes back to
Aristotle’s conception of the good life) as best accomplished through
collaboration and association with others in a collective drive to
abolish the barriers of scarcity and material necessity beyond which,
Marx held, the true realm of individual freedom could begin.

But behind all this there lurks an awkward question: is there something
about the contemporary meaning and definition of freedom that stops
short of embracing anti-capitalist alternatives? Will I, like Lovelace,
end up in jail for freely pursuing such alternatives? Do we operate,
almost without knowing it, with some partial, debased and in the end
imprisoning concepts of liberty and freedom that merely support the
status quo and more deeply instantiate capital’s warped vision of human
rights and social justice? Is the economic engine of capital so
powerfully committed to certain foundational but partial concepts of
liberty and freedom as to preclude anything other than at worst an
entrepreneurial and at best a liberal humanist approach to the crucial
political question of freedom versus domination?

In almost every presidential inaugural address I have ever read, a
dominant theme has been that the United States stands for liberty and
freedom and will not only make any sacrifice and go to any lengths to
counter threats to those freedoms, but also use its power and influence
to promote the spread of liberty and freedom around the world. George
Bush Jr, who repeatedly used the words liberty and freedom in all his
speeches, described in stirring rhetorical terms (as the USA marched
into a trumped-up war against Iraq) the US tradition this way: ‘The
advance of freedom is the calling of our time. It is the calling of our
country. From the Fourteen Points [Woodrow Wilson] to the Four Freedoms
[Theodore Roosevelt] to the Speech at Westminster [Ronald Reagan],
America has put our power at the service of principle. We believe that
liberty is the design of nature. We believe that liberty is the
direction of history. We believe that human fulfillment and excellence
come in the responsible exercise of liberty. And we believe that freedom
– the freedom we prize – is not for us alone. It is the right and
capacity of all mankind.’ In a speech to British parliamentarians at the
Mansion House in London he located the roots of his thinking as follows:
‘We’re sometimes faulted for a naïve faith, that liberty can change the
world: if that’s an error it came from reading too much John Locke and
Adam Smith.’³ While the idea of Bush actually reading these authors is
mind-boggling, the rooting of his arguments in the propositions of early
political economy is, as we shall see, of critical importance.

This concern on the part of the United States to protect liberty and
freedom has, unfortunately, been used systematically to justify the
imperial and neocolonial domination of much of the world. There has been
and is no reluctance on the part of the United States to resort to
coercion and violence in the pursuit of the absolute values of liberty
and freedom. There is a long history of covert operations mounted by the
USA to support coups against democratically elected leaders (Jacobo
Arbenz in Guatemala in 1954, Salvador Allende in Chile in 1973 and more
recently the failed attempt against Hugo Chávez in Venezuela). Closer to
home, we now live in a world of extensive government surveillance of the
private communications of citizens, the cracking of all encrypted codes
by government authorities (so they have access to our bank, medical and
credit card records), all in the name of keeping us free and secure from
the threat of terror. The quest for liberty and freedom provides a
licence, it seems, to engage in a wide range of repressive practices.
The US public at large is either totally oblivious to or so deeply
familiar with this contradiction that it scarcely notices how the
inspiring rhetoric about liberty and freedom which it so readily
embraces is so often paired with some shabby operation of domination
often for narrow venal gain, to say nothing of chronic abuses of human
rights, from Abu Ghraib in Iraq to Guantanamo Bay in Cuba, as well as on
the ground in Afghanistan. Even Amnesty International has openly
condemned the United States for ‘atrocious violations of human rights’
on Guantanamo, a criticism that the US government blithely ignores.
There is, alas, nothing new in reversals of this kind. ‘War is peace.
Freedom is slavery. Ignorance is strength,’ wrote George Orwell in
_Nineteen Eighty-Four_, with the then Soviet Union obviously in mind.

It is tempting in the face of all this to conclude that the political
rhetoric concerning the pursuit of liberty and freedom is a sham, a mask
for hypocrites like Bush to pursue more venal aims of profit,
dispossession and domination. But this would deny the force of that
other history which, from peasant revolts to revolutionary movements
(American, French, Russian, Chinese etc.), to the struggle to abolish
slavery and the fight to liberate whole populations from their chains of
colonial rule, has in the name of freedom wrought a seismic reworking of
the contours of how our world society works. All of this has been going
on while social forces have been extending the field of freedom and
liberty through struggles against apartheid, for civil rights, workers’
rights, women’s rights and the rights of many other minorities (LGBT,
indigenous or disabled populations etc.). All of these struggles have
worked their way through the history of capitalism in myriad ways to
transform our social world. When protesters against tyrannical rule
planted liberty trees, the gesture was more than empty. When the cry
demanding ‘freedom now’ echoes in the streets, then the ruling social
order has to tremble or concede something, even if what it offers turns
out to be of little more than symbolic value.

The popular desire for liberty and freedom has been a powerful motive
force throughout capital’s history. That quest will not easily die no
matter how much it may get banalised and degraded in the rhetoric of the
ruling classes and their political representatives. But there is a dark
side to this coin. At some point in their trajectory (particularly the
closer they come to achieving their aims) all these progressive
movements have to decide who or what has to be dominated to secure the
liberty and freedom that they seek. In revolutionary situations
somebody’s ox gets gored and the question then is whose and why? Poor
Lovelace ends up in jail and that seems unfair. The Terror was launched
in the French Revolution in the cause of consolidating ‘liberty,
equality, fraternity’. The hopes and dreams of generations of communist
insurgents have crashed on the rocks of this contradiction as the
promise of human emancipation crumbles into the dust of bureaucratised
and sclerotic state management backed by an apparatus of police-state
repression. Similarly, the denizens of post-colonial societies who truly
believed that a struggle for national self-liberation and freedom would
lead to an immense growth in the domain of freedom now live in a state
of disillusionment if not fear for the future of their freedoms. South
Africa, after years of fierce struggle against apartheid, is no better
off now than it ever was in achieving basic freedoms from want and need.
In some parts of the world, like Singapore, individual freedoms are
strictly limited, traded away, as it were, for rapidly increasing
material well-being.

There is, plainly, a whale of a contradiction here. Freedom and
domination go hand in hand. There is no such thing as freedom that does
not in some way have to deal in the dark arts of domination. Domination
over one’s own fears in the face of overwhelming odds, over cynics and
doubters, to say nothing of external enemies, may be necessary to open
the way to greater freedoms. This unity of freedom and domination is, as
always, a contradictory unity. Unjust means may be required to prosecute
a just cause.

The two polar terms of freedom and domination lie at the extremes of a
contradiction that takes many subtle and nuanced, to say nothing of
disguised, forms (domination can be masked as consent or be established
by persuasion and ideological manipulation). But I prefer to stick with
the flagrant and most disturbing language precisely because to ignore
its potential consequences lies at the root of the disillusionment of
millions who have faithfully struggled for freedom, sometimes at the
cost of their lives, only to find their descendants swimming in the dark
waters of yet another form of domination. Any struggle for freedom and
liberty must be prepared to confront at the very outset that which it is
prepared to dominate. It also has to recognise that the price of
maintaining its freedoms is eternal vigilance against the return of
either old or new forms of domination.

This is where the references to John Locke and Adam Smith are relevant.
For what classical liberal political economy proposed was not only some
sort of utopian model for a universalised capitalism but a certain
vision of individual liberty and freedom that ultimately came to
underpin, as the French philosopher Michel Foucault acutely notes, a
self-regulatory structure of governance that placed limits on the
arbitrariness of state power at the same time as it led and enabled
individuals to regulate their own conduct according to the rules of a
market society.⁴ The domination and disciplining of self were
internalised within the individual. This meant that the dominant
conceptions of freedom and liberty were and still are deeply embedded in
the social relations and codes characteristic of market exchange based
on private property and individual rights. These exclusively defined the
realm of freedom and any challenge to them had to be ruthlessly put
down. The social order was constituted by what Herbert Marcuse called
‘repressive tolerance’: there were strict boundaries beyond which one
was never supposed to venture, no matter how pressing the cause of
furthering liberty and freedom, at the same time as the rhetoric of
tolerance was deployed to get us to tolerate the intolerable.⁵

The only surprising thing about all this is that we get surprised when
we notice and think about it. After all, is it not obvious that the
violence and domination of the state necessarily have to stand behind
the freedoms of the market? In the theory and practices of the liberal
state that gradually emerged from the eighteenth century onwards, the
guiding idea was that the state should be self-limiting in its
interventions, that it should practise laissez-faire with respect to
individual and particularly entrepreneurial practices in the
marketplace, not out of paternalistic benevolence but out of
self-interest in maximising the accumulation of monetary wealth and
power within its sovereign jurisdiction. That the state frequently
overreaches in its regulatory and interventionist activities is a common
complaint among inhabitants and, of course, a standard complaint from
capital. And from time to time political movements such as the Tea Party
in the United States arise with a clear mission to roll back state
intervention no matter whether that interventionism is benevolent or
not. It is time, say libertarian critics, for the nanny state to be gone
and the true reign of individual liberty and freedom to begin.

Karl Polanyi understood these relations all too well, though from the
other side of the political argument. ‘The passing of market-economy,’
he hypothetically wrote, ‘can become the beginning of an era of
unprecedented freedom. Juridical and actual freedom can be made much
wider and more general than ever before; regulation and control can
achieve freedom not only for the few, but for all. Freedom, not as an
appurtenance of privilege, tainted at the source, but as a prescriptive
right extending far beyond the narrow confines of the political sphere
into the intimate organization of society itself. Thus will old freedoms
and civil rights be added to the fund of new freedom generated by the
leisure and security that industrial society offers to all. Such a
society can afford to be just and free.’

The difficulty of achieving this extension of the realm of freedom lay
in the class interests and the entrenched privileges that attach to
great concentrations of wealth. The affluent classes, secure in their
own freedoms, resist any restrictions on their actions, claim they are
being reduced to the status of a slave to socialist totalitarianism and
ceaselessly agitate for the extension of their own particular freedoms
at the expense of others. ‘Free enterprise and private ownership are
declared to be essentials of freedom. No society built on other
foundations is said to deserve to be called free. The freedom that
regulation creates is denounced as unfreedom; the justice, liberty and
welfare it offers are decried as a camouflage of slavery … This means
the fullness of freedom for those whose income, leisure and security
need no enhancing, and a mere pittance of liberty for the people, who
may in vain attempt to make use of their democratic rights to gain
shelter from the owners of property.’⁶ Thus does Polanyi construct a
telling rebuttal to the central theses of Friedrich Hayek’s _Road to
Serfdom_, written in 1942–3 but to this day a bible of the libertarian
right and a mightily influential text (having sold more than 2 million
copies).

Clearly at the root of the dilemma lies the meaning of freedom itself.
The utopianism of liberal political economy ‘gave a false direction to
our ideals,’ notes Polanyi. It failed to recognise that ‘no society is
possible in which power and compulsion are absent nor a world in which
force has no function’. By clinging to a pure free-market view of
society it ‘equated economics with contractual relationships, and
contractual relations with freedom’.⁷ This is the world that libertarian
Republicans construct. It is also the view of individual liberty and
freedom embraced by much of the anarchist and autonomista left, even as
the capitalist version of the free market is roundly condemned. It is
impossible to escape the contradictory unity of freedom and domination
no matter what politics are espoused.

The political consequence was, Polanyi argued, that ‘neither voters, nor
owners, neither producers, nor consumers could be held responsible for
such brutal restrictions of freedom as were involved in the occurrence
of unemployment and destitution’. Such conditions were the result of
natural causes beyond anyone’s control and for which no one in
particular was responsible. The obligation to do anything about such
conditions could be ‘denied in the name of freedom’.⁸ The House of
Representatives in the United States with its Republican majority can
happily vote to cut off food stamp aid to an increasingly impoverished
population (while affirming the subsidies paid out to agribusiness) in
the name of supporting the cause and increasing the realm of freedom. We
cannot, Polanyi concluded, approach the question of freedom without
first discarding the utopian vision of classical political economy and
much of its cognate libertarian politics. Only then could we come ‘face
to face with the reality of society’ and its contradictions. Otherwise,
as is today most spectacularly the case, our freedoms are contingent on
the denial of social reality. This denial of reality is what most
right-wing discourses, such as that of President Bush, accomplish so
precisely.

The inner connection between conceptions of liberty and freedom and
capital, mediated through the utopian writings of the political
economists, should not be surprising. After all, the extraction of
surpluses from labour presupposes the domination and the relative
unfreedom of labour under the rule of capital. As Marx ironically noted,
labourers are free in the double sense: they are free to sell their
labour power to whomsover they like, at the same time as they have been
freed from control over those means of production (for example, the
land) which would permit them to make a livelihood other than that
defined by wage labour. The historical divorce of labour from access to
the means of production entailed a long and continuing history of
violence and coercion in the name of capital’s freedom of access to wage
labour. Capital also required a freedom to roam the world in search of
profitable possibilities and this required, as we earlier saw, the
eradication or reduction of physical, social and political barriers to
its mobility. ‘Laissez-faire’ and ‘laissez-passer’ became the watchwords
of the capitalist order. This applies not only to mobility but also to
freedom from regulatory interference, except under those circumstances
where external damages to other capitalists or to the economy as a whole
became so totally unacceptable or so dangerous as to mandate state
interventions. The freedom to pillage resources from under the feet of
local and indigenous populations, to displace and despoil whole
landscapes where necessary, to stretch the use of ecosystems up to and
in some instances well beyond their capacity to reproduce all became a
key part of capital’s necessary freedoms. Capital demands that the state
protect private property and enforce contracts and intellectual property
rights against the threat of expropriation, except in cases where the
public interest (usually a stalking horse for capital itself) demands.

None of the freedoms that capital needs and demands has passed
uncontested. Indeed from time to time the contestation has been fierce.
Capital’s freedoms clearly rested, many people recognised, on the
unfreedom of others. Both sides, Marx noted, had right on their side, as
capital sought to extract as much labour time as possible from the
workforce while the workers sought to protect their freedom to live
their lives without being worked to death. Between two such rights, Marx
famously said, force decides. But this was the exploitative world that
the political economists justified in the name of a utopian programme of
universal progress that was supposed to redound to the ultimate benefit
of all. But if, said Marx, the true realm of freedom begins when and
where necessity is left behind, then a political economic system that is
based on the active cultivation of scarcity, impoverishment, labour
surpluses and unfulfilled needs cannot possibly allow us entry into the
true realm of freedom, where individual human flourishing for all and
sundry becomes a real possibility. The paradox is that automation and
artificial intelligence now provide us with abundant means to achieve
the Marxian dream of freedom beyond the realm of necessity at the same
time as the laws of capital’s political economy put this freedom further
and further out of reach.

The corrosive power of capital’s economic reasoning sadly works its way
into the heart of deeply felt humanist efforts to extend the realm of
freedom beyond the gated communities in which the rich and wealthy of
this world are increasingly imprisoned. Consider, for example, the
exemplary work of Amartya Sen, who in his book _Development as Freedom_
strives mightily to push economic reason to its humanitarian limits ‘in
the name of freedom’. Sen understands freedom as both process and what
he calls ‘substantive opportunities’. The distinction is important for
it harbours a critique of a traditional welfare statism that treated the
workers and the populace in general as mere objects of policy rather
than as subjects of history. For Sen it is just as important to mobilise
the populace and to develop its capabilities as active agents in
economic development as it is to bring the people to a state where they
have the necessary substantive opportunities (access to material goods
and services) to live a valued life. He notes, correctly I believe, the
many instances in which subjects would willingly trade in substantive
freedoms in order to freely participate in the active and unalienated
pursuit of their own fates and fortunes. Slaves and serfs may have been
substantively better off than wage workers, but the latter would be
unlikely to trade away their relative freedom as wage workers for that
reason. Freedom to participate and to develop one’s own capabilities is
crucial as a means of achieving development. This is far preferable to
substantive changes, however impressive, being imposed and orchestrated
by alien and often paternalistic state powers. Sen uses this perspective
on freedom ‘in the evaluative analysis for assessing change and in the
descriptive and predictive analysis in seeing freedom as a causally
effective factor in rapid change’. These processes of development work
through ‘a variety of social institutions – related to the operation of
markets, administrations, legislatures, political parties,
nongovernmental institutions, the judiciary, the media, and the
community in general’. All of these, Sen argues, can ‘contribute to the
process of development precisely through their effects on enhancing and
sustaining individual freedoms’. Sen seeks an ‘integrated understanding
of the perspective roles of these different institutions and their
interactions’, along with an appreciation of ‘the formation of values
and the emergence of evolution of social ethics’. The result is a
diverse field of freedoms attaching to a variety of institutions and
activities that cannot be reduced to some simple formula ‘of
accumulation of capital, or opening up of markets, or having efficient
economic planning’. The unifying factor here is ‘the process of
enhancing individual freedoms and the social commitment to bring that
about … Development is indeed a momentous engagement with freedom’s
possibilities.’⁹

The problem, of course, is that Sen’s vision, however attractive, is in
the end yet another version of the utopianism of liberal political
economy. Freedom becomes not an end but a means of what Michel Foucault
calls ‘governmentality’. It is _through_ freedom that the
self-discipline of whole populations is managed by state power and it is
that self-discipline that assures conformity and compliance with
bourgeois institutions and ways of life, including, of course,
capitalist class domination in terms of its cumulative wealth and power.
In other words, the end is not in question and does not have to be
challenged in the name of freedom because freedom is incorporated in the
process. This is what ‘development as freedom’ means.

Sen depicts a contradiction-free world. He does not recognise the
overwhelming force of the class antagonisms (of the sort that Polanyi
clearly notes), the tense dialectical relation between freedom and
domination, the power of private persons to appropriate social wealth,
the contradictions of use and exchange value, of private property and
the state. To be sure, the oppositions get mentioned, but all of them,
in Sen’s universe, are manageable. That any of them might become
absolute contradictions and the locus of crisis is ruled out by
assumption or merely put down to bad management. Sen’s laudable and
deeply attractive attempt to ground an unalienated approach to freedom
through process presumes a non-contradictory version of capital’s
universe. This is the utopian universe that Polanyi clearly sees we have
to abandon if we are to bring society into a world where real
substantive freedoms can be achieved instead of an idea of freedom that
denies social reality.

I do not pick on Sen for arbitrary reasons. Of all the economists he has
gone as far as possible, it seems to me, in exploring the possibilities
for the extension of freedom by way of a regulated and socially
responsible form of market capitalist development evaluated against
noble humanist ideals as opposed to crass measures of development. But
his core belief, for which he can provide no definitive evidence, lies
in the idea that the market system, properly regulated and managed, is a
just and efficient way of fulfilling human wants and needs and that it
can produce freedom from want in a free way. The contradictions inherent
in the money form are nowhere to be seen even as the moneylenders are
daily ravaging the livelihoods of impoverished populations throughout
his beloved India. This is the kind of liberal humanism that dominates
in the world of the NGOs and philanthropic organisations seriously
committed in their heads and their hearts to the eradication of poverty
and disease but with no real idea of how to do it.

In an astonishing and revelatory mea culpa published in the _New York
Times_, Peter Buffett, a composer of music and son of the legendary
billionaire investor Warren Buffett, recounts his encounter with the
world of capitalist philanthropy consequent upon receiving a donation
from his father to set up a charitable foundation some years ago. Early
on, he recounts, he ‘became aware of something I started to call
Philanthropic Colonialism … People (including me) who had very little
knowledge of a particular place would think they could solve a local
problem … with little regard for culture, geography or societal norms.’
Investment managers, corporate leaders and heads of state were all
‘searching for answers with their right hand to problems that others in
the room have created with their left’. Even as philanthropy becomes a
massive business (with 9.4 million people employed giving away $316
billion in the USA alone), the global inequalities continue to spiral
out of control ‘as more lives and communities are destroyed by the
system that creates vast amounts of wealth for the few’. Philanthropy
becomes a form of ‘conscience laundering’ which merely ‘allows the rich
to sleep better at night, while others get just enough to keep the pot
from boiling over. Nearly every time someone feels better by doing good,
on the other side of the world (or street), someone else is further
locked into a system that will not allow the true flourishing of his or
her nature or the opportunity to live a joyful and fulfilled life.’¹⁰
The concordance of Buffett’s aims with those of both Sen and Marx is
striking, as is the sad history of a bourgeois reformism that never
solves social problems, but just moves them around.

The work of this powerful and rapidly growing ‘charitable-industrial
complex’ has been corroded by the application of ever-tighter principles
of capitalist economic rationality. The value of philanthropy is judged,
notes Buffett, ‘as if return on investment were the only measure of
success’. The application of principles of microfinance to an informal
sector reconceptualised as microenterprises endowed with private
property rights may sound economically rational. But, asks Buffett,
‘what is this really about? People will certainly learn to integrate
into our system of debt and repayment with interest. People will rise
above making $2 a day to enter our world of goods and services so they
can buy more. But doesn’t all this just feed the beast?’ Indeed it does.
And it does so at an opportune moment when the realisation of capital is
threatened by flagging effective demand elsewhere and in a way where the
practices of accumulation by dispossession through debt encumbrancy and
debt peonage (and less legal predatory practices) provide a lucrative
supplement to boost the overall rates of return on capital. Sadly,
Buffett here hits the wall of his own conditions of repressive
tolerance. ‘I’m really not calling for an end to capitalism,’ he weakly
concludes, ‘I’m calling for humanism.’ But the practices he is
criticising are exactly what capitalist humanism is all about. The only
answer, which lies well beyond the bounds of the contemporary version of
repressive tolerance, is a revolutionary humanism that confronts the
(capitalist) beast that feeds very well thanks to the freedom it has to
dominate others with its left hand as it seeks to minister to them with
its right.

Marx not only took on the partisan ways in which bourgeois conceptions
of liberty and freedom were deployed against the interests of the common
people. He probed further into the very depths of what true wealth might
mean in a genuinely free society. As he wrote in _Grundrisse_:

When the limited bourgeois form is stripped away, what is wealth other
than the universality of human needs, capacities, pleasures, productive
forces etc., created through universal exchange? The full development of
human mastery over the forces of nature, those of so-called nature as
well as of humanity’s own nature? The absolute working-out of his
creative potentialities … i.e. the development of all human powers as
such the end in itself, not as measured on a _predetermined_ yardstick?
Where he does not produce himself in one specificity, but produces his
totality? Strives not to remain something he has become, but is in the
absolute movement of becoming? In bourgeois economics – and in the epoch
of production to which it corresponds – this complete working-out of the
human content appears as a complete emptying-out, this universal
objectification as total alienation.¹¹

Marx does not avoid in this formulation the question of domination
(‘mastery’). He recognised the force of the contradiction between
freedom and domination in revolutionary situations. Why is it, he asks
in ‘On the Jewish Question’, ‘that the right of man to freedom ceases to
be a right as soon as it comes into conflict with political life,
whereas according to the theory, political life is only the guarantee of
the rights of man, the right of individual man, and so must be given up
as soon as it contradicts its end, these rights of man’? The example
that Marx had in mind was the curbing of press freedoms in the French
Revolution. This posed the ‘riddle’ that ‘still remains to be solved of
why, in the minds of the political emancipators, the relationship is
turned upside down and the end appears as the means and the means as the
end’.¹² Marx got to the heart of the riddle of how freedom became
slavery well before George Orwell.

Marx thought he found the answer in the writings of Rousseau:

He who dares to undertake the making of a people’s institutions ought to
feel capable, so to speak, of changing human nature, of transforming
each individual, who is by himself a complete and solitary whole, into
part of a great whole from which in a manner he receives his life and
being; of altering man’s constitution for the purpose of strengthening
it; and of substituting a partial and moral existence for the physical
existence nature has conferred on us all. He must, in a word, take away
from man his own resources and give him instead new ones alien to him,
and incapable of being made use of without the help of other men.¹³

In other words, a fully socialised individual acquires a different
political subjectivity, a different conception of what freedom means,
from that of the isolated individual.

While this answer in itself is far too glib to bear the historical
weight that it would have to bear, it does point to a fertile direction
for inquiry. Is human freedom for all better defended by a regime of
exclusionary individual private property rights or by common rights
collectively managed by associated individuals? Are we not faced with a
stark choice at the end of the day between individual freedoms being
mobilised in the cause of capitalist class domination or class struggle
being mobilised by the dispossessed in the cause of greater social and
collective freedoms?

Notice also something important about Rousseau’s formulation that does
double duty in Marx’s thought. Revolutionary transformations involve
creative destruction. Something is lost but something is gained. What
was lost for Rousseau was isolated individualism (which derived from a
state of nature in Rousseau’s theory but which was a political product
of the bourgeois revolution for Marx). Isolated individualism had to
give way in the face of new but ‘alien’ resources. The bourgeoisie had
to be alienated from its individualised past in order for the
dispossessed to gain its disalienated future freedoms. This turns Marx’s
theory of alienation inside out: the moment of alienation is charged
with both positive and negative potential at key moments of
revolutionary transition. There is no such thing as a contradiction that
does not generate potentially contradictory responses.

Marx does not mince words with regard to the need to overthrow (or
‘dominate’) individualistic bourgeois conceptions of wealth and of value
in order to release the potential for creative but collective human
flourishing that surrounds us latently at every turn. Curiously, even
Margaret Thatcher thought there was a difference somewhere here worth
noting, thereby proving that even a viciously conservative grocer’s
daughter with an interest in chemistry is capable of transcendental
thoughts. ‘It is not the creation of wealth that is wrong,’ she said
(though I doubt she explicitly had Marx’s conception of wealth as the
full realisation of all individual human capacities and powers in mind),
‘but the love of money for its own sake.’

The world of true freedom is thoroughly unpredictable. ‘Once the
shackles on human flourishing have been removed,’ Eagleton remarks, ‘it
is far harder to say what will happen. For men and women are then a lot
more free to behave as they wish within the confines of their
responsibility for one another. If they are able to spend more of their
time in what we now call leisure activities rather than hard at work,
their behavior becomes even harder to predict. I say “what we now call
leisure” because if we really did use the resources accumulated by
capitalism to release large numbers of people from work, then we would
not call what they did instead leisure.’ Full advantage could then be
taken of automation and artificial intelligence to actually release
rather than imprison people in meaningless labours. ‘For Marx,’ says
Eagleton, ‘socialism is the point where we begin collectively to
determine our own destinies. It is democracy taken with full seriousness
rather than democracy as (for the most part) a political charade. And
the fact that people are more free means that it will be harder to say
what they will be doing at five o’clock on Wednesday.’¹⁴ But that does
not imply there will then be no need for self-discipline, commitment and
dedication to those complex tasks we might freely choose to undertake
for our own satisfaction as well as for the well-being of others.
Freedom attaches, as Aristotle long ago understood, to the good life and
the good life is an active life dedicated like all of nature to the
perpetual search for novelty. An unalienated version of the dialectic
between freedom and domination is possible in the quest for individuals,
always in association with others, to reach the summit of their
potentialities and powers. But that search for unalienated relations
cannot proceed without the prior experience of alienation and its
contradictory possibilities.


Part Three The Dangerous Contradictions

_The moving contradictions evolve differentially and provide much of the
dynamic force behind capital’s historical and geographical evolution. In
some instances their movement tends to be progressive (though never
without reverses here and setbacks there). Technological change has by
and large been cumulative, as has the geographical production of space,
though in both instances there are strong countercurrents and reversals.
Viable technologies get left behind and fade away, spaces and places
that were once vigorous centres of capitalist activity become ghost
towns or shrinking cities. In other instances the movement is more like
a pendulum, as between monopoly and competition or the balance between
poverty and wealth. And elsewhere, as in the case of freedom and
domination, the movement is more chaotic and random, depending upon the
ebb and flow of political forces in struggle with one another, while in
still other instances, such as the complex field of social reproduction,
the intersections between the historical evolution of capitalism and the
specific requirements of capital are so indeterminate and intermingled
as to make the direction and strength of movement episodic and rarely
consistent. The advances (for such they are) in the rights of women, of
the handicapped, of sexual minorities (the LGBT social group), as well
as of religious groupings that have strict codes on various facets of
social reproduction (such as marriage, family, child-rearing practices
and the like), make it hard to calculate exactly how capital and
capitalism are or are not working with or against each other in terms of
foundational contradictions. And if this is true of the contradictions
of social reproduction, it is even more so in the complex case of
domination and freedom_.

_The patterning of the moving contradictions provides much of the energy
and much of the innovative zest in the co-evolution of both capital and
capitalism and opens a wealth (and I use that word advisedly as meaning
a potential flourishing of human capabilities rather than of mere
possessions) of possibilities for new initiatives. These are the
contradictions and spaces in which hope for a better society is latent
and from which alternative architectures and constructions might
emerge_.

_As in the case of foundational contradictions, the moving_
_contradictions intersect, interact and run interference with each other
in intriguing ways within the totality of what capital is about. The
production of space and the dynamics of uneven geographical development
have been strongly impacted by technological changes in both
organisational forms (for example, of state apparatuses and territorial
forms of organisation) and technologies of transportation and the
production of space. It is within the field of uneven geographical
development that differentiations in social reproduction and in the
balance between freedom and domination flourish to the point where they
in themselves become part of the production of space and of uneven
development. The creation of heterotopic spaces, where radically
different forms of production, social organisation and political power
might flourish for a while, implies a terrain of anti-capitalist
possibility that is perpetually opening and shutting down. It is here
too that questions of monopoly and centralisation of power versus
decentralisation and competition play out to influence technological and
organisational dynamism and to animate geopolitical competition for
economic advantage. And it goes without saying that the balance between
poverty and wealth is constantly being modified by interterritorial
competition, migratory streams and competitive innovations regarding
labour productivities and the creation of new product lines_.

_It is within the framework of these interactive and dynamic
contradictions that multiple alternative political projects are to be
found. Many of these are constituted as distinctive responses of capital
to its own contradictions and are therefore primarily directed to
facilitate the reproduction of capital under conditions of perpetual
risk and uncertainty if not outright crises. But even in these instances
there lie innumerable possibilities for the insertion of initiatives
that so modify the functioning of capital as to open perspectives on
what an anti-capitalist alternative might look like. I believe, as did
Marx, that the future is already largely present in the world around us
and that political innovation (like technological innovation) is a
matter of putting existing but hitherto isolated and separated political
possibilities together in a different way. Uneven geographical
developments cannot but generate ‘spaces of hope’ and heterotopic
situations where new modes_ _of cooperation might flourish, at least for
a while, before they get reabsorbed into the dominant practices of
capital. New technologies (like the internet) open up new spaces of
potential freedom from domination that can advance the cause of
democratic governance. Initiatives in the field of social reproduction
can produce new political subjects desirous of revolutionising and
humanising social relations more generally and cultivating a more
aesthetically satisfying and sensitive approach to our metabolic
relation to nature. To point to all these possibilities is not to say
they will all bear fruit, but it does suggest that any anti-capitalist
politics has to be assiduous in hunting through the contradictions and
ferreting out its own path towards the construction of an alternative
universe using the resources and ideas already to hand_.

_This then brings us to the dangerous, if not potentially fatal,
contradictions. Marx is famously supposed to have said that capital
would ultimately collapse under the weight of its own internal
contradictions. I cannot actually find where Marx said this, and from my
own reading of him I think it extremely unlikely that he would ever have
said such a thing. It presupposes a mechanical breakdown of the economic
engine of capitalism that will occur without any human agent throwing
sand in the machine or militantly setting about halting its progress and
replacing it. Marx’s position, and I broadly follow him in this (against
certain currents in the Marxist/communist tradition, as well as against
the grain of the views his many critics typically attribute to him), is
that capital can probably continue to function indefinitely but in a
manner that will provoke progressive degradation on the land and mass
impoverishment, dramatically increasing social class inequality, along
with dehumanisation of most of humanity, which will be held down by an
increasingly repressive and autocratic denial of the potential for
individual human flourishing (in other words, an intensification of the
totalitarian police-state surveillance and militarised control system
and the totalitarian democracy we are now largely experiencing)_.

_The resultant unbearable denial of the free development of human
creative capacities and powers amounts to throwing away the cornucopia
of possibilities that capital had bequeathed us and squandering the real
wealth of human possibilities in the name of perpetual_ _augmentation of
monetary wealth and the satiation of narrow economic class interests.
Faced with such a prospect, the only sensible politics is to seek to
transcend capital and the restraints of an increasingly autocratic and
oligarchical structure of capitalist class power and to rebuild the
economy’s imaginative possibilities into a new and far more egalitarian
and democratic configuration_.

_The Marx I favour is, in short, a revolutionary humanist and not a
teleological determinist. Statements can be found in his works that
support the latter position, but I believe the bulk of his writings,
both historical and political-economic, support the former
interpretation. It is for this reason that I reject the idea of ‘fatal’
in favour of ‘dangerous’ contradictions, for to call them fatal would
convey a false air of inevitability and cancerous decay, if not of
apocalyptic mechanical endings. Certain contradictions are, however,
more dangerous both to capital and to humanity than others. These vary
from place to place and from time to time. Were we writing about the
future of capital and humanity fifty or a hundred years ago, we would
very likely have focused on different contradictions from those which I
focus on here. The environmental issue and the challenge of maintaining
compound growth would not have called for that much attention in 1945,
when settling the geopolitical rivalries and rationalising processes of
uneven geographical development, all the while rebalancing (through
state interventions) the contradictory unity between production and
realisation, were far more salient questions. The three contradictions I
focus on here are most dangerous in the immediate present, not only for
the ability of the economic engine of capitalism to continue to function
but also for the reproduction of human life under even minimally
reasonable conditions. One of them, but just one of them, is potentially
fatal. But it will turn out so only if a revolutionary movement arises
to change the evolutionary path that the endless accumulation of capital
dictates. Whether or not such a revolutionary spirit crystallises out to
force radical changes in the way in which we live is not given in the
stars. It depends entirely on human volition. A first step towards
exercising that volition is to become conscious and fully aware of the
nature of the present dangers and the choices we face_.


Contradiction 15


Endless Compound Growth

Capital is always about growth and it necessarily grows at a compound
rate. This condition of capital’s reproduction now constitutes, I shall
argue, an extremely dangerous but largely unrecognised and unanalysed
contradiction.

Most people do not well understand the mathematics of compound interest.
Nor do they understand the phenomenon of compounding (or exponential)
growth and the potential dangers it can pose. Even the dismal science of
conventional economics, as Michael Hudson shows in a recent trenchant
commentary, has failed to recognise the significance of compounding
interest on rising indebtedness.¹ The result has been to obscure a key
part of the explanation for the financial disruptions that shook the
world in 2008. So is perpetual compounding growth possible?

In recent times there has been a flurry of worry among some economists
that faith in the long-held supposition of perpetual growth might be
misplaced. Robert Gordon, for example, has suggested in a recent paper
that the economic growth experienced over the last 250 years ‘could well
be a unique episode in human history rather than a guarantee of endless
future advance at the same rate’. His case rests largely on an overview
of the path and effects of innovations in the productivity of labour
which have underpinned the growth of per capita incomes. Gordon joins
with several other economists in thinking that the innovation waves of
the past have been much stronger than the most recent wave, resting on
electronics and computerisation, that began around the 1960s. This last
wave has been weaker in its effects than generally supposed, he argues,
and is in any case now largely exhausted (reaching its apogee in the
dot-com bubble of the 1990s). On this basis, Gordon predicts that
‘future growth in real GDP per capita will be slower than in any
extended period since the late 19th century, and growth in real
consumption per capita for the bottom 99 percent of the income
distibution will be even slower than that’. The inherent weakness of the
last wave of innovations is aggravated in the case of the USA by a
number of ‘headwinds’ that include rising social inequality, problems
deriving from the rising cost and declining quality of education, the
impacts of globalisation, environmental regulation, demographic
conditions (the ageing of the population), rising tax burdens and an
‘overhang’ of consumer and government debt.² But even in the absence of
these ‘headwinds’, Gordon argues, the future would still be one of
relative stagnation compared to the last 200 years.

A component of one of the ‘headwinds’, government debt, has, at the time
of writing, become a political football in the USA (with many echoes
elsewhere). It has been the focus of strident and exaggerated arguments
and claims in the media and in Congress. The supposedly huge and
monstrous burden debt will place on future generations is again and
again invoked to promote draconian cutbacks in state expenditures and
the social wage (as usual, of course, to the benefit of the oligarchy).
In Europe the same argument is used to justify imposing ruinous
austerity on whole countries (like Greece), though it does not take too
much imagination to see how this might also be for the benefit of the
richer countries like Germany and the affluent bondholders more
generally. In Europe democratically elected governments in Greece and
Italy were peacefully overthrown and for a while replaced by
‘technocrats’ who had the confidence of the bond markets.

All of this has made it particularly hard to get a clear-eyed view of
the relation between the compounding of debt obligations, the
exponential growth of capital accumulation and the dangers they pose.
Gordon’s concern, it should be noted, was primarily with per capita GDP.
This looks rather different from aggregate GDP. Both measures are
sensitive to demographic conditions but in very different ways. A casual
inspection of the available historical data on total GDP suggests that
while there has always been a loose relation between wealth and debt
accumulation throughout the history of capital, the accumulation of
wealth since the 1970s has been far more tightly associated with the
accumulation of public, corporate and private debt. The suspicion lurks
that an accumulation of debts is now a precondition for the further
accumulation of capital. If this is the case, then it produces the
curious result that the strenuous attempts on the part of the right-wing
Republicans and analogous groups in Europe (such as the German
government) to reduce if not eliminate indebtedness are mounting a far
graver threat to the future of capital than the working-class movement
has ever posed.

Compounding is, in essence, very simple. I place $100 in a savings
account that pays 5 per cent annual interest. At the end of the year I
have $105, which at a constant rate of interest becomes $110.25 the year
after (the figures are greater if the compounding occurs monthly or
daily). The difference between this sum at the end of the second year
and an arithmetic rate of interest without compounding is very small
(just 25 cents). The difference is so small it is hardly worth bothering
with. For this reason it easily escapes notice. But after thirty years
of compounding at 5 per cent I have $432.19 as opposed to the $250 I
would have if I was accumulating at a 5 per cent arithmetic rate. After
sixty years I have $1,867 as compared to $400 and after 100 years I have
$13,150 instead of $600. Notice something about these figures. The
compound interest curve rises very slowly for quite a while (see Figures
1 and 2) and then starts to accelerate and by the end of the curve it
becomes what mathematicians refer to as a singularity – it sails off
into infinity. Anyone with a mortgage experiences this in reverse. For
the first twenty years of a thirty-year mortgage the principal still
owed declines very slowly. The decline then accelerates and over the
last two or three years the principal diminishes very rapidly.

There are a number of classic anecdotes to illustrate this quality of
compounding interest and exponential growth. An Indian king wished to
reward the inventor of the game of chess. The inventor asked for one
grain of rice on the first square of the chessboard and that the amount
be doubled from one square to the next until all the squares were
covered. The king readily agreed, since it seemed a small price to pay.
The trouble was that by the time it came to the twenty-first square more
than a million grains were required and after the forty-first square
(which required more than a trillion grains) there simply was not enough
rice in the world to cover the remaining squares. One version of the
story has the king so angry at being tricked that he had the inventor
beheaded. This version of the story is salutary. It illustrates the
tricky character of compounding interest and shows how easy it is to
underestimate its hidden power. In the later stages of compounding the
acceleration takes one by surprise.

Figure 1 COMPOUND INTEREST VS. SIMPLE INTEREST

[image]

Figure 2 A TYPICAL ‘S’ CURVE

[image]

An example of the dangers of compound interest is illustrated by the
case of Peter Thelluson, a wealthy Swiss merchant banker living in
London, who set up a trust fund of £600,000 that could not be touched
for 100 years after he died in 1797. Yielding 7.5 per cent at a compound
rate, the fund would have been worth £19 million (far in excess of the
British national debt) by 1897, when the money could be distributed to
his fortunate descendants. Even at 4 per cent, the government of the
time calculated that the legacy would be equivalent to the entire public
debt by 1897. The compounding of interest would produce immense
financial power in private hands. To prevent this, a bill was passed in
1800 limiting trusts to twenty-one years. Thelluson’s will was contested
by his immediate heirs. When the case was finally decided in 1859, after
many years of active litigation, it turned out that the entire legacy
had been absorbed by legal costs. This was the basis for the celebrated
case of Jarndyce versus Jarndyce in Charles Dickens’s novel _Bleak
House_.³

The end of the eighteenth century saw a flurry of excited commentary
about the power of compound interest. In 1772 the mathematician Richard
Price, in a tract that later drew Marx’s amused attention, wrote: ‘money
bearing compound interest increases at first slowly. But, the rate of
increase being continuously accelerated, it becomes in some time so
rapid, as to mock all the powers of the imagination. One penny, put out
at our Saviour’s birth to 5 per cent compound interest, would, before
this time, have increased to a greater sum, than would be contained in
one hundred and fifty millions of earths, all solid gold. But if put out
to simple interest, it would, in the same time, have amounted to no more
than seven shillings and fourpence halfpenny.’⁴ Notice once more the
element of surprise at how compound growth can produce results that
‘mock all the powers of the imagination’. Are we too about to be shocked
at what compounding growth can lead to? Interestingly, Price’s main
point (in contrast to the current crop of alarmists) was how easy it
would be to retire the existing national debt (as the Thelluson example
also showed) by putting the powers of compound interest to work!

Angus Maddison has painstakingly attempted to calculate the rate of
growth in total global economic output over several centuries.
Obviously, the further back he goes, the shakier the data.
Significantly, the data before 1700 increasingly relies on using
population estimates as a surrogate for total economic output. But even
in our own times there are good reasons to challenge the raw data,
because it includes a number of ‘gross national bads’ (such as the
economic consequences of traffic accidents and hurricanes). There has
been significant agitation by some economists to change the basis of
national accounting on the grounds that many of the measures are
misleading. But if we stick with Maddison’s findings, then capital has
been growing at a compound rate since 1820 or so of 2.25 per cent. This
is the global average figure.⁵ Clearly there have been times when (for
example, the Great Depression) and places where (for example,
contemporary Japan) the growth rate has been negligible or negative,
while at other times (such as the 1950s and 1960s) and in other places
(such as China over the last twenty years) the growth has been much
higher. This average is slightly below what seems to be a generally
accepted consensus figure in the financial press and elsewhere of 3 per
cent as a minimum acceptable rate of growth. When growth falls below
that norm the economy is described as sluggish and when it goes below
zero this is taken as an indicator of recession or, if prolonged, of
depression conditions. Growth that goes much above 5 per cent, on the
other hand, is typically taken in ‘mature economies’ (that is, not
contemporary China) as a sign of ‘overheating’, which always comes with
the threat of runaway inflation. In recent times, even across the
‘crash’ years of 2007–9, global growth kept fairly steady, close to 3
per cent or so, though most of it was in emerging markets (such as
Brazil, Russia, India and China – the BRIC countries in short). The
‘advanced capitalist economies’ fell to 1 per cent growth or below from
2008 to 2012.

In 1820, Maddison calculates, global output was worth $694 billion in
1990 constant dollars (‘billion’ on the US scale, meaning 1,000
million). By 1913 it had risen to $2.7 trillion (on the US scale a
trillion is 1,000 billion); in 1973 it stood at $16 trillion and by 2003
nearly $41 trillion. Bradford DeLong gives different estimates, starting
with $359 billion in 1850 (in 1990 constant dollars) rising to $1.7
trillion in 1920, $3 trillion in 1940, $12 trillion in 1970, $41
trillion in 2000 and $45 trillion in 2012. DeLong’s figures suggest a
lower initial base and a somewhat higher rate of compound growth. While
the figures are quite different (testifying to how difficult and often
arbitrary these estimates are), in both cases the effect of compounding
growth (with considerable temporal and geographical variation) is
clearly visible.⁶

So let us take a 3 per cent compound rate of growth as the norm. This is
the growth rate that permits most if not all capitalists to gain a
positive rate of return on their capital. To keep to a satisfactory
growth rate right now would mean finding profitable investment
opportunities for an extra nearly $2 trillion compared to the ‘mere’ $6
billion that was needed in 1970. By the time 2030 rolls around, when
estimates suggest the global economy should be more than $96 trillion,
profitable investment opportunities of close to $3 trillion will be
needed. Thereafter the numbers become astronomical. It is as if we are
on the twenty-first square of the chessboard and cannot get off. It just
does not look a feasible growth trajectory, at least from where we sit
now. Imagined physically, the enormous expansions in physical
infrastructures, in urbanisation, in workforces, in consumption and in
production capacities that have occurred since the 1970s until now will
have to be dwarfed into insignificance over the coming generation if the
compound rate of capital accumulation is to be maintained. Take a look
at a map of the city nearest you in 1970 and contrast it with today and
then imagine what it will look like when quadrupled in size and density
over the next twenty years.

But it would be a serious error to assume that human social evolution is
governed by some mathematical formula. This was the big mistake made by
Thomas Malthus when he first advanced his principle of population in
1798 (roughly the same time when Richard Price and others were
celebrating – if that is the right word – the power of exponential
growth in human affairs). Malthus’s arguments are directly relevant to
the issue at hand, while they also provide a cautionary tale. He argued
that human populations, like all other species, had the tendency to
increase at an exponential (that is, compounding) rate, while food
output could at best increase only arithmetically given the conditions
of agricultural productivity then prevailing. Diminishing returns on the
application of labour in agriculture were likely to make the gap between
rates of population expansion and food supply even greater over time.
The widening gap between the two curves was taken as a measure of the
increasing pressure of population on resources. As the gap increased,
the inevitable result would be, Malthus argued, famine, poverty,
epidemics, war and increasing pathologies of all kinds for the mass of
humankind. These would act as brutal checks to keep population growth
within the bounds dictated by supposedly natural carrying capacities.
Malthus’s dystopian predictions did not come to pass. In recognition of
this, Malthus later broadened his principles to include changes in human
demographic behaviour, the so-called ‘moral restraints’, such as later
age of marriage, sexual abstinence and (tacitly) other techniques for
population limitation. These would dampen if not reverse any tendency
towards exponential population growth.⁷ Malthus likewise failed
miserably to anticipate the industrialisation of agriculture and the
rapid expansion of global food production through colonisation of
hitherto unproductive lands (particularly in the Americas).

By invoking the tendency towards the exponential growth of capital
accumulation, are we in danger of repeating Malthus’s mistake of
assuming human evolution conforms to a mathematical formula, rather than
reflecting fluid and adaptable human behaviours? If so, are there ways
in which capital has been and is adapting to accommodate disparities
between an accumulation process that is necessarily exponential (if that
is indeed the case) and the conditions that might limit the capacity for
exponential growth?

There is, however, a prior consideration that needs to be addressed. If
population is growing exponentially (as Malthus supposed), then the
economy has to grow at a parallel rate for living standards to be
sustained. So what, then, is the relation between demographic
trajectories and the dynamics of capital accumulation?

Currently, the only countries that are increasing their populations at a
3 per cent compound rate of growth or more are in Africa, South Asia and
the Middle East. Negative population growth rates are found in Eastern
Europe, while Japan and much of Europe have such low growth rates that
they are not reproducing themselves. In these last cases economic
problems are arising because of lack of domestic labour supply and
because of the increasing burden of supporting ageing populations. A
smaller and often declining workforce has to produce sufficient value to
pay pensions to an increasing retired population. This relation
continues to be important in certain parts of the world. Early on in
capital’s history, rapid population growth or a vast reserve of untapped
and yet-to-be urbanised wage labour unquestionably helped to fuel rapid
capital accumulation. Indeed, a plausible case can be made that
population growth from the early seventeenth century on was a
precondition for capital accumulation. The role of what Gordon calls
‘the demographic dividend’ in fostering economic growth was clearly
important in the past and continues to be so. The vast inflow of women
into the labour force in North America and Europe after 1945 is one case
in point, but this is something that cannot be repeated. The world’s
labour force expanded by 1.2 billion between 1980 and 2009, nearly half
of that growth coming from India and China alone. This too will be hard
to repeat. But in many parts of the world this relation between rapid
population growth and rapid capital accumulation is beginning to break
down, as population growth conforms to an S-shaped curve that starts
flat and then accelerates exponentially upwards before rapidly slowing
down to become flat, with zero or even negative population growth (for
example, in Italy and Eastern Europe). It is into this demographic
vacuum of zero growth in some parts of the world that strong migration
streams are drawn (though not without social disruptions, political
resistances and a lot of cultural conflict).

While population projections even in the medium term are a particularly
tricky proposition (and the projections change rapidly from year to
year), the hope is that the global population will stabilise during this
century and peak at no more than 12 billion or so (perhaps as low as 10
billion) by the end of the century and thereafter achieve a steady state
of zero growth. Clearly this is an important issue in relation to the
dynamics of capital accumulation. In the United States, for example, job
creation since 2008 has not kept pace with the expansion of the labour
force. The falling unemployment rate reflects a shrinkage in the
proportion of the working-age population seeking to participate in the
labour force. But whatever happens, it is pretty clear that capital
accumulation in the long-term future can rely less and less upon
demographic growth to sustain or impel its compound growth and that the
dynamics of production, consumption and realisation of capital will have
to adjust to these new demographic circumstances. When this might happen
is hard to say, but most estimates suggest that the vast increase in the
global wage labour force that occurred after 1980 or so will be hard to
replicate once it exhausts itself after 2030 or so. In a way this is
just as well, given that, as we have seen, technological change is
tending to produce larger and larger redundant and even disposable
populations among the less skilled.⁸ The gap between too few high-skill
workers and a massive reserve of unemployed and increasingly
unemployable medium- and low-skill workers appears to be widening, while
the definition of skills is evolving rapidly.

So would it be possible for capital accumulation to move beyond the
exponentials it has exhibited over the past two centuries on to a
similar S-shaped trajectory as has occurred in the demographics of many
countries, culminating in a zero-growth, steady-state capitalist
economy? The answer to this prospect is a resounding no, and it is vital
to understand why. The simplest reason is that capital is about profit
seeking. For all capitalists to realise a positive profit requires the
existence of more value at the end of the day than there was at the
beginning. That means an expansion of the total output of social labour.
Without that expansion there can be no capital. A zero-growth capitalist
economy is a logical and exclusionary contradiction. It simply cannot
exist. This is why zero growth defines a condition of crisis for
capital. If prolonged, zero growth of the sort that prevailed in much of
the world in the 1930s spells the death knell of capitalism.

How, then, can capital continue to accumulate and expand in perpetuity
at a compound rate? How can it do so when it seems to entail a doubling
if not tripling in the size of the astonishing physical transformations
that have been wrought across planet earth over the last forty years.
The dramatic industrialisation and urbanisation of China over those
years is a foretaste of what would have to be accomplished to keep
capital accumulation going in the future. For much of the last century
large parts of the world were attempting to mimic the growth path of the
United States. In the coming century most of the world would have to
mimic the growth path of China (with all its ghastly environmental
consequences), which would be impossible for the United States and
Europe and unthinkable almost everywhere else (apart from, say, Turkey,
Iran and some parts of Africa). Throughout these last forty years, it is
worth remembering also that there have been multiple traumatic crises,
usually localised, cascading around the world, from South-East Asia and
Russia in 1998 through Argentina in 2001 to the almighty global
financial crash of 2008 that shook the world of capital to its very
roots.

But it is here that the cautionary tale of Malthus’s mistaken dystopian
vision ought to give us pause. We need to ask: in what ways can capital
accumulation change its spots to adapt to what appears a critical
situation in order to reproduce itself? There are, in fact, a number of
key adaptations that are already occurring. Can the difficulties be
staved off and if so can they do so indefinitely? What behavioural
adaptations, akin to Malthus’s ‘moral restraints’ (though the term
‘moral’ will hardly end up being appropriate), might reshape the
accumulation dynamic while preserving its necessary essence of
compounding growth?

There is one form that capital takes which permits accumulation without
limit and that is the money form. This is so only because the money form
is now unchained from any physical limitations such as those imposed by
the money commodities (the metallic moneys like gold and silver that
originally gave physical representation to the immateriality of social
labour and which are largely fixed in terms of their global supply).
State-issued fiat moneys can be created without limit. The expansion of
the contemporary money supply is now accomplished by some mix of private
activity and state action (via the state–finance nexus as constituted by
treasury departments and central banks). When the US Federal Reserve
engages in quantitative easing it simply creates as much liquidity and
money as it wants at the drop of a hat. Adding a few zeros to the
quantity of money in circulation is no problem. The danger, of course,
is that the result will be a crisis of inflation. This is not occurring
because the Federal Reserve is largely refilling a hole left in the
banking system when trust between the private banks broke down and
interbank lending, which was leveraged into massive money creation
within the banking system, broke down in 2008. The second reason why
inflation is not on the horizon is because organised labour has almost
zero power (given the disposable surplus labour reserves) in these times
to raise wages and thereby influence the price level (though class
struggles in China have raised labour costs there marginally).

But, plainly, the perpetual accumulation of capital at an exponential
rate by way of an exponential creation of money is almost certain to end
in disaster unless accompanied by other adaptations. Let’s go through a
number of these before deciding whether they add up to what a
sustainable future for the reproduction of capital might look like under
conditions of perpetual compound growth.

Capital is not only about the production and circulation of value. It is
also about the destruction or devaluation of capital. A certain
proportion of capital is destroyed in the normal course of capital
circulation as new and cheaper machinery and fixed capital become
available. Major crises are often characterised by creative destruction,
which means mass devaluations of commodities, of hitherto productive
plant and equipment, of money and of labour. There is always a certain
amount of devaluation going on as new plants drive out old before their
lifetime is over, as more expensive items are replaced by cheaper items
because of technological changes. The rapid deindustrialisation of older
industrial districts in the 1970s and 1980s in North America and Europe
is an obvious example. In times of crisis, of war or of natural
disasters, the devaluation can be massive. In the 1930s and the Second
World War losses were considerable. Estimates from the IMF suggested
that the net losses worldwide in the financial crisis year of 2008 added
up to close to the value of one whole year’s global output of goods and
services. But large though these losses were, they did little more than
generate a brief pause in the trajectory of compounding growth. In any
case, as property values recovered, particularly in the USA and the UK,
where they had been hit hard during the crisis, so a lot of asset values
were recovered (though, as always, they now lay in the hands of the rich
folk, thereby contributing to the massive regressive redistribution of
wealth that, in the absence of revolutionary interventions, typically
occurs in the course of a crisis). The devaluations would have to be
vastly greater and longer-lasting than those experienced in 2008
(closer, perhaps, to those of the 1930s and 1940s) to really make much
of a difference.

The problem of the uneven development of devaluation and of geopolitical
struggles over who is to bear the cost of devaluation is significant, in
part because it frequently relates to the spread of social unrest and
political instability. So while devaluation does not work very well as
an antidote to compounding growth worldwide, its geographical
concentrations do have a significant bearing on the dynamics of
anti-capitalist sentiment and struggle. The two ‘lost decades’ of
development throughout most of Latin America produced a political
climate of opposition to neoliberalism (though not necessarily to
capital) and this has in turn played an important role in protecting the
region from the worst impacts of the global crisis of devaluation that
broke out in 2008. The differential imposition of losses on, for
example, Greece and southern Europe more generally amounts to a
geographical version of the redistributions of wealth occurring between
rich and poor.

Conversely, privatisation of public assets, the creation of new markets
and further enclosures of the commons (from land and water to
intellectual property rights) have expanded the terrain upon which
capital can freely operate. The privatisation of water provision, social
housing, education and health care and even war making, the creation of
carbon trading markets and the patenting of genetic materials have given
capital the power of entry into many areas of economic, social and
political life that were hitherto closed to it. As an outlet for
compounding growth these additional market opportunities have been
significant, but, as with devaluation, I do not believe they constitute
enough potential to absorb compounding growth, particularly in the
future (they did, I believe, play a significant role in the 1980s and
1990s). Besides, when everything – but everything – is commodified and
monetised, then there is a limit beyond which this process of expansion
cannot go. How close we are to that limit right now is hard to judge but
nearly four decades of neoliberal privatisation strategies have already
accomplished a great deal and in many parts of the world there is not
much left to enclose and privatise. There are, in addition, many signs
of political resistance to the further enclosure and commodification of
life forms beyond where we are now and some of these struggles, against,
for example, water privatisation in Italy and genetic patenting, have
been successful.

Consider, thirdly, the limits that might be encountered with respect to
final consumption and the realisation of capital. One of the ways that
capital has adapted to compound growth has been through radical
transformations in the nature, form, style and mass of final consumption
(aided, of course, by population increases). Economic limits to this are
set by the aggregate effective demand (roughly, wages and salaries plus
bourgeois disposable incomes). Over the last forty years that demand has
been strongly supplemented by private and public debt creation. I focus
here, however, on one important physical limit which is set by the
turnover time of consumer goods: how long do they last and how quickly
do they need to be replaced?

Capital has systematically shortened the turnover time of consumer goods
by producing commodities that do not last, pushing hard towards planned
and sometimes instantaneous obsolescence, by the rapid creation of new
product lines (for example, as in electronics in recent times),
accelerating turnover by mobilising fashion and the powers of
advertising to emphasise the value of newness and the dowdiness of the
old. It has been doing this for the last 200 years or so and
concomitantly produced vast amounts of waste. But the trends have
accelerated, capturing and infecting mass consumption habits markedly
over the last forty years, particularly in the advanced capitalist
economies. The transformations in middle-class consumerism in countries
like China and India have also been remarkable. The sales and
advertising industry is now one of the largest sectors of the economy in
the United States and much of its work is dedicated to the acceleration
of the turnover time of consumption.

But there are still physical limits to how fast the turnover of, say,
cellphones and fashions can be. Even more significant, therefore, has
been the move towards the production and consumption of spectacle, a
commodity form that is ephemeral and instantaneously consumed. Back in
1967 Guy Debord wrote a very prescient text, _The Society of the
Spectacle_, and it almost seems as if the representatives of capital
read it very carefully and adopted its theses as foundational for their
consumerist strategies.⁹ Everything from TV shows and other media
products, films, concerts, exhibitions, sports events, mega-cultural
events and, of course, tourism is included in this. These activities now
dominate the field of consumerism. Even more interesting is how capital
mobilises consumers to produce their own spectacle via YouTube,
Facebook, Twitter and other forms of social media. All of these forms
can be instantaneously consumed even as they absorb vast amounts of what
might otherwise be free time. The consumers, furthermore, produce
information, which is then appropriated by the owners of the media for
their own purposes. The public is simultaneously constituted as both
producers and consumers, or what Alvin Toffler once called
‘prosumers’.¹⁰ There is an important corollary here and this broaches a
theme that we will encounter elsewhere: capital profits not through
investing in production in these spheres but by appropriating rents and
royalties on the use of the information, the software and the networks
it constructs. This is just one of several contemporary indications that
the future of capital lies more in the hands of the rentiers and the
rentier class than in the hands of the industrial capitalists.

These transformations in the field of consumption are what Hardt and
Negri seem to be after when they propose a grand shift of capital’s
operations from the field of material to immaterial labour.¹¹ They argue
that the relation between capital and consumers is no longer mediated by
things but by information, images, messaging and the proliferation and
marketing of symbolic forms that relate to and work on the political
subjectivity of whole populations. This amounts to an attempt by capital
and the state to engage with the biopolitical manipulation of
populations and the production of new political subjects. It has always
been the case, of course, that the kinds of people we are have been
shaped by the commodity world we inhabit. Suburbanites are a special
breed of people whose political subjectivity is shaped by their daily
living experiences in the same way that the imprisoned Italian communist
leader Antonio Gramsci envisaged what he called Americanism and Fordism
producing a new kind of human subject through factory labour.¹² The
contemporary production of ‘new’ political subjects through everything
from subliminal advertising to direct propaganda undoubtedly forms a
vast field for capital investments. To call this ‘immaterial labour’ is
a bit unfortunate, given the vast amount of material labour (and the
crucial importance of material infrastructures) underpinning activities
of this sort, even when they take place in cyberspace and produce their
effect primarily in the minds and beliefs of persons. A vast amount of
material social labour is involved in the production of spectacles (like
the opening ceremonies of Olympic Games, which, you will have noted,
have become grander and grander over time in ways quite consistent with
the argument being made here).

These ideas now circulating about an internal revolution in the dominant
form of capital accumulation parallel much contemporary commentary about
the rise of an ‘information society’ and the development of a
‘knowledge-based’ capitalism. There is, it seems, an urgent need for
many commentators to demonstrate how capital has changed its spots in
recent times. It is perhaps comforting to explain away the recent
stresses within capital as if we are confronting the birth pangs of an
entirely new capitalist order in which knowledge and culture (and
biopolitics, whatever that is) are the primary products rather than
things. While some of this is undoubtedly true, it would be an error to
imagine any radical break with the past and a double error to presume
that the new forms escape the contradictions of compound growth.
Spectacle, for example, has always been an important vehicle for capital
accumulation and when was there ever a form of capital in which superior
knowledge and information were not a source of excess profits? When was
it, furthermore, that debt and finance were irrelevant and why is this
phase of financialisation so different from that which occurred at, say,
the end of the nineteenth century? So while it is true that the
consumption of spectacle, images, information and knowledge is
qualitatively different from the consumption of material commodities
like houses, cars, bread and fashionable clothes, we would err if we
failed to recognise that the rapid expansion of activity in these
spheres is rooted in the futile (and I will explain why I use that word
shortly) necessity of escaping the material constraints to compound
growth. All of these alternative forms are captive to capital’s struggle
to absorb the necessity of its permanent compound growth.

It was, I think, no accident that the limits on money creation set by
tying it to money commodities like gold and silver broke down in the
early 1970s. The pressure of exponential expansion on what was in effect
a fixed global supply of metal was simply irresistible at that moment in
capital’s historical development. Since then we have lived in a world
where the potential limitlessness of money creation can prevail. Before
the 1970s the main avenue for capital was to invest in production of
value and of surplus value in the fields of manufacturing, mining,
agriculture and urbanisation. While a lot of this activity was
debt-financed, the general presumption, which was not incorrect, was
that the debt would ultimately be recuperated out of the application of
social labour to the production of commodities like houses, cars,
refrigerators and the like. Even in the case of the long-term financing
of infrastructures (such as roads, public works, urbanisation) there was
a reasonable presumption that the debt would ultimately be paid off out
of the increasing productivity of the social labour engaged in
production. It could also be reasonably assumed that all of this would
generate increasing per capita incomes. The interstate highway system
built in the United States during the three decades after 1960 had a
huge impact upon aggregate labour productivity and paid off handsomely.
This was, in Robert Gordon’s account, the strongest innovation wave in
capital’s history.¹³

There have always been significant circuits of what can be called
‘fictitious capital’ – investments in mortgages, public debt, urban and
national infrastructures and the like. From time to time these flows of
fictitious capital got out of hand to form speculative bubbles that
ultimately burst to form serious financial and commercial crises. The
legendary railway booms and busts of the nineteenth century, as well as
the land and property market boom in the United States in the 1920s,
were past examples. In promoting these speculative activities,
financiers frequently came up with contorted, innovative (and often
shady) ways to assemble and channel fictitious capitals so as to realise
short-term gains (hedge funds, for example, have long existed) even when
the long-term investments went bad. All sorts of crazy financial schemes
flourished as well, which led Marx to speak of the credit system as ‘the
mother of all insane forms’, while characterising Emile Pereire, a
leading banker in Second Empire France, as having the ‘charming
character of swindler and prophet’.¹⁴ This is not a bad description of
the masters of the universe on Wall Street, men like Lloyd Blankfein,
CEO of Goldman Sachs, who claimed they were only doing God’s business
when being criticised by a congressional committee for not doing the
people’s business properly.

The liberation of money creation from its money-commodity restraints in
the early 1970s happened at a time when profitability prospects in
productive activities were particularly low and when capital began to
experience the impact of an inflexion point in the trajectory of
exponential growth. Where was all the surplus money to go? Part of the
answer lay in lending it out as government debt to developing countries
– a very particular form of fictitious capital circulation – because, as
Walter Wriston famously put it, ‘countries don’t disappear, you always
know were to find them’. But states are not geared up to being
productive enterprises. The consequence a few years later was a
grumbling Third World debt crisis that stretched from 1982 well on into
the early 1990s. It is important to note that this crisis was finally
taken care of by exchanging actual debt obligations that might never be
repaid for so-called ‘Brady Bonds’ backed by the IMF and the US Treasury
that would be repaid. The lending institutions, with a few exceptions,
decided to take the money they could get rather than hold out for the
full amount on the never-never. The bondholders in this case took a
‘haircut’ (usually between 30 and 50 per cent) on the fictitious capital
they had circulated.¹⁵

The other path was to invest the surplus capital not in production but
in the purchase of assets (including debt claims). An asset is simply a
capitalised property title and its value is set in anticipation of
either some future stream of revenue or some future state of scarcity
(for example, of gold or of Picassos). The result of investment flows
into these fields was a general rise in asset values – everything from
land and property, and natural resources (oil in particular of course)
to urban debt and the art market. This was paralleled by the creation of
wholly new asset markets within the financial system itself – currency
futures, credit default swaps, CDOs and a whole range of other financial
instruments that were supposed to spread risk but which in fact
heightened risks in a way that made the volatility of short-term trading
a field for smart speculative gains. This was fictitious capital feeding
off and generating even more fictitious capital without any concern for
the social value basis of the trading. This disconnection could flourish
precisely because the representation of value (money) became
increasingly distant from the value of social labour it was supposed to
represent. The problem was not the circulation of fictitious capital –
that had always been important to the history of capital accumulation –
but that the new channels down which fictitious capitals were moving
constituted a labyrinth of countervailing claims that were almost
impossible to value except by way of some mix of future expectations,
beliefs and outright crazy short-term betting in unregulated markets
with no prospect of any long-term pay-off (this was the famous Enron
story, which was repeated in the collapse of Lehman and the global
financial system in 2008).

Much of the compound growth realised until the financial crash of 2008
was achieved by way of speculative gains out of successive asset bubbles
(the dot-com boom and bust of the 1990s followed by the property market
boom and bust of the 2000s in the USA). This speculative froth
concealed, however, some very important real transitions occurring in
investment behaviours after the 1970s. Some of the assets being
purchased (land and property, natural resources) were secure and
grounded and could be held for long-term gain. This made the booms and
the busts particularly helpful to long-term investors, who could
purchase assets at fire-sale prices in the wake of a crash with the
prospects of making a long-term killing. This is what many of the banks
and foreign investors did during the South-East Asian crisis of 1997–8
and what investors are now doing as they buy up masses of cheap
foreclosed housing in, for example, California to rent out until the
property market revives. This is what the hedge funds do, though under
very different conditions, when they short-sell in fictitious capital
markets.

But what this means is that more and more capital is being invested in
search of rents, interest and royalties rather than in productive
activity. This trend towards a rentier form of capital is reinforced by
the immense extractive power that increasingly attaches to rents on
intellectual property rights to genetic materials, seeds, licensed
practices and the like. Small wonder that the US government has fought
so fiercely through international institutions to protect and forcibly
impose an intellectual property rights regime on others (by way of the
so-called TRIPS agreement within the framework of the World Trade
Organization).

But is all this really sufficient to absorb compound growth? Theories
that rest on a wholesale shift to immaterial production sell a dangerous
illusion that endless compound growth can be accommodated without any
serious material difficulties. Increasing quantities of capital now
circulate in fictitious form and the creation of electronic moneys is in
principle limitless (it is just numbers on a screen). So there is no
barrier to limitless growth there. The economy of spectacle and of
knowledge production as a form of realisation of capital plainly reduces
the rate of expansion of demand for material goods and resources. But
the extensive physical infrastructures required, along with the need to
generate more and more energy in usable form, militate against the idea
that production can ever become immaterial. If consumption is limited to
this immaterial form, then money power cannot be released to low-income
populations, who require basic material goods in order to live. It has
to be concentrated within a relatively small fraction of the population
able to consume in this fictitious way. A repressive oligarchy would
likely be the only political form that capital could assume. This is
where emerging markets, of the sort that flourished in the wake of the
financial crash of 2008, have a distinctive advantage: the markets that
form consequent upon rising output and incomes in middle-income
countries focus far more on tangible wants and needs of an expanding
population. The turn towards immaterial production and spectacle is, as
André Gorz long ago remarked, more like a last gasp of capital rather
than the opening of a new horizon for endless accumulation.

So where does this leave us, faced with the necessity of compound
economic growth for ever without any clear material basis to support
that growth? There are, as we have seen, various adjustments under way,
but the more closely these are examined the more they appear as symptoms
of the underlying problem rather than as signs of or paths towards
long-term solutions. Of course, capital can construct an economy (and to
some degree has already done so) based on a fetish world of fantasy and
imagination built upon pyramiding fictions that cannot last. One final
Ponzi scheme to eclipse all others is a possible scenario. Ironically,
the innovations that are available to us in these times are most easily
applied to increase rather than dampen speculative activity, as the case
of nano-trading on the stock exchange illustrates. Such an economy will,
before any ultimate denouement, be subject to periodic volcanic
eruptions and crashes. Capital will not, under this scenario, end with
either a bang or a whimper but with the sound of innumerable asset
bubbles popping across the uneven geographical landscape of an otherwise
listless capital accumulation. Such disruptions will almost certainly
merge with the outbreaks of popular discontent that bubbles just beneath
the surface of capitalist society more generally. Episodic volcanic
eruptions of popular anger (of the sort seen in London, 2011; Stockholm,
2013; Istanbul, 2013; a hundred Brazilian cities, 2013; etc.) are
already much in evidence. The discontent, it must be remarked, does not
simply focus on the technical failings of capital to deliver on its
promises of a consumer paradise and employment for all, but increasingly
objects to the degrading consequences for anyone and everyone who has to
submit to the dehumanising social rules and codes that capital and an
increasingly autocratic capitalist state dictate.

There is, however, one particularly dark side to this account that rests
upon the contagious impact that compound growth will most likely have on
many if not all the other contradictions here identified. The impact
upon environmental contradictions is likely to be huge, as we shall
shortly see. The ability of capital to rebalance relations between
production and realisation, as well as between poverty and wealth,
becomes less agile, while the gap between money and the social labour it
supposedly represents becomes ever wider as more and more fictitious
capital has to be created at a far higher risk premium to sustain the
compounding growth. It will likewise be extremely hard, if not
impossible, to reverse the commodification, monetisation and
marketisation of all use values without severely curtailing the terrain
for capital accumulation. The reckless push towards speed-up and
consequent devaluations through increasing volatility in uneven
geographical developments will be harder to contain. And so it goes! Far
from constraining each other’s excesses, as has sometimes happened in
the past, the contradictions are far more likely to explode contagiously
with the rising pressure of a necessary compounding growth at their
back. Use values are bound to become an even more trivial consideration
against the background of an explosion of exchange value considerations
in speculative fevers. And from this some rather surprising results may
derive.

There is, for example, one thread of a threat that may be a minor
footnote to my argument, but which has a curious resonance with the
fears expressed about the future of capital by the political economists
of long ago. Capital will end, said Ricardo, when land and natural
resources become so scarce that all revenues will be absorbed either by
the wages needed to cover the high price of food or (what in the end
amounts to the same thing) as rents by an all-powerful but unproductive
rentier class. This unproductive class will so squeeze industrial
capital as to make the latter’s productive operations impossible. A
parasitic class of rentiers will suck industrial capital dry, to the
point where no social labour can be mobilised and no value produced.
Without the production of social value, capital will come to an end. In
making this prediction, Ricardo relied heavily on Malthus’s erroneous
assumptions of diminishing returns to labour on the land. For this
reason later economists generally dismissed the idea of a falling rate
of profit (though Marx tried to keep it alive by appeal to a quite
different mechanism). Keynes, for example, living under very different
circumstances, optimistically looked forward to the euthanasia of the
rentier and the construction of a state-supported regime of perpetual
growth (the possibilities of which were partially realised in the period
after 1945).

What is now so striking is the increasing power of the unproductive and
parasitic rentiers, not simply the owners of land and all the resources
that reside therein, but the owners of assets, the all-powerful
bondholders, the owners of independent money power (which has become a
paramount means of production in its own right), and the owners of
patents and property rights that are simply claims on social labour
freed of any obligation to mobilise that social labour for productive
uses. The parasitic forms of capital are now in the ascendant. We see
their representatives gliding through the streets in limousines and
populating all the upmarket restaurants and penthouses in all the major
global cities of the world – New York, London, Frankfurt, Tokyo, São
Paulo, Sydney … These are the so-called creative cities, where
creativity is measured by how successfully the ‘masters of the universe’
can suck the living life out of the global economy to support a class
whose one aim is to compound its own already immense wealth and power.
New York City has a huge concentration of creative talent – creative
accountants and tax lawyers, creative financiers armed with glitteringly
new financial instruments, creative manipulators of information,
creative hustlers and sellers of snake oil, creative media consultants,
all of which makes it a wondrous place to study every single fetish that
capital can construct. The fact that the only class in the world to
benefit from the so-called economic recovery (such as it is) after 2009
is the top 1 per cent, and that there is no visible protest on the part
of the rest of the population left behind in the economic doldrums, is
testimony to the success of their project. The parasites have won the
battle. The bondholders and the central bankers rule the world. The fact
that their success is bound to be illusory and that they cannot possibly
win the war for capital’s survival scarcely raises a sliver of doubt.
After days spent ‘conscience laundering’ with their philanthropic
colleagues in attempts to correct, as Peter Buffett puts it, with their
right hand the damage they had earlier created with their left, the
oligarchs may sleep well at night. Their inability to see how close they
are sailing to the edge of disaster reminds one of King Louis XV of
France, who is reported to have prophetically said: ‘_Après moi, le
déluge_.’ Capital may not end with a deluge. The World Bank is fond of
reassuring us that a rising tide of economic development is bound to
lift all boats. Maybe a truer metaphor would be that exponentially
rising sea levels and intensifying storms are destined to sink all
boats.


Contradiction 16


Capital’s Relation to Nature

The idea that capitalism is encountering a fatal contradiction in the
form of a looming environmental crisis is widespread in certain circles.
I consider it a plausible but controversial thesis. Its plausibility
largely derives from the accumulating environmental pressures arising
from capital’s exponential growth. There are four main reasons to cast
doubt on the idea.

First, capital has a long history of successfully resolving its
ecological difficulties, no matter whether these refer to its use of
‘natural’ resources, the ability to absorb pollutants or to cope with
the degradation of habitats, the loss of biodiversity, the declining
qualities of air, land and water, and the like. Past predictions of an
apocalyptic end to civilisation and capitalism as a result of natural
scarcities and disasters look foolish in retrospect. Throughout
capital’s history far too many doomsayers have cried ‘wolf’ too fast and
too often. In 1798 Thomas Malthus, as we have seen, erroneously
predicted social catastrophe (spreading famine, disease, war) as
exponential population growth outran the capacity to increase food
supplies. In the 1970s Paul Ehrlich, a leading environmentalist, argued
that mass starvation was imminent by the end of the decade, but it did
not occur. He also bet the economist Julian Simon that the price of
natural resources would soon dramatically increase because of natural
scarcities: he lost the bet.¹ Because such predictions – and there have
been many of them – turned out wrong in the past does not guarantee, of
course, that a catastrophe is not in the making this time. But it does
give strong grounds for scepticism.

Second, the ‘nature’ we are supposedly exploiting and exhausting and
which then supposedly limits or even ‘takes revenge’ on us is actually
internalised within the circulation and accumulation of capital. The
ability of a plant to grow is incorporated, for example, into
agribusiness in its pursuit of profit and it is the reinvestment of that
profit that has the plant growing again the next year. Natural features
and elements are active agents at all points in the process of capital
accumulation. Money flow is an ecological variable and the transfer of
nutrients through an ecosystem may also constitute a flow of value.

While matter can neither be created nor destroyed, its configuration can
be radically altered. Genetic engineering, the creation of new chemical
compounds, to say nothing of massive environmental modifications (the
creation of whole new ecosystems through urbanisation and the fixing of
capital in the farms, fields and factories on the land), now go well
beyond what has been a long history of humanly induced environmental
modifications that have remade the earth in aggregate into a far more
hospitable place for human life and, over the last three centuries, for
profitable activity. Many organisms actively produce a nature conducive
to their own reproduction and humans are no exception. Capital, as a
specific form of human activity, does the same, but increasingly in the
name of capital and not of humanity.

The ‘domination of nature’ thesis that has broadly held sway both in
scientific writings and in the popular imagination since the
Enlightenment (from the writings of Descartes onwards) has no place in
this conceptual scheme. This poses some problems for thinking through
the capital–nature relation. Cartesian thinking wrongly constructs
capital and nature as two separate entities in causal interaction with
each other and then compounds this error by imagining that one dominates
over (or, in the case of nature, ‘takes revenge’ upon) the other. More
sophisticated versions incorporate feedback loops. The alternative way
of thinking proposed here is at first not so easy to grasp. Capital _is_
a working and evolving ecological system within which both nature and
capital are constantly being produced and reproduced. This is the right
way to think of it.² The only interesting questions then are: what kind
of ecological system is capital, how is it evolving and why might it be
crisis-prone?

The ecosystem is constructed out of the contradictory unity of capital
and nature, in the same way that the commodity is a contradictory unity
between use value (its material and ‘natural’ form) and exchange value
(its social valuation). Recall, also, the definition of technology as a
human appropriation of natural things and processes to facilitate
production. The nature that results is something that is not only
evolving unpredictably of its own accord (because of the autonomous
random mutations and dynamic interactions built into the evolutionary
process in general) but actively and constantly being reshaped and
re-engineered by the actions of capital. This is what Neil Smith has
called ‘the production of nature’ and these days it is production ‘all
the way down’ into the level of molecular biology and DNA sequencing.³
The direction this production of nature takes is an open and not a
closed question. It has long been apparent, also, that it is full of
unintended consequences. The refrigerators that facilitated the delivery
of non-contaminated food supplies to burgeoning urban populations were
many years later identified as the source of the chloro-fluorocarbons –
CFCs – that were destroying the stratospheric ozone layer that protects
us from excessive solar radiation!

The third main point is that capital has turned environmental issues
into big business. Environmental technologies are now a big-ticket item
on the world’s stock exchanges. Once this happens, as with the case of
technologies in general, the engineering of the metabolic relation to
nature becomes an autonomous activity relative to actual existing needs.
Nature becomes, again in Neil Smith’s words, ‘an accumulation strategy’.
When, for example, a new medicinal drug is invented or a new way to
reduce carbon emissions is devised, then uses have to be found for them.
This may entail need creation rather than need satisfaction. A drug like
Prozac initially had no disease available for it to address so one had
to be invented, giving rise to the so-called ‘Prozac generation’. The
same ‘combinatorial evolution’ as prevails in the case of technological
change comes into play. New drugs create side effects that require other
drugs to control them and new environmental technologies create
environmental problems that call forth other technologies.

For its own profit, capital seeks to capture the dialectics of how we
can only change ourselves by changing the world (and vice versa). All
ecological and environmental projects are socio-economic projects (and
vice versa). Everything then depends on the purpose of the
socio-economic and ecological projects – the well-being of people or the
rate of profit? In fields like public health and clean water, this
dialectic has worked for the benefit of people, sometimes at the expense
of profits. Popular support for big business environmentalism has
consequently been helpful both to capital and to environmental politics.
Some of this politics is, unfortunately, symbolic rather than
substantive. This is known as ‘greenwashing’ – disguising a
profit-driven project as a project to enhance human welfare. Al Gore’s
great gift to the environmental movement as it sought to do something
about global warming was to create a new market in carbon trading that
has been a grand source of speculative gain for hedge funds but done
little to curb total global carbon emissions. The suspicion lurks that
this was what it was designed to do all along. New organisational forms
developed to conserve fish stocks entail a mode of privatisation that
privileges large-scale financial and corporate capital at the expense of
small-scale fishing.

Fourth, and this is perhaps the most uncomfortable thought of all, it
may be perfectly possible for capital to continue to circulate and
accumulate in the midst of environmental catastrophes. Environmental
disasters create abundant opportunities for a ‘disaster capitalism’ to
profit handsomely. Deaths from starvation of exposed and vulnerable
populations and massive habitat destruction will not necessarily trouble
capital (unless it provokes rebellion and revolution) precisely because
much of the world’s population has become redundant and disposable
anyway. And capital has never shrunk from destroying people in pursuit
of profit. This was true of the recent appalling tragedies of fires and
building collapses in the textile mills of Bangladesh that have claimed
the lives of more than a thousand workers. Toxic waste disposal is
highly concentrated in poor and vulnerable communities (some of the
worst sites in the USA are in Indian reservations) or in impoverished
parts of the world (toxic batteries are taken care of in China in
insalubrious conditions and old ships dismantled at considerable human
cost on the shores of India and Bangladesh). Deteriorating air quality
in northern China is reported to have reduced life expectancy in the
population by more than five years since 1980. Unfair distributions of
environmental damages of this sort may add fuel to an environmental
justice movement. But the resultant social protests do not, as of now,
constitute any major threat to the survival of capital.

The big underlying question is: under what circumstances might these
internal difficulties be dangerous, if not fatal, for the reproduction
of capital? To answer this question we have to understand more fully how
the contradictory unity between capital and nature works. It is helpful
here to look at how the seven foundational contradictions of capital
affect matters. Nature is necessarily viewed by capital – and I must
stress that it may be and is viewed very differently within capitalism
as a whole – as nothing more than a vast store of potential use values –
of processes and things – that can be used directly or indirectly
(through technologies) in the production and realisation of commodity
values. Nature is ‘one vast gasoline station’ (to cite Heidegger) and
natural use values are monetised, capitalised, commercialised and
exchanged as commodities. Only then can capital’s economic rationality
be imposed upon the world. Nature is partitioned and divided up as
private property rights guaranteed by the state. Private property
entails enclosure of nature’s commons. While some aspects of nature are
hard to enclose (such as the air we breathe and the oceans we fish in),
a variety of surrogate ways can be devised (usually with the help of the
state) to monetise and make tradable all aspects of the commons of the
natural world. State interventions are also often developed to correct
for market failures. While these interventions may seem progressive,
their effect is to further promote the penetration of market processes
and market valuations into all aspects of our lifeworld. This is the
case with carbon trading and the growing market in pollution rights and
ecological offsets. When the natural commons are privatised, then all
things, objects and processes therein are assigned a value (sometimes
arbitrarily by bureaucratic fiat) no matter whether any social labour
has been expended on them or not. This is how capital creates its own
distinctive ecosystem.

Private individuals are then free to extract social wealth from their
ownership of a commodified nature. They can even capitalise it as
monetary wealth. This creates a basis for the formation of a potentially
powerful rentier (including landowning) class, which regulates access to
the store of use values by virtue of its class monopoly power and the
rents it extracts from the land. This class ‘owns’ the nature we need in
order to live and it can threaten the perpetuation of capital by
monopolising all wealth for itself. Ricardo (following Malthus) thought
that capital was doomed, as we saw earlier, because profit rates would
inevitably fall as rental extractions and food prices rose. The power of
rentiers is magnified by the fact that many resources, being found in
geographically specific locations, are subject to monopolistic
competition and therefore open for the extraction of monopoly rents.
Urban land and property markets as well as the world of so-called
‘natural’ resources are fecund sites for a flourishing rentier class to
amass more and more wealth and power. This power of the rentier carries
over to that aspect of nature which is internalised within the
circulation of capital as technology. Patents and ownership rights have
been established at the behest of those producing nature in the form of
new technologies. Privately owned genetic materials (for example,
seeds), new methods and even new organisational systems are privately
licensed out to others in return for a monopoly rent. Intellectual
property rights have become a vital field of accumulation over the last
few decades.

The stranglehold that the rentier class (for example, landlords and
owners of mineral, agricultural and intellectual property rights) has
over so-called ‘natural’ assets and resources allows it to create and
manipulate scarcities and to speculate on the value of the assets they
control. This power has long been in evidence. It is now generally
accepted, for example, that almost all famines over the last 200 years
have been socially produced and not naturally ordained. Every time
rising oil prices provoke a chorus of commentary on the natural limits
of ‘peak oil’ it is followed by a period of rueful remorse as it is
realised that it was the speculators and the oil cartel who together
pushed the oil prices up. The ‘land grabs’ now going on around the world
(particularly in Africa) have more to do with escalating competition to
monopolise the food chain and resources with an eye to extracting rents
than with fear of impending natural limits to food production and
mineral extractions. The rising food prices that have sparked so much
unrest in recent times (including the revolutions in North Africa) are
mostly attributable to the ways the exchange value system is being
manipulated for reasons of profitability.

Capital’s conception of nature as a mere objectified commodity does not
pass unchallenged. A perpetual battle ensues between how capital
conceptualises and uses the metabolic relation to nature to construct
its own ecosystem and the different concepts of and attitudes towards
nature held in civil society and even within the state apparatus.
Capital cannot, unfortunately, change the way it slices and dices nature
up into commodity forms and private property rights. To challenge this
would be to challenge the functioning of the economic engine of
capitalism itself and to deny the applicability of capital’s economic
rationality to social life. This is why the environmental movement, when
it goes beyond a merely cosmetic or ameliorative politics, must become
anti-capital. The concept of nature that underpins various philosophies
of environmentalism is radically at odds with that which capital has to
impose in order to reproduce itself. The environmental movement could,
in alliance with others, pose a serious threat to the reproduction of
capital. But so far environmental politics has not, for a variety of
reasons, moved very far in this direction. It often prefers to ignore
entirely the ecology that capital is constructing and nibble at issues
that are separable from the core dynamics of what capital is about.
Contesting a waste dump here or rescuing an endangered species or a
valued habitat there is in no way fatal to capital’s reproduction.

We can now better understand two things. First, how important it is that
capital seizes the environmentalist mantle for itself as the legitimate
foundation for the big businesses environmentalism of the future. In
this way it can dominate ecological discourses – define nature in its
own (usually monetised, with the help of cost benefit analysis) terms –
and seek to manage the capital–nature contradiction in its own broad
class interests. Second, the more dominant the economic engine of
capital is within the various social formations that constitute world
capitalism, the more the rules of capital’s metabolic relation to nature
must dominate public discourses, politics and policies.

On what grounds, then, might I upgrade this question of capital’s
changing metabolic relation to nature to a dangerous, if not potentially
fatal, contradiction? Capital’s successful past negotiation of this
difficulty does not guarantee that things will be the same this time
around. ‘Successful’ is here defined, of course, in capital’s terms and
those are of sustained profitability. This is an important
qualification, because the cumulative negative ecological aspects of
capital’s past adaptations remain with us, including the legacies of
damages inflicted in the past. At each historical step the baseline from
which capital’s ecosystem functions is very different. Much of the
tropical rainforest, for example, is already gone and carbon dioxide
concentrations in the atmosphere have been rising for some time.
Suburbanisation and the suburban lifestyle are expanding (for example,
in China of all places). This way of life is deeply embedded in the
cultural preferences, the psyches of people and in a physical landscape
lubricated by high energy consumption and wasteful use of land, air and
water.

What is different this time is that we are now at a key inflexion point
in the exponential growth rate of capitalist activity. This is having an
exponential impact upon levels of environmental stress and distress
within capital’s ecology. To begin with it puts intense pressure on
commodifying, privatising and incorporating more and more aspects of our
lifeworld (even life forms themselves) into the circuits of capital.
Even genetic identifications are now claimed as private property. It
also leads to an intensification of pressures most notably in areas such
as climate change, loss of habitat diversity and the volatile and
stuttering capacity to assure food security and adequate protections
against new diseases. There are strong indications, I would argue, of an
increasingly cancerous spread and degradation in the qualities of
capital’s ecosystem. Much of this is associated also with rapid
urbanisation and the construction of built environments (sometimes
referred to as a ‘second nature’) of a very low quality (this has been
very much the case in Asia’s rapid recent urbanisation).

The struggle within capital over how to ameliorate its own ecological
conditions is ongoing and sharpening. Ecological effects are typically
experienced by capitalist firms as cost-shifting or as what economists
call ‘externalities’ – defined as real costs for which capital does not
have to pay (for example, the pollution that is unloaded into the
environment or on to others free of charge). Even right-wing economists
recognise that there is a problem of market failure here and that there
is just cause for state interventions, compensatory taxes and regulatory
action. But, as always, uncertainties and unintended consequences attach
to both action and inaction on such issues. The greatest danger is that
necessary action will be delayed by recalcitrant political and corporate
powers and that we might go beyond some irreversible tipping point
before the problem is identified, let alone resolved. The reproductive
cycle of sardine populations off the California coast, for example, was
unknown and overfishing blithely continued in the 1930s to the point of
zero reproduction before anyone realised there might be a problem. The
sardines have never returned.⁴ In the case of the Montreal Protocol, to
take another example, the time horizon was long because the CFCs in the
stratosphere take many years to dissipate. Capital is understandably not
good at dealing with time horizons of this sort. This is one of the big
problems with combating the long-term repercussions of climate change
and the loss of planetary biodiversity.

Under the pressure of continued exponential growth, cancerous
degradation will most likely accelerate. I do not preclude
apocalyptic-seeming moments in this process. The frequency of severe
weather events is increasing, for example. But catastrophic localised
events can readily be accommodated by capital since a predatory
‘disaster capitalism’ is raring to respond. Capital in fact thrives upon
and evolves through the volatility of localised environmental disasters.
Not only do these create new business opportunities. They also provide a
convenient mask to hide capital’s own failings: it is that
unpredictable, capricious and wilful shrew called ‘mother nature’ who is
to blame for misfortunes that are largely of capital’s making. By
contrast, it is the slow, cancerous degradations that are the big
problem for which capital is so ill-prepared and for the management of
which new institutions and powers have yet to be created.

The temporal and geographical scales of capital’s ecosystem have been
shifting in response to exponential growth. Whereas the problems in the
past were typically localised – a polluted river here or a catastrophic
smog there – they have now become more regional (acid deposition,
low-level ozone concentrations and stratospheric ozone holes) or global
(climate change, global urbanisation, habitat destruction, species
extinction and loss of biodiversity, degradation of oceanic, forest and
land-based ecosystems and the uncontrolled introduction of artificial
chemical compounds – fertilisers and pesticides – with unknown side
effects and an unknown range of impacts on land and life across the
whole planet). In many instances local environmental conditions have
improved, while it is the regional and above all the global problems
that have deteriorated. As a result, the capital–nature contradiction
now exceeds traditional tools of management and of action. It relied in
the past on some combination of market forces and state powers to deal
with problems, like the catastrophic London smog of 1952, which produced
remedial action in the shape of Battersea Power Station, which dispersed
the sulphurous pollutants of coal burning into the upper atmosphere
(thus later producing the regional problem of acid deposition in
Scandinavia which required complicated regional cross-national
agreements to manage). Pollution problems do not only get moved around.
They are also resolved by shifting and dispersing them to a different
scale. This was what Larry Summers proposed when chief economist at the
World Bank. Africa, he said, was ‘under-polluted’ and it would make
sense to use it to dispose of the advanced countries’ wastes. To the
degree that so many of the contradictions have already ‘gone global’
over the last decades, so there are fewer and fewer empty spaces (except
for outer-space dumping). This may become a serious problem as compound
growth picks up.

Who now speaks and takes effective action for complex interactive
problems on a global scale? Periodic international meetings to discuss
environmental problems typically go almost nowhere. Occasionally, as in
the cases of acid deposition and CFCs, transnational agreements are
reached so action is not impossible. But these are drops in the bucket
of major problems gradually emerging within capital’s global ecosystem.
If capital does not successfully manage these contradictions it will not
be because of barriers in nature, but because of its own economic,
political, institutional and ideological failings. In the case of
climate change, for example, the problem is not that we do not know what
is happening or that we do not know in very broad terms (complicated
though it may be) what to do. The problem is the hubris and the vested
interests of certain factions of capital (and of certain capitalist
state governments and apparatuses) that have the power to dispute,
disrupt and prevent actions that threaten their profitability,
competitive position and economic power.

Capital’s ecosystem has, of course, been global all along. International
trade in commodities entails either a real or a virtual transfer of
inputs (water, energy, minerals, biomass and nutrients, as well as the
effects of human labour) from one part of the world to another. This
trade is the glue that holds capital’s ecosystem together and it is the
expansion of this trade that expands and intensifies activities within
that ecosystem. The category of virtual ecological transfer is
important. It refers to the way in which, say, energy used in aluminium
smelting in Canada ends up in the USA in the commodity form of
aluminium, as opposed to the direct transfer of energy from Canada to
the USA through the power grid or an oil pipeline. Capital’s ecosystem
is riddled with inequalities and uneven geographical developments
precisely because of the uneven pattern of these transfers. Benefits
pile up in one part of the world at the expense of another. Transfers of
ecological benefits from one part of the world to another underpin
geopolitical tensions. This also helps explain why the Bolivian approach
to the use of ‘their’ nature is so radically different from that in the
USA. The Bolivians want to keep their oil in the ground. Why permit its
extraction for use in, say, the United States for a mere pittance of
royalties? Why should my resources subsidise your lifestyle?

The valuation put on nature or, as ecological economists prefer to
conceptualise it, the monetary value put on the flow of services that
nature provides to capital is arbitrary. It leads on occasion to
indiscriminate exploitation of available use values to the point of
ecological collapse. Capital has often exhausted and even permanently
destroyed the resources latent in nature in certain locations. This has
been particularly true when capital is geographically mobile. When the
cotton growers in the American South or the coffee growers of Brazil
exhausted their soils they simply moved on to other more fertile lands
where the profitable pickings were even easier. Colonies were mined for
their resources without regard to the local (often indigenous)
population’s well-being. The mining of minerals and the exploitation of
energy and forestry resources often follow a similar logic. But the
ecological effects are localised, leaving behind an uneven geographical
landscape of abandoned mining towns, exhausted soils, toxic waste dumps
and devalued asset values. The ecological benefits are located somewhere
else.

These extractive and exploitative practices become doubly rapacious and
violent under systems of imperial and colonial rule. Soil mining, soil
erosion and unregulated resource extractions have left a huge mark upon
the world’s landscapes, in some instances leading to irreversible
destructions of those use values needed for human survival. A more
benign capitalist logic can be constructed in certain places and times
that combines principles of sound environmental management with
sustained profitability. The Dust Bowl of the 1930s in the USA, for
example, was followed by the spread of conservationist land practices
(sponsored by the state) and the design of a more sustainable
agriculture, though based on the capital-intensive, high energy,
chemical and pesticide inputs characteristic of profitable contemporary
agribusiness.

The existence of destructive ecosystemic practices in one place does not
necessarily betoken similar practices elsewhere and vice versa.
Doomsayers highlight rapacious and destructive practices here and the
cornucopians point to well-balanced ecosystemic practices there. Both
coexist within the dynamics of capital’s ecosystem. Unfortunately, we
lack the knowledge and the instruments to arrive at a full accounting of
planetary benefits and losses in use value or even in monetary terms
(though satellite imagery will help with some aspects of the former). It
is also extremely difficult to account for the real and the virtual
ecological transfers occurring through the trading in commodities over
space. The steel mills of Sheffield and Pittsburgh close down and air
quality miraculously improves in the midst of unemployment, while the
steel mills of China open up and contribute massively to the air
pollution which reduces life expectancies there. Once again, pollution
problems do not get solved but moved around. The uneven benefits and
losses nearly always redound, however, to the benefit of the rich and
powerful while leaving the vulnerable and the poor far worse off than
before. This, after all, is what an extractive imperialism has always
been about.

In the absence of any secure knowledge of how capital’s ecosystem is
actually functioning as a whole, it is difficult to make any clear
judgement on how fatal environmental degradations may be for the further
continuous expansion of capital. This situation in itself signals,
perhaps, a pivotal danger: not only do we lack the necessary
instrumental arrangements to manage capital’s ecosystem well, but we
also face considerable uncertainty as to the full range of
socio-ecological issues that must be addressed. We do know that both the
spatial and temporal scales at which environmental issues are now being
posed have shifted radically and that the institutional framework to
handle management at these scales is clearly lagging. We also know the
measures necessary to ensure against catastrophic changes may not be
designed and implemented in time, even presuming the political
willingness on the part of contentious parties to take precautionary
action.

The general stance that it seems sensible to take in the face of these
reservations is this: there is nothing natural about so-called natural
disasters and humanity knows just about enough to ameliorate or manage
the threat of most (though never all) environmental catastrophes. But it
is unlikely that capital will take the necessary action without a
struggle, both between its warring factions and with others who are
affected by the cost-shifting that so conveniently goes on. The reasons
problems persist are political, institutional and ideological and are
not attributable to natural limits.

If there are serious problems in the capital–nature relation, then this
is an internal contradiction within and not external to capital. We
cannot maintain that capital has the power to destroy its own ecosystem
while arbitrarily denying that it has a like potential power to cleanse
itself and resolve or at least properly balance its internal
contradictions. Usually prodded or mandated by state powers (that are
often thoroughly incoherent with regard to environmental policies when
taken in aggregate) or influenced by pressures emanating from capitalist
society more generally, capital has in many instances successfully
responded to these contradictions. The rivers and atmospheres of
northern Europe and North America are far cleaner now than they were a
generation ago and life expectancies are generally rising and not
falling as in northern China. The Montreal Protocol restricting the use
of CFCs curbed (though by no means perfectly) a serious environmental
threat through international agreement. The harmful effects of DDT have
likewise been restricted, to cite one more example out of many. In the
case of the Montreal Protocol on CFCs, it was the conversion of the
conservative and otherwise free-market cheerleader Margaret Thatcher to
the role of an active supporter (in part because she was trained as a
chemist and understood the technical issues involved) of the
intergovernmental agreement that made all the difference. With climate
change, there are simply too many ‘deniers’ in positions of power to
permit ameliorative actions and so far no Margaret Thatcher figure has
ridden to the rescue. It has been left to some of the poorer and
immediately threatened countries, like Bolivia and the Maldives, to
plead the cause of climate justice. We are therefore not in a position
to find out if capital could accomplish the massive adaptations required
to deal with this problem effectively.

The bulk of the evidence now available does not support the thesis of an
impending collapse of capitalism in the face of the environmental
dangers. We will not run out of energy in spite of ‘peak oil’; there is
land and water enough to feed an expanding population for many years to
come even in the face of exponential growth. If there are specific
impending scarcities of this or that resource, we are smart enough to
find substitutes. Resources are technological, economic and cultural
evaluations of use values in nature. If there seem to be natural
shortages then we can simply change our technology, our economy and our
cultural beliefs. Even problems of global warming, waning biodiversity
and new disease configurations – which today have to be accorded the
status of the premier threats to human life – could be handled
adequately if we could overcome our own short-sightedness and political
shortcomings. This is, of course, a tall order for our political
institutions to respond to. There will therefore doubtless be resource
wars, famines in some places and environmental refugees by the millions
elsewhere, and frequent disruptions to commerce. But none of this is
dictated by limits in nature. We have no one to blame but ourselves if
much of humanity is reduced to penury and starvation. If that happens,
it will be more a measure of human stupidity and venality than anything
else. There is, alas, abundant evidence that there is plenty of that to
go around and that capital itself thrives upon and even foments it. But
this has not put an end to capital.

This brings us to the nub of what might be so threatening to the future
of capital within the contradictory metabolic unity of capital and
nature. The two answers are somewhat surprising. The first concerns the
rising power of the rentier class to appropriate all wealth and income
without paying any mind to production. The ownership and commodification
of land and its ‘natural’ scarcity allow an unproductive landlord class
to extract monopoly rents at the expense of productive capital,
ultimately reducing the profit rate (and hence the incentive to
reinvest) to zero. This fits, as we have seen, with a broader concept of
the rentier, which combines the traditional landlord with all forms of
property ownership which are in themselves unproductive but which
facilitate the appropriation of wealth and income. The appropriation of
natural forces and the occupation of key points in capital’s ecosystem
may threaten the strangulation of productive capital.

The second reason this contradiction could become fatal lies in a
different dimension entirely. It rests on the alienated human response
to the kind of ecological system that capital constructs. This ecosystem
is functionalist, engineered and technocractic. It is privatised,
commercialised and monetised, and oriented towards maximising the
production of exchange values (rents in particular) through the
appropriation and production of use values. Like all other aspects of
capital, it is increasingly automated. It is capital- and
energy-intensive with often very little labour input. In agriculture, it
tends to be monocultural, extractive and, of course, perpetually
expanding under the pressures of exponential growth. In urbanisation,
the suburbs are just as monocultural, with a lifestyle that maximises
the excessive consumption of material goods in an astonishingly wasteful
manner and with isolating and individualising social effect. Capital
dominates the practices whereby we collectively and even individually
relate to nature. It disregards anything other than functionalist
aesthetic values. In its ruinous approach to the sheer beauty and
infinite diversity of a natural world (of which we are all a part) it
exhibits its own utterly barren qualities. If nature is fecund, given
over to the perpetual creation of novelty, then capital cuts that
novelty into pieces and reassembles the bits into pure technology.
Capital carries within itself a desiccating definition not only of the
teeming diversity of the natural world but of the tremendous
potentiality of human nature to evolve freely its on capacities and
powers. Capital’s relation to nature and human nature is alienating in
the extreme.

Capital cannot help but privatise, commodify, monetise and commercialise
all those aspects of nature that it possibly can. Only in this way can
it increasingly absorb nature into itself to become a form of capital –
an accumulation strategy – all the way down into our DNA. This metabolic
relation necessarily expands and deepens in response to capital’s
exponential growth. It is forced on to terrains that are more and more
problematic. Life forms, genetic materials, biological processes,
knowledge of nature and intelligence in how to use its qualities and
capacities and powers (whether of the artificial or distinctively human
variety matters not a whit) are all subsumed within the logic of
commercialisation. The colonisation of our lifeworld by capital
accelerates. The endless and increasingly mindless exponential
accumulation of capital is accompanied by an endless and increasingly
mindless extension of capital’s ecology into our lifeworld.

This provokes reactions, revulsions and resistances. The joy of a
sunset, the smell of fresh rain or the wonder of a spectacular storm,
even the brutality of a tornado, cannot be reduced to some crude
monetary measure. Polanyi’s complaint that the imposition of the
commodity form upon the natural world is not only ‘weird’ but inherently
destructive goes much deeper than the sense that natural forces and
powers get disrupted and destroyed to the point where they become
unusable for capital. What gets destroyed is the capacity to be human in
any other way than that which capital requires and dictates. This is
seen by many as an offence against ‘true’ nature and, by extension,
against the possibility of another and better human nature.

This idea that capital mandates the destruction of a decent and
sensitive human nature has long been understood. It early on produced an
aesthetic revolt, led by the romantic movement, against a purely
scientific approach to capitalist modernity. In deep ecology it produced
a non-anthropocentric vision of how we should construe ourselves in
relation to the world around us. In social and political ecology it
produced severely critical forms of anti-capitalist analysis. In the
critical work of the Frankfurt School it pioneered the emergence of a
more ecologically sensitive Marxism in which the dialectics and the
‘revolt’ of nature brooked large.⁵ What is called ‘the revolt of nature’
is not that of an irate and out-of-sorts mother nature (as some
indigenous thinking would now have it and as every presenter on the
weather channels of the world likes to portray it). It is in truth a
revolt of our own nature about who we have to become to survive within
the ecosystem that capital necessarily constructs. This revolt is across
the political spectrum – rural conservatives are every bit as outraged
as urban liberals and anarchists at the commodification, monetisation
and commercialisation of all aspects of nature.

The seeds are sown for a humanist revolt against the inhumanity
presupposed in the reduction of nature and human nature to the pure
commodity form. Alienation from nature is alienation from our own
species’ potential. This releases a spirit of revolt in which words like
dignity, respect, compassion, caring and loving become revolutionary
slogans, while values of truth and beauty replace the cold calculus of
social labour.


Contradiction 17


The Revolt of Human Nature: Universal Alienation

It is not entirely beyond the realms of possibility that capital could
survive all the contradictions hitherto examined at a certain cost. It
could do so, for example, by a capitalist oligarchic elite supervising
the mass genocidal elimination of much of the world’s surplus and
disposable population while enslaving the rest and building vast
artificial gated environments to protect against the ravages of an
external nature run toxic, barren and ruinously wild. Dystopian tales
abound depicting a grand variety of such worlds and it would be wrong to
rule them out as impossible blueprints for the future of a
less-than-human humanity. Indeed, there is something frighteningly close
about some dystopian tales, such as the social order depicted in the
teenage hit trilogy _The Hunger Games_ by Suzanne Collins or the
futuristic anti-humanist sequences of David Mitchell’s _Cloud Atlas_.
Clearly, any such social order could only exist on the basis of
fascistic mind control and the continuous exercise of daily police
surveillance and violence accompanied by periodic militarised
repressions. Anyone who does not see elements of such a dystopian world
already in place around us is deceiving herself or himself most cruelly.

The issue is not, therefore, that capital cannot survive its
contradictions but that the cost of it so doing becomes unacceptable to
the mass of the population. The hope is that long before dystopian
trends turn from a trickle of drone strikes here and occasional uses of
poison gas against their own people by crazed rulers there, of murderous
and incoherent policies towards all forms of opposition in one place to
environmental collapses and mass starvation elsewhere, into a veritable
flood of catastrophic unequally armed struggles everywhere that pit the
rich against the poor and the privileged capitalists and their craven
acolytes against the rest … the hope is that social and political
movements will arise and shout, ‘_Ja! Basta!_’ or ‘Enough is enough’,
and change the way we live and love, survive and reproduce. That this
means replacing the economic engine and its associated irrational
economic rationalities should by now be obvious. But how this should be
done is by no means clear and what kind of economic engine can replace
that of capital is an even murkier proposition given the current state
of thought and the lamentable paucity of imaginative public debate
devoted to the question. In the analysis of this, an understanding of
capital’s contradictions is more than a little helpful, for, as the
German playwright Bertolt Brecht once put it, ‘hope is latent in
contradictions’.

In excavating this zone of latent hope, there are some basic
propositions that must first be accepted. In _The Enigma of Capital_, I
concluded: ‘Capitalism will never fall on its own. It will have to be
pushed. The accumulation of capital will never cease. It will have to be
stopped. The capitalist class will never willingly surrender its power.
It will have to be dispossessed.’¹ I still hold to this view and think
it vital that others do too. It will obviously need a strong political
movement and a lot of individual commitment to undertake such a task.
Such a movement cannot function without a broad and compelling vision of
an alternative around which a collective political subjectivity can
coalesce. What sort of vision can animate such a political movement?

We can seek to change the world gradually and piecemeal by favouring one
side of a contradiction (such as use value) rather than the other (such
as exchange value) or by working to undermine and eventually dissolve
particular contradictions (such as that which allows the use of money
for the private appropriation of social wealth). We can seek to change
the trajectories defined by the moving contradictions (towards
non-militaristic technologies and towards greater equality in a world of
democratic freedoms). Understanding capital’s contradictions helps, as I
have tried to indicate throughout this book, in developing a long-term
vision of the overall _direction_ in which we should be moving. In much
the same way that the rise of neoliberal capitalism from the 1970s
onwards changed the direction of capital’s development towards
increasing privatisation and commercialisation, the more emphatic
dominance of exchange value and an all-consuming fetishistic passion for
money power, so an anti-neoliberal movement can point us in an entirely
different strategic direction for the coming decades. There are signs in
the literature as well as in the social movements of at least a
willingness to try to redesign a capitalism based in more ecologically
sensitive relations and far higher levels of social justice and
democratic governance.²

There are virtues in this piecemeal approach. It proposes a peaceful and
non-violent move towards social change of the sort initially witnessed
in the early stages of Tahrir, Syntagma and Taksim Squares, although in
all these instances the state and police authorities soon responded with
astonishing brutality and violence, presumably because these movements
had the timerity to go beyond the boundaries of repressive tolerance. It
seeks to bring people together strategically around common but limited
themes. It can have, also, wide-ranging impacts if and when contagious
effects cascade from one kind of contradiction to another. Imagine what
the world would be like if the domination of exchange value and the
alienated behaviours that attach to the pursuit of money power as Keynes
described them were simultaneously reduced and the powers of private
persons to profit from social wealth were radically curbed. Imagine,
further, if the alienations of the contemporary work experience, of a
compensatory consumption that can never satisfy, of untold levels of
economic inequality and discordance in the relation to nature, were all
diminished by a rising wave of popular discontent with capital’s current
excesses. We would then be living in a more humane world with
much-reduced levels of social inequality and conflict and
much-diminished political corruption and oppression.

This does not tell us how highly fragmented though numerous oppositional
movements might converge and coalesce into a more unified solidarious
movement against capital’s dominance. The piecemeal approach fails to
register and confront how all the contradictions of capital relate to
and through each other to form an organic whole. There is a crying need
for some more catalytic conception to ground and animate political
action. A collective political subjectivity has to coalesce around some
foundational concepts as to how to constitute an alternative economic
engine if the powers of capital are to be confronted and overcome.
Without that, capital can neither be dispossessed nor displaced. The
concept I here find most appropriate is that of _alienation_.

The verb to alienate has a variety of meanings. As a legal term it means
to transfer a property right to the ownership of another. I alienate a
piece of land when I sell it to another. As a social relation it refers
to how affections, loyalties and trust can be alienated (transferred,
stolen away) from one person, institution or political cause to another.
The alienation (loss) of trust (in persons or in institutions such as
the law, the banks, the political system) can be exceedingly damaging to
the social fabric. As a passive psychological term alienation means to
become isolated and estranged from some valued connectivity. It is
experienced and internalised as a feeling of sorrow and grief at some
undefinable loss that cannot be recuperated. As an active psychological
state it means to be angry and hostile at being or feeling oppressed,
deprived or dispossessed and to act out that anger and hostility,
lashing out sometimes without any clear definitive reason or rational
target, against the world in general. Alienated behaviours can arise,
for example, because people feel frustrated at the lack of life chances
or because their quest for freedom ended up in domination.

The diversity of meanings is useful. The worker legally alienates the
use of his or her labour power for a stated period of time to the
capitalist in return for a wage. During this time the capitalist demands
the loyalty and attention of the worker and the worker is asked to trust
that capitalism is the best system to generate wealth and well-being for
all. Yet the worker is estranged from his or her product as well as from
other workers, from nature and all other aspects of social life during
the time of the labour contract and usually beyond (given the exhausting
nature of the work). The deprivation and dispossession are experienced
and internalised as a sense of loss and sorrow at the frustration of the
worker’s own creative instincts. Ultimately the worker stops being
melancholic and morose and gets angry at the immediate sources of his or
her alienation: either at his boss for working him too hard or at her
partner for wanting dinner and sex and not sympathising with her
exhausted state. In this totally alienated state, the worker either
throws sand in the machine at work or the teacups at her partner at
home.

The theme of alienation is present in many of the contradictions already
examined. The tactile contact with the commodity – its use value – is
lost and the sensual relation to nature is occluded by the domination of
exchange value. The social value and meaning of labouring get obscured
in the representational form of money. The capacity to arrive
democratically at collective decisions gets lost in the perpetual battle
between the conflicting rationalities of isolated private interests and
of state powers. Social wealth disappears into the pockets of private
persons (producing a world of private wealth and public squalor). The
direct producers of value are alienated from the value they produce. An
ineradicable gulf is created between people through class formation. A
proliferating division of labour makes it more and more difficult to see
the whole in relation to the increasingly fragmented parts. All
prospects for social equality or social justice are lost even as the
universality of equality before the law is trumpeted as the supreme
bourgeois virtue. Accumulated resentments at accumulation by
dispossession in the field of the realisation of capital (through
housing displacements and foreclosures, for example) boil over. Freedom
becomes domination, slavery is freedom.

The catalytic political problem that derives from all this is to
identify, confront and overcome the many forms of alienation produced by
the economic engine of capital and to channel the pent-up energy, the
anger and the frustration they produce into a coherent anti-capitalist
opposition. Dare we hope for an unalienated (or at least less alienated
and more humanly acceptable) relation to nature, to each other, to the
work we do and to the way we live and love? For this to be so requires
that we understand the source of our alienations. And this is exactly
what the study of capital’s contradictions does so much to illuminate.

The traditional Marxist approach to the revolutionary transformation to
socialism/communism has been to focus on the contradiction between
productive forces (technology) and social (class) relations. In the lore
of traditional communist parties, the transition was seen as a
scientific and technical rather than a subjective, psychological and
political question. Alienation was excluded from consideration since it
was a non-scientific concept that smacked of the humanism and utopian
desire articulated in the young Marx of _The Economic and Philosophic
Manuscripts of 1844_ rather than through the objective science of
_Capital_. This scientistic stance failed to capture the political
imagination of viable alternatives in spite of the passionate beliefs of
adherents to the communist cause. Nor did it provide any spiritually
compelling and subjective (rather than scientifically necessary and
objective) reason to mobilise arms in a sea of anti-capitalist struggle.
It could not even confront the madness of the prevailing economic and
political reason (in part because scientific communism embraced much of
this economic reason and its fetish attachment to production for
production’s sake). It failed in fact to fully unmask the fetishisms and
fictions peddled in the name of the ruling classes to protect themselves
from harm. The traditional communist movement was, therefore, in
perpetual danger of unwittingly replicating these fictions and
fetishisms. It fell victim in addition to the static and dogmatic views
of the leaders of an all-powerful vanguard party. The democratic
centralism that often worked well in opposition and at dire moments of
violent repression proved a disastrous burden the closer the movement
came to exercising legitimate power. Its search for freedom produced
domination.

But there is more than a mere kernel of truth in the idea of a central
contradiction between revolutions in the productive forces and their
conflictual and contradictory social relations. There is, as we saw in
the case of Contradiction 8, a deep connection between the technical
evolution of capital and the radical transformation of work and of
social value. But there are further implications when we address this
and other contradictions (such as those arising out of divisions of
labour) from the standpoint of alienation. André Gorz has pioneered the
way in illuminating these, so I shall simply follow him here.

‘The economic rationalisation of work’ that occurs with the capitalist
development of technological powers, writes Gorz, produces ‘individuals
who, being alienated in their work, will, necessarily be alienated in
their consumption as well, and eventually, in their needs’. The more
money individuals can command (and money has the potential, as we have
seen, to increase without limit even within individual bank accounts),
the more individual needs must increase if those individuals are to
perform their economic role as ‘rational consumers’ (‘rational’, that
is, from the standpoint of capital). A dialectical relation, a spiral of
interactions, is established between the desire for money and an economy
of needs promoted within the social order. The idea of a stable good
life and of good living according to modest requirements is displaced by
an insatiable desire for gaining more and yet more money power in order
to command more and yet more consumer goods. The effect is to ‘sweep
away the ancient idea of freedom and existential autonomy’ and to
surrender true freedom for the limited freedoms of endless striving to
participate in and beat the market.³

Let us unpack the details of this argument. ‘The essential question,’
Gorz writes, ‘is the extent to which the skills and faculties a job
employs constitute an occupational culture and the extent to which there
is a unity between occupational culture and the culture of everyday life
– between work and life. The extent, in other words, to which
involvement in one’s work implies the enrichment or sacrificing of one’s
individual being.’ The technology of work is on the surface totally
indifferent to this question, but, as we have seen, much of the dynamic
of technological change has been orchestrated to disem-power and
diminish the worker. Such a trajectory for innovation is deeply
incompatible with the enrichment of the worker’s life. Technology does
not and cannot give rise to a distinctive culture over and beyond what
it itself commands. The violence of technology resides in the way it
cuts the link between the person and sensory interaction with the world.
It is, says Gorz, ‘a form of repression that denies our own
sensitivity’. Tenderness and compassion are not allowed. Nature, as we
have seen, is treated ‘in an instrumental way’ and this does ‘violence’
to ‘Nature and to our own and other people’s bodies. The culture of
everyday life is – with all the disturbing ambiguity this antinomic
creation contains – a culture of violence, or, in its most extreme form,
a systematic, thought-out, sublimated, aggravated _culture of
barbarism_.’⁴ This is most obvious, of course, when we think of drone
strikes and gas chambers. But Gorz’s point is that it is this that also
deeply penetrates to the very core of daily life by way of the
instruments we daily use to live that life, including all those we
handle in our work.

There is, evidently, a deep longing in popular culture to somehow
humanise the impacts of this barren culture of technology. We see that
in the way that the replicants in _Blade Runner_ acquire feelings, how
Sonmi-451 learns an expressive language in _Cloud Atlas_, how the robots
in _Wall-E_ learn to care and shed a tear while human beings, bloated
with compensatory consumer goods, passively float alone, each on their
separate magic carpet, above the ruinous world the robots are seeking to
order below; and even, more negatively, how HAL the computer in _2001: A
Space Odyssey_ goes rogue. The sheer impossibility of this dream of
humanising technology does nothing to deter its repeated articulation.
So where, then, do we go to find a more human way to reconstruct our
world?

‘Working,’ Gorz insists, ‘is not just the creation of economic wealth;
it is also always a means of self-creation. Therefore we must also ask
_a propos_ the contents of our work whether the work produces the kind
of men and women we wish humanity to be made of.’ We know that many if
not most of those at work are not happy with what they do. A recent
comprehensive Gallup survey in the USA showed, for example, that about
70 per cent of full-time workers either hated going to work or had
mentally checked out and become, in effect, saboteurs spreading
discontent everywhere and thereby costing their employer a great deal in
the form of lost efficiency. The 30 per cent who were engaged were
mainly what Gorz called ‘reprofessionalised’ workers (the designers,
engineers and managers of highly complex technological systems). Are
these sorts of workers, asks Gorz, ‘closer to a possible ideal of
humanity than the more traditional types of workers? Can the complex
tasks they are allotted fill their life and give it meaning, without
simultaneously distorting it? How, in a word, is this work lived?’ Can
the violence of technical culture be transcended?

Gorz’s answer is discouraging. Technology can certainly be used ‘to
increase the efficiency of labour, and reduce the toil involved and the
number of working hours’. But this has a price. ‘It divorces work from
life, and occupational culture from the culture of everyday life; it
demands a despotic domination of oneself in exchange for an increased
domination of Nature; it reduces the field of lived experience and
existential autonomy; it separates the producer from the product to the
point where she or he no longer knows the purpose of what she or he is
doing.’ If this is not total alienation within the labour process then
what is?

‘The price we have to pay for technicisation is only acceptable,’ Gorz
continues, ‘if the latter saves work and time. This is its declared aim
and it can have no other. It is to allow us to produce more and better
in less time and with less effort.’ There is no ambition here ‘for work
to fill the life of each individual and be the principal source of
meaning’. This defines the heart of the contradiction within the labour
process. In saving time and effort at work technology destroys all
meaning for the worker. ‘A job whose effect and aim are to save work
cannot, at the same time, glorify work as the essential source of
personal identity and fulfilment. The meaning of the current
technological revolution cannot be to rehabilitate the work ethic and
identification with one’s work.’ It could only have meaning if it
released the labourer from drudgery at work for ‘non-work activities in
which we can all, the new type of worker included, develop that
dimension of our humanity which finds no outlet in technicised work’.⁵
‘Whether it takes the form of unemployment, marginalisation and lack of
job security, or a general reduction of working hours, the crisis of the
work-based society (that is, based on work in the economic sense of the
word) forces individuals to look outside work for sources of identity
and social belonging.’ It is only outside of work that the worker has
the possibility to achieve personal fulfilment, to acquire self-esteem
and, hence, ‘the esteem of others’.⁶

Society at large has been forced to make an existential choice. Either
the economic sphere of capital accumulation had to be curbed to allow
for the free development of human capacities and powers outside the
tyranny of the market and of work, ‘or else economic rationality would
have to make the needs of consumers grow at least as quickly as the
production of commodities and commodified services’. This is exactly the
problem that Martin Ford identifies, except that he eschews all talk of
any alternative to capitalist economic rationality. But in this latter
eventuality – the path that was actually chosen – says Gorz,
‘consumption would have to be [organised] in the service of production.
Production would no longer have the function of satisfying existing
needs in the most efficient way possible; on the contrary, it was needs
which would increasingly have the function of enabling production to
keep growing.’ The result has been paradoxical:

unlimited maximum efficiency in the [realisation] of capital thus
demanded unlimited maximum inefficiency in meeting needs, and unlimited
maximum wastage in consumption. The frontiers between needs, wishes and
desires needed to be broken down; the desire for dearer products of an
equal or inferior use value to those previously employed had to be
created; wishes had to be given the impervious urgency of need. In
short, a demand had to be created, consumers had to be created for the
goods that were the most profitable to produce and, to this end, new
forms of scarcity had unceasingly to be reproduced in the heart of
opulence, through accelerated innovation and obsolescence, through the
reproduction of inequalities on an increasingly higher level …⁷

Need creation took precedence over need satisfaction for the mass of the
people.

‘Economic rationality needed continually to raise the level of
consumption without raising the rate of satisfaction; to push back the
frontier of the sufficient, to maintain the impression that there could
not be enough for everyone.’ The stratification of consumption, in which
the consumerism of an affluent and parasitic leisure class called the
shots and led the way, became crucial to ensuring the realisation of
value. This is what Thorstein Veblen’s _Theory of the Leisure Class_,
published back in 1899, so brilliantly exposed. But what we now know is
that if such a class did not already exist it would have to be
invented.⁸ An alienating consumerism is needed to solve the dilemma of a
sagging effective demand produced by wage repressions and
technologically induced unemployment for the mass of the workers. The
latter, submerged and surrounded at every turn in a sea of increasingly
conspicuous consumption, find themselves frantically seeking to maximise
their incomes at all costs, working longer and longer hours in order to
meet their artificially escalating needs as well as to keep up with the
needs of the Joneses.

Instead of working fewer hours, as the new technologies would allow, the
mass of the people found themselves working more. But this also served a
social end. Allowing free time for more and more individuals to pursue
their own objectives of self-realisation is terrifying for the prospects
for capital’s continuous and secure control over labour, both in the
workplace and in the market. Capitalist ‘economic rationality has no
room for authentically free time which neither produces or consumes
commercial wealth,’ writes Gorz. ‘It demands the full-time employment of
those who are employed by virtue not of an objective necessity but of
its originating logic; wages must be fixed in such as way as to induce
the workers to maximum effort.’ Wage demands initiated by the trade
unions ‘are, in fact, the only demands which do not undermine the
rationality of the economic system’. Rational consumption – rational,
that is, in relation to perpetual capital accumulation – becomes an
absolute necessity for the survival of capital. ‘Demands bearing on
working hours, the intensity of work, its organisation and nature, are,
on the other hand, pregnant with subversive radicalism; they cannot be
satisfied by money, they strike at economic rationality in its
substance, and through it at the power of capital. The “market-based
order” is fundamentally challenged when people find out that not all
values are quantifiable, that money cannot buy everything and that what
it cannot buy is something essential, or is even the essential thing.’⁹
As the Priceless ads have it: ‘There are some things money can’t buy.
For everything else, there is MasterCard.’

‘Persuading individuals that the consumer goods and services they are
offered adequately compensate for the sacrifice they must make in order
to obtain them and that such consumption constitutes a haven of
individual happiness which sets them apart from the crowd is something
which typically belongs to the sphere of commercial advertising.’ Here
the ‘mad men’ of advertising (who now account for a large portion of
economic activity in the USA) take centre stage to wreak their havoc
upon the social order. Their focus is private enterprises and private
individuals. Their mission is to persuade people to consume goods that
are ‘neither necessary nor even merely useful’. Commodities ‘are always
presented as containing an element of luxury, of superfluity, of
fantasy, which by designating the purchaser as a “happy and privileged
person” protects him or her from the pressures of a rationalised
universe and the obligation to conduct themselves in a functional
manner.’ Gorz defines these goods as ‘compensatory goods’ which are
‘desired as much – if not more – for their uselessness as for their use
value; for it is this element of uselessness (in superfluous gadgets and
ornaments, for example) which symbolises the buyer’s escape from the
collective universe in a haven of private sovereignty’.¹⁰ It is
precisely this consumerism of excess, this uselessness, that the mad men
of advertising have proved so adept at selling. Such consumerism of
excess is deeply alien to the satisfaction of human wants, needs and
desires. This is a view to which even the current Pope subscribes. ‘The
limitless possibilities for consumption and distraction offered by
contemporary society,’ he complains in his recent Apostolic Exhortation,
lead ‘to a kind of alienation at every level, for a society becomes
alienated when its forms of social organisation, production and
consumption make it more difficult to offer the gift of self and to
establish solidarity between people.’¹¹

But, as Gorz notes, ‘functional workers, who accept alienation in their
work because the possibilities of consumption it offers are adequate
compensation for them, can only come into being if they simultaneously
become a socialised consumer. But only a market economy sector and
commercial advertising that goes with it can produce these socialised
consumers.’¹² This is exactly where the revolutionary movement of 1968,
with all its vaunted rhetoric of individual liberty and freedom and
social justice, ended up – lost in the world of alien consumerism,
drowning in a wealth of compensatory goods, the ownership of which was
taken as a sign of freedom of choice in the marketplace of human
desires.

The progress of alien or compensatory consumerism has its own internally
destructive dynamics. It requires what Schumpeter called ‘creative
destruction’ to be let loose upon the land. Daily life in the city,
settled ways of living, relating and socialising, are again and again
disrupted to make way for the latest fad or fancy. Demolitions and
displacements to make way for gentrification or Disneyfication break
open already achieved fabrics of urban living to make way for the gaudy
and the gargantuan, the ephemeral and fleeting. Dispossession and
destruction, displacement and construction become vehicles for vigorous
and speculative capital accumulation as the figures of the financier and
the rentier, the developer, the landed proprietor and the
entrepreneurial mayor step from the shadows into the forefront of
capital’s logic of accumulation. The economic engine that is capital
circulation and accumulation gobbles up whole cities only to spit out
new urban forms in spite of the resistance of people who feel alienated
entirely from the processes that not only reshape the environments in
which they live but also redefine the kind of person they must become in
order to survive. Processes of social reproduction get re-engineered by
capital from without. Everyday life is perverted to the circulation of
capital. The coalition of the unwilling in relation to this forced
redefinition of human nature constitutes a pool of alienated individuals
that periodically erupts in riots and potentially revolutionary
movements from Cairo to Istanbul, from Buenos Aires to São Paulo, and
from Stockholm to El Alto.

All this rests, however, upon the possession of sufficient money, the
crushing need for which persuades ‘previously unpaid strata of society
to seek waged work’, which further increases ‘the need for compensatory
consumption’. As a result ‘getting paid becomes the primary objective of
the activity to the extent that any activity which does not have a
financial compensation ceases to be acceptable. Money supplants other
values and becomes their only measure.’ Along with this goes ‘an
incentive to withdraw into the private sphere and give it priority, to
the pursuit of “personal” advantages’. This then ‘contributes to the
disintegration of networks of solidarity and mutual assistance, social
and family cohesion and our sense of belonging. Individuals socialised
by (alien) consumerism are no longer socially integrated individuals but
individuals who are encouraged to “be themselves” by distinguishing
themselves from others and who only resemble these others in their
refusal (socially channelled into consumption) to assume responsibility
for the common condition by taking common action.’¹³ Affections and
loyalties to particular places and cultural forms are viewed as
anachronisms. Is this not what the spread of the neoliberal ethic
proposed and eventually accomplished?

But the more time has been released from production, the more imperative
it has become to absorb that time in consumption and consumerism, given
that, as was earlier argued, capitalist ‘economic rationality has no
room for authentically free time which neither produces nor consumes
commercial wealth’. The ever-present danger is that freely associating
and self-creating individuals, liberated from the chores of production
and blessed with a whole range of labour-saving and time-saving
technologies to aid their consumption (microwaves, washing and drying
machines, vacuum cleaners, to say nothing of electronic banking, credit
cards and cars), might start to build an alternative non-capitalistic
world. They might become inclined to reject the dominant capitalist
economic rationality, for example, and start evading its overwhelming
but often cruel rules of time discipline. To avoid such eventualities,
capital must not only find ways to absorb more and more goods and
services through realisation but also somehow occupy the free time that
the new technologies release. In this, it has been more than a little
successful. Many people find themselves with less and less time for free
creative activity in the midst of widespread time-saving technologies in
both production and consumption.

How does this paradox come about? It takes a lot of time, of course, to
manage, run and service all the time-saving household paraphernalia with
which we are surrounded and the more paraphernalia we have the more time
it takes. The sheer complexity of the support apparatus embroils us in
endless telephone calls or emails to service centres, credit card and
telephone companies, insurance companies and the like. There is also no
question that the cultural habits with which we have surrounded the
fetish worship of technological gizmos capture the playful side of our
imaginations and has us uselessly watching sitcoms, trawling the
internet or playing computer games for hours on end. We are surrounded
with ‘weapons of mass distraction’ at very turn.

But none of this explains why time flies away from us in the way it
does. The deeper reason lies, I think, in the structured manner in which
capital has approached the issue of consumption time as a potential
barrier to accumulation. Producing and marketing goods that do not last
or easily become outdated or unfashionable, along with the production of
events and spectacles that are instantaneously consumed, culminates, as
was earlier argued, in an astonishing categorical inversion as consumers
produce their own spectacle on Facebook. While the rents that accrue to
capital from these forms of social media are vital, these forms of
consumption also absorb an incredible amount of time. Communicative
technologies are a double-edged sword. They can be wielded by an
educated and alienated youth for political and even revolutionary
purposes. Or they can so absorb time (while steadily producing value for
others like Google and Facebook shareholders) through idle chatter,
gossip and distractive interpersonal banter.

Capitalist economic rationality is difficult if not impossible to refute
when people’s lives, mental processes and political orientations are
taken up and totally absorbed either in the pseudo busy-work of much of
contemporary production or in the pursuit of alien consumerism. Getting
lost in our emails and on Facebook is not political activism. Gorz has
it right: ‘If savings in worktime do not serve to liberate time, and if
this liberated time is not used for “the free self-realisation of
individuals”, then these savings in working time are totally devoid of
meaning.’¹⁴ Society may be moving towards ‘the programmed, staged
reduction of working hours, without loss of real income, in conjunction
with a set of accompanying policies which will allow this liberated time
to become time for free self-realisation for everyone’. But such an
emancipatory development is threatening in the extreme for capitalist
class power and the resistances and barriers created are strong. ‘The
development of the productive forces may of itself reduce the amount of
labour that is necessary; it cannot of itself create the conditions
which will make this liberation of time a liberation for all. History
may place the opportunity for greater freedom within our grasp, but it
cannot release us from the need to seize this opportunity for ourselves
and derive benefit from it. Our liberation will not come about as the
result of material determinism, behind our backs, as it were. The
potential for liberation which a process contains can only be realised
if human beings seize it and use it to make themselves free.’
Confronting collectively the multiple alienations that capital produces
is a compelling way to mobilise against the stuttering economic engine
that so recklessly powers capitalism from one kind of crisis to another
with potentially disastrous consequences for our relation to nature and
for our relations to each other. Universal alienation calls for a
full-blooded political response. So what might that response be?

There is, I repeat, no such thing as a non-contradictory response to a
contradiction. An examination of the range of contemporary political
responses to universal alienation on the ground produces a profoundly
disturbing picture. The rise of fascist parties in Europe (particularly
virulent and prominent in Greece, Hungary and France) and the
organisation of the Tea Party faction of the Republican Party with its
singular aim to defund and shut down government in the United States are
manifestations of deeply alienated factions of the population seeking
political solutions. They do not shrink from violence and are convinced
that the only way to preserve their threatened freedoms is to pursue a
politics of total domination. This political current is supported and to
some degree meshes with increasingly violent militarised responses to
any and all movements that threaten to break through the walls of that
repressive tolerance so crucial to the perpetuation of liberal
governmentality. Consider as examples the unduly violent police
repression of the Occupy movement in the United States; the even more
violent response to ongoing peaceful protests in Turkey that began in
Taksim Square; police actions in Syntagma Square in Athens that smack of
the fascist tactics of Golden Dawn; the continuous police brutality
visited on student protesters in Chile; the government-organised attack
upon protesters against the unsafe labour conditions in Bangladesh; the
militarisation of the response to the Arab Spring movement in Egypt; the
murder of union leaders in Colombia and many more. All of this is
occurring in the midst of a rapidly widening net of surveillance,
monitoring and punitive legislative activism on the part of state
apparatuses intent on waging a war on terror and liable to view any
active and organised anti-capitalist dissent as akin to an act of
terror.

There is widespread agreement on both the far left and the far right of
the political spectrum in the United States that the state system as
currently constituted is overreaching in its power and that this has to
be fought against. This signals a widespread alienation from a state
system that has historically taken on the task of trying to manufacture
consent and social cohesion (usually out of an appeal to a constructed
fiction about national identity and unity) across factional, even class
lines. Foucault’s analysis of governmentality is helpful here. The
autocratic, absolutist and centralised state bequeathed to the world in
Europe after a phase of fiscal militarism in the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries had to be adapted to bourgeois principles and
practices, which meant adhesion to the utopian politics of an impossible
laissez-faire. This transition was successfully accomplished in the
English case by using freedom as a means to create governmentality (much
as Amartya Sen later advocated for the developing world). This meant
that the capitalist state had to internalise limitations upon its
autocratic powers and devolve the production of consensus to freely
functioning individuals who internalised notions of social cohesion
around the nation state. Above all, they had to consent to the
regulation of activity through the procedures of the market. Clear
limits were placed upon centralised power. The politics of the Tea Party
as well as those of the autonomistas and the anarchists in the United
States converge in seeking to limit or even to destroy the state, though
in the name of pure individualism on the right and some sort of
individualistically anchored associationism on the left. What is
particularly interesting is how the existing mode of production and its
current political articulations define both the spaces and the forms of
it own primary forms of opposition. The hegemonic practices of
neoliberalism in both the economic and the political arenas have given
rise to decentralised and networked oppositional forms.

The specifically right-wing response to universal alienation is both
understandable and terrifying in its implications. It is not as if,
after all, right-wing responses to these kinds of problem have not had
massive historical consequences in the past. Can we not learn from that
history and shape anti-capitalist responses more appropriate to a
progressive answer to the contradictions of our times?


Conclusion


Prospects for a Happy but Contested Future: The Promise of Revolutionary Humanism

From time immemorial there have been human beings who have believed that
they could construct, individually or collectively, a better world for
themselves than that which they had inherited. Quite a lot of them also
came to believe that in the course of so doing it might be possible to
remake themselves as different if not better people. I count myself
among those who believe in both these propositions. In _Rebel Cities_,
for example, I argued that ‘the question of what kind of city we want
cannot be divorced from the question of what kind of people we want to
be, what kinds of social relations we seek, what relations to nature we
cherish, what style of life we desire, what aesthetic values we hold’.
The right to the city, I wrote, is ‘far more than a right of individual
or group access to the resources that the city embodies: it is a right
to change and re-invent the city more after our heart’s desire … The
freedom to make and remake ourselves and our cities is … one of the most
precious yet most neglected of our human rights.’¹ Perhaps for this
intuitive reason, the city has been the focus throughout its history of
an immense outpouring of utopian desires for happier futures and less
alienating times.

The belief that we can through conscious thought and action change both
the world we live in and ourselves for the better defines a humanist
tradition. The secular version of this tradition overlaps with and has
often been inspired by religious teachings on dignity, tolerance,
compassion, love and respect for others. Humanism, both religious and
secular, is a world view that measures its achievements in terms of the
liberation of human potentialities, capacities and powers. It subscribes
to the Aristotelian vision of the uninhibited flourishing of individuals
and the construction of ‘the good life’. Or, as one contemporary
Renaissance man, Peter Buffett defines it, a world which guarantees to
individuals ‘the true flourishing of his or her nature or the
opportunity to live a joyful and fulfilled life’.²

This tradition of thought and action has waxed and waned from time to
time and from place to place but never seems to die. It has had to
compete, of course, with more orthodox doctrines that variously assign
our fates and fortunes to the gods, to a specific creator and deity, to
the blind forces of nature, to social evolutionary laws enforced through
genetic legacies and mutations, by iron laws of economics that dictate
the course of technological evolution, or to some hidden teleology
dictated by the world spirit. Humanism also has its excesses and its
dark side. The somewhat libertine character of Renaissance humanism led
one of its leading exponents, Erasmus, to worry that the
Judaeo-Christian tradition was being traded in for those of Epicurus.
Humanism has sometimes lapsed into a Promethean and anthropocentric view
of human capacities and powers in relationship to everything that exists
– including nature – even to the point where some deluded beings believe
that we, being next to God, are _Übermenschen_ having dominion over the
universe. This form of humanism becomes even more pernicious when
identifiable groups in a population are not considered worthy of being
considered human. This was the fate of many indigenous populations in
the Americas as they faced colonial settlers. Designated as ‘savages’,
they were considered a part of nature and not a part of humanity. Such
tendencies are alive and well in certain circles, leading the radical
feminist Catherine MacKinnon to write a book on the question, _Are Women
Human?_³ That such exclusions have in many people’s eyes a systematic
and generic character in modern society is indicated by the popularity
of Giorgio Agamben’s formulation of ‘the state of exception’ in which so
many people now exist in the world (with the inhabitants of Guantanamo
Bay being a prime example).⁴

There are plenty of contemporary signs that the enlightened humanist
tradition is alive and well, perhaps even staging a comeback. This is
the spirit that clearly animates the hordes of people employed around
the world in NGOs and other charitable institutions whose mission is to
improve the life chances and prospects of the less fortunate. There are
even vain attempts to dress up capital itself in the humanist garb of
what some corporate leaders like to call Conscious Capitalism, a species
of entrepreneurial ethics that looks suspiciously like conscience
laundering along with sensible proposals to improve worker efficiency by
seeming to be nice to them.⁵ All the nasty things that happen are
absorbed as unintentional collateral damage in an economic system
motivated by the best of ethical intentions. Humanism is, however, the
spirit that inspires countless individuals to give of themselves
unstintingly and often without material reward to contribute selflessly
to the well-being of others. Christian, Jewish, Islamic and Buddhist
humanisms have spawned widespread religious and charitable
organisations, as well as iconic figures like Mahatma Gandhi, Martin
Luther King, Mother Teresa and Bishop Tutu. Within the secular tradition
there are many varieties of humanist thought and practice, including
explicit currents of cosmopolitan, liberal, socialist and Marxist
humanism. And, of course, moral and political philosophers have over the
centuries devised a variety of conflicting ethical systems of thought
based in a variety of ideals of justice, cosmopolitan reason and
emancipatory liberty that have from time to time supplied revolutionary
slogans. Liberty, equality, fraternity were the watchwords of the French
Revolution. The earlier US Declaration of Independence, followed by the
US Constitution and, perhaps even more significantly, that stirring
document called the Bill of Rights have all played a role in animating
subsequent political movements and constitutional forms. The remarkable
constitutions recently adopted in Bolivia and Ecuador show that the art
of writing progressive constitutions as the basis for regulating human
life is by no means dead. And the immense literature that this tradition
has spawned has not been lost on those who have sought a more meaningful
life. Just think of the past influence of Tom Paine’s _Rights of Man_ or
Mary Wollstonecraft’s _A Vindication of the Rights of Woman_ within the
English-speaking world to see what I mean (almost every tradition in the
world has analogous writings to celebrate).

There are two well-known undersides to all of this, both of which we
have already encountered. The first is that however noble the universal
sentiments expressed at the outset, it has time and again proved hard to
stop the universality of humanist claims being perverted for the benefit
of particular interests, factions and classes. This is what produces the
philanthropic colonialism of which Peter Buffett so eloquently
complains. This is what twists Kant’s noble cosmopolitanism and quest
for perpetual peace into a tool of imperialist and colonial cultural
domination, currently represented by the Hilton Hotel cosmopolitanism of
CNN and the frequent business-class flier. This is the problem that has
bedevilled the doctrines of human rights enshrined in a UN declaration
that privileges the individual rights and private property of liberal
theory at the expense of collective relations and cultural claims. This
is what turns the ideals and practices of freedom into a tool of
governmentality for the reproduction and perpetuation of capitalist
class affluence and power. The second problem is that the enforcement of
any particular system of beliefs and rights always involves some
disciplinary power, usually exercised by the state or some other
institutionalised authority backed by force. The difficulty here is
obvious. The UN declaration implies state enforcement of individual
human rights when the state so often is first in line violating those
rights.

The difficulty with the humanist tradition in short is that it does not
internalise a good understanding of its own inescapable internal
contradictions, most clearly captured in the contradiction between
freedom and domination. The result is that humanist leanings and
sentiments often get presented these days in a somewhat offhand and
embarrassed way, except when their position is safely backed by
religious doctrine and authority. There is, as a result, no full-blooded
contemporary defence of the propositions of or prospects for a secular
humanism even though there are innumerable individual works that loosely
subscribe to the tradition or even polemicise as to its obvious virtues
(as happens in the NGO world). Its dangerous traps and foundational
contradictions, particularly questions of coercion, violence and
domination, are shied away from because they are too awkward to
confront. The result is what Frantz Fanon characterised as ‘insipid
humanitarianism’. There is plenty of evidence of that manifest in its
recent revival. The bourgeois and liberal tradition of secular humanism
forms a mushy ethical base for largely ineffective moralising about the
sad state of the world and the mounting of equally ineffective campaigns
against the plights of chronic poverty and environmental degradation. It
is probably for this reason that the French philosopher Louis Althusser
launched his fierce and influential campaign back in the 1960s to eject
all talk of socialist humanism and alienation from the Marxist
tradition. The humanism of the young Marx, as expressed in _The Economic
and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_, Althusser argued, was separated
from the scientific Marx of _Capital_ by an ‘epistemological rupture’
that we ignore at our peril. Marxist humanism, he wrote, is pure
ideology, theoretically vacuous and politically misleading, if not
dangerous. The devotion of a dedicated Marxist like the long-imprisoned
Antonio Gramsci to the ‘absolute humanism of human history’ was, in
Althusser’s view, entirely misplaced.⁶

The enormous increase in and nature of the complicitous activities of
the humanist NGOs over recent decades would seem to support Althusser’s
criticisms. The growth of the charitable industrial complex mainly
reflects the need to increase ‘conscience laundering’ for a world’s
oligarchy that is doubling its wealth and power every few years in the
midst of economic stagnation. Their work has done little or nothing in
aggregate to deal with human degradation and dispossession or
proliferating environmental degradation. This is structurally so because
anti-poverty organisations are required to do their work without ever
interfering in the further accumulation of the wealth from which they
derive their sustenance. If everyone who worked in an anti-poverty
organisation converted overnight to an anti-wealth politics we would
soon find ourselves living in a very different world. Very few
charitable donors, not even Peter Buffett I suspect, would fund that.
And the NGOs, which are now at the centre of the problem, would not in
any case want that (though there are many individuals within the NGO
world who would but simply can’t).

So what kind of humanism do we need in order to progressively change the
world through anti-capitalist work into another kind of place populated
by different kinds of people?

There is, I believe, a crying need to articulate a secular
_revolutionary_ humanism that can ally with those religious-based
humanisms (most clearly articulated in both Protestant and Catholic
versions of the theology of liberation as well as in cognate movements
within Hindu, Islamic, Jewish and indigenous religious cultures) to
counter alienation in its many forms and to radically change the world
from its capitalist ways. There is a strong and powerful – albeit
problematic – tradition of secular revolutionary humanism both with
respect to both theory and political practice. This is a form of
humanism that Louis Althusser totally rejected. But, in spite of
Althusser’s influential intervention, it has a powerful and articulate
expression in the Marxist and radical traditions as well as beyond. It
is very different from bourgeois liberal humanism. It refuses the idea
that there is an unchanging or pre-given ‘essence’ of what it means to
be human and forces us to think hard about how to become a new kind of
human. It unifies the Marx of _Capital_ with that of _The Economic and
Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_ and arrows in to the heart of the
contradictions of what any humanist programme must be willing to embrace
if it is to change the world. It clearly recognises that the prospects
for a happy future for most are invariably marred by the inevitability
of dictating the unhappiness of some others. A dispossessed financial
oligarchy which cannot any more partake of caviar and champagne lunches
on their yachts moored off the Bahamas will doubtless complain at their
diminished fates and fortunes in a more egalitarian world. We may, as
good liberal humanists, even feel a bit sorry for them. Revolutionary
humanists steel themselves against that thought. While we may not
approve of this ruthless approach to dealing with such contradictions,
we have to acknowledge the basic honesty and self-awareness of the
practitioners.

Consider, as one example, the revolutionary humanism of someone like
Frantz Fanon. Fanon was a psychiatrist working in hospitals in the midst
of a bitter and violent anti-colonial war (rendered so memorable in
Pontecorvo’s film _The Battle of Algiers –_ a film, incidentally, that
the US military now uses for anti-insurgency training purposes). Fanon
wrote in depth about the struggle for freedom and liberty on the part of
colonised peoples against the colonisers. His analysis, though specific
to the Algerian case, illustrates the sorts of issues that arise in any
liberation struggle, including those between capital and labour. But it
does so in stark dramatic and more easily legible terms precisely
because it incorporates the additional dimensions of racial, cultural
and colonial oppressions and degradations giving rise to an
ultra-violent revolutionary situation from which no peaceful exit seems
possible. The foundational question for Fanon is how to recover a sense
of humanity on the basis of the dehumanising practices and experiences
of colonial domination. ‘As soon as you and your fellow men are cut down
like dogs,’ he writes in _The Wretched of the Earth_, ‘there is no other
solution but to use every means available to re-establish your weight as
a human being. You must therefore weigh as heavily as possible on your
torturer’s body so that his wits, which have wandered off somewhere, can
at last be restored to their human dimension.’ In this way ‘man both
demands and claims his infinite humanity’. There are always ‘tears to be
wiped away, inhuman attitudes to be fought, condescending ways of speech
to be ruled out, men to be humanised’. Revolution, for Fanon, was not
simply about the transfer of power from one segment of society to
another. It entailed the reconstruction of humanity – in Fanon’s case a
distinctive post-colonial humanity – and a radical shift in the meaning
attached to being human. ‘Decolonisation is truly the creation of new
men. But such a creation cannot be attributed to a supernatural power.
The “thing” colonised becomes a man through the very process of
liberation.’ It was therefore inevitable in a colonial situation, Fanon
argued, that the struggle for liberation would have to be constituted in
nationalist terms. But ‘if nationalism is not explained, enriched,
deepened, if it does not very quickly turn into a social and political
consciousness, into humanism, then it leads to a dead end’.⁷

Fanon, of course, shocks many liberal humanists with his embrace of a
necessary violence and his rejection of compromise. How, he asks, is
non-violence possible in a situation structured by the systematic
violence exercised by the colonisers? What is the point of starving
people going on hunger strike? Why, as Herbert Marcuse asked, should we
be persuaded of the virtues of tolerance towards the intolerable? In a
divided world, where the colonial power defines the colonised as
subhuman and evil by nature, compromise is impossible. ‘One does not
negotiate with evil,’ famously said Vice-President Dick Cheney. To which
Fanon had a ready-made reply: ‘The work of the colonist is to make even
dreams of liberty impossible for the colonised. The work of the
colonised is to imagine every possible method for annihilating the
colonist … The theory of the “absolute evil of the colonist” is in
response to the theory of the “absolute evil of the native”.’ In such a
divided world there is no prospect of negotiation or compromise. This is
what has kept the USA and Iran so far apart ever since the Iranian
Revolution. ‘The native sector’ of the colonial city, Fanon points out,
‘is not complementary to the European sector … The city as a whole is
governed by a purely Aristotelian logic’ and follows the ‘dictates of
mutual exclusion’. Lacking a dialectical relation between the two, the
only way to break down the difference is through violence. ‘To destroy
the colonial world means nothing less than demolishing the colonist’s
sector, burying it deep within the earth or banishing it from the
territory.’⁸ There is nothing mushy about such a programme. As Fanon saw
clearly:

For the colonised this violence is invested with positive formative
features because it constitutes their only work. This violent praxis is
totalising since each individual represents a violent link in a great
chain, in the almighty body of violence rearing up in reaction to the
primary violence of the coloniser … At the individual level, violence is
a cleansing force. It rids the colonised of their inferiority complex,
of their passive and despairing attitude. It emboldens them and restores
their self-confidence. Even if the armed struggle has been symbolic, and
even if they have been demobilised by rapid decolonisation, the people
have time to realise their liberation was the achievement of each and
every one …⁹

But what is so stunning about _The Wretched of the Earth_, and what
indeed brings tears to the eyes on a close reading and makes it so
searingly human, is the second half of the book, which is taken up by
devastating descriptions of the psychic traumas of those on both sides
who found themselves forced by circumstances to participate in the
violence of the liberation struggle. We now know much more about the
psychic damage suffered by those US and other soldiers who engaged in
military action in Vietnam, Afghanistan and Iraq, and the terrible
scourge on their lives as a result of post-traumatic stress disorder.
This is what Fanon wrote about with such compassion in the midst of the
revolutionary struggle against the colonial system in Algeria. After
decolonisation there is an immense work that remains to be done, not
only to repair the psyches of damaged souls, but also to mitigate what
Fanon clearly saw as the dangers of the lingering effects (even
replication) of colonial ways of thought and being. ‘The colonised
subject fights in order to put an end to domination. But he must also
ensure that all the untruths planted within him by the oppressor are
eliminated. In a colonial regime such as the one in Algeria the ideas
taught by colonialism impacted not only the European minority but also
the Algerian. Total liberation involves every facet of the personality …
Independence is not a magic ritual but an indispensable condition for
men and women to live in true liberation, in other words to master all
the material resources necessary for a radical transformation of
society.’¹⁰

I do not raise the question of violence here, any more than did Fanon,
because I am or he was in favour of it. He highlighted it because the
logic of human situations so often deteriorates to a point where there
is no other option. Even Gandhi acknowledged that. But the option has
potentially dangerous consequences. Revolutionary humanism has to offer
some kind of philosophical answer to this difficulty, some solace in the
face of incipient tragedies. While the ultimate humanist task may be, as
Aeschylus put it 2,500 years ago, ‘to tame the savageness of man and
make gentle the life of this world’, this cannot be done without
confronting and dealing with the immense violence that underpins the
colonial and neocolonial order. This is what Mao and Ho Chi Minh had to
confront, what Che Guevara sought to achieve, and what a host of
political leaders and thinkers in post-colonial struggles, including
Amilcar Cabral of Guinea-Bissau, Julius Nyerere of Tanzania, Kwame
Nkrumah of Ghana, and Aimé Césaire, Walter Rodney, C. L. R. James and
many others, have acted against with such conviction in both words and
deeds.

But is the social order of capital any different in essence from its
colonial manifestations? That order has certainly sought to distance
itself at home from the callous calculus of colonial violence (depicting
it as something that must necessarily be visited on uncivilised others
‘over there’ for their own good). It had to disguise at home the far too
blatant inhumanity it demonstrated abroad. ‘Over there’ things could be
put out of sight and hearing. Only now, for example, is the vicious
violence of the British suppression of the Mau Mau movement in Kenya in
the 1960s being acknowledged in full. When capital drifts close to such
inhumanity at home it typically elicits a similar response to that of
the colonised. To the degree that it embraced racialised violence at
home, as it did in the United States, it produced movements like the
Black Panthers and the Nation of Islam along with leaders like Malcolm X
and, in his final days, Martin Luther King, who saw the connectivity
between race and class and suffered the consequences thereof. But
capital learned a lesson. The more race and class get woven seamlessly
together, then the faster the fuse for revolution burns. But what Marx
makes so clear in _Capital_ is the daily violence constituted in the
domination of capital over labour in the marketplace and in the act of
production as well as on the terrain of daily life. How easy it is to
take descriptions of contemporary labour conditions in, for example, the
electronics factories of Shenzhen, the clothing factories of Bangladesh
or the sweatshops of Los Angeles and insert them into Marx’s classic
chapter on ‘the working day’ in _Capital_ and not notice the difference.
How shockingly easy it is to take the living conditions of the working
classes, the marginalised and the unemployed in Lisbon, São Paulo and
Jakarta and put them next to Engels’s classic 1844 description of _The
Condition of the Working Class in England_ and find little substantive
difference.¹¹

Oligarchic capitalist class privilege and power are taking the world in
a similar direction almost everywhere. Political power backed by
intensifying surveillance, policing and militarised violence is being
used to attack the well-being of whole populations deemed expendable and
disposable. We are daily witnessing the systematic dehumanisation of
disposable people. Ruthless oligarchic power is now being exercised
through a totalitarian democracy directed to immediately disrupt,
fragment and suppress any coherent anti-wealth political movement (such
as Occupy). The arrogance and disdain with which the affluent now view
those less fortunate than themselves, even when (particularly when)
vying with each other behind closed doors to prove who can be the most
charitable of them all, are notable facts of our present condition. The
‘empathy gap’ between the oligarchy and the rest is immense and
increasing. The oligarchs mistake superior income for superior human
worth and their economic success as evidence of their superior knowledge
of the world (rather than their superior command over accounting tricks
and legal niceties). They do not know how to listen to the plight of the
world because they cannot and wilfully will not confront their role in
the construction of that plight. They do not and cannot see their own
contradictions. The billionaire Koch brothers give charitably to a
university like MIT even to the point of building a beautiful day-care
centre for the deserving faculty there while simultaneously lavishing
untold millions in financial support for a political movement (headed by
the Tea Party faction) in the US Congress that cuts food stamps and
denies welfare, nutritional supplements and day care for millions living
in or close to absolute poverty.

It is in a political climate such as this that the violent and
unpredictable eruptions that are occurring all around the world on an
episodic basis (from Turkey and Egypt to Brazil and Sweden in 2013
alone) look more and more like the prior tremors for a coming earthquake
that will make the post-colonial revolutionary struggles of the 1960s
look like child’s play. If there is an end to capital, then this is
surely from where it will come and its immediate consequences are
unlikely to prove happy for anyone. This is what Fanon so clearly
teaches.

The only hope is that the mass of humanity will see the danger before
the rot goes too far and the human and environmental damage becomes too
great to repair. In the face of what Pope Francis rightly dubs ‘the
globalisation of indifference’, the global masses must, as Fanon so
neatly puts it, ‘first decide to wake up, put on their thinking caps and
stop playing the irresponsible game of Sleeping Beauty’.¹² If Sleeping
Beauty awakes in time, then we might be in for a more fairy-tale-like
ending. The ‘absolute humanism of human history,’ wrote Gramsci, ‘does
not aim at the peaceful resolution of existing contradictions in history
and society but rather is the very theory of these contradictions’. Hope
is latent in them, said Bertolt Brecht. There are, as we have seen,
enough compelling contradictions within capital’s domain to foster many
grounds for hope.


Epilogue


Ideas for Political Praxis

What does this X-ray into the contradictions of capital tell us about
anti-capitalist political praxis? It cannot, of course, tell us exactly
what to do in the midst of fierce and always complicated struggles on
this or that issue on the ground. But it does help frame an overall
direction to anti-capitalist struggle even as it makes and strengthens
the case for anti-capitalist politics. When pollsters ask their
favourite question, ‘Do you think the country is headed in the right
direction?’ that presumes that people have some sense as to what the
right direction might be. So what do those of us who believe capital is
headed in the wrong direction consider a right direction and how might
we evaluate our progress towards realising those goals? And how might we
present those goals as modest and sensible proposals – for such they
really are, relative to the absurd arguments put forward to deepen the
powers of capital as an answer to humanity’s crying needs? Here are some
mandates – derived from the seventeen contradictions – to frame and
hopefully animate political praxis. We should strive for a world in
which:

1. The direct provision of adequate use values for all (housing,
education, food security etc.) takes precedence over their provision
through a profit-maximising market system that concentrates exchange
values in a few private hands and allocates goods on the basis of
ability to pay.

2. A means of exchange is created that facilitates the circulation of
goods and services but limits or excludes the capacity of private
individuals to accumulate money as a form of social power.

3. The opposition between private property and state power is displaced
as far as possible by common rights regimes – with particular emphasis
upon human knowledge and the land as the most crucial commons we have –
the creation, management and protection of which lie in the hands of
popular assemblies and associations.

4. The appropriation of social power by private persons is not only
inhibited by economic and social barriers but becomes universally
frowned upon as a pathological deviancy.

5. The class opposition between capital and labour is dissolved into
associated producers freely deciding on what, how and when they will
produce in collaboration with other associations regarding the
fulfilment of common social needs.

6. Daily life is slowed down – locomotion shall be leisurely and slow –
to maximise time for free activities conducted in a stable and
well-maintained environment protected from dramatic episodes of creative
destruction.

7. Associated populations assess and communicate their mutual social
needs to each other to furnish the basis for their production decisions
(in the short run, realisation considerations dominate production
decisions).

8. New technologies and organisational forms are created that lighten
the load of all forms of social labour, dissolve unnecessary
distinctions in technical divisions of labour, liberate time for free
individual and collective activities, and diminish the ecological
footprint of human activities.

9. Technical divisions of labour are reduced through the use of
automation, robotisation and artificial intelligence. Those residual
technical divisions of labour deemed essential are dissociated from
social divisions of labour as far as possible. Administrative,
leadership and policing functions should be rotated among individuals
within the population at large. We are liberated from the rule of
experts.

10. Monopoly and centralised power over the use of the means of
production is vested in popular associations through which the
decentralised competitive capacities of individuals and social groups
are mobilised to produce differentiations in technical, social, cultural
and lifestyle innovations.

11. The greatest possible diversification exists in ways of living and
being, of social relations and relations to nature, and of cultural
habits and beliefs within territorial associations, communes and
collectives. Free and uninhibited but orderly geographical movement of
individuals within territories and between communes is guaranteed.
Representatives of the associations regularly come together to assess,
plan and undertake common tasks and deal with common problems at
different scales: bioregional, continental and global.

12. All inequalities in material provision are abolished other than
those entailed in the principle of from each according to his, her or
their capacities and to each according to his, her, or their needs.

13. The distinction between necessary labour done for distant others and
work undertaken in the reproduction of self, household and commune is
gradually erased such that social labour becomes embedded in household
and communal work and household and communal work becomes the primary
form of unalienated and non-monetised social labour.

14. Everyone should have equal entitlements to education, health care,
housing, food security, basic goods and open access to transportation to
ensure the material basis for freedom from want and for freedom of
action and movement.

15. The economy converges on zero growth (though with room for uneven
geographical developments) in a world in which the greatest possible
development of both individual and collective human capacities and
powers and the perpetual search for novelty prevail as social norms to
displace the mania for perpetual compound growth.

16. The appropriation and production of natural forces for human needs
should proceed apace but with the maximum regard for the protection of
ecosystems, maximum attention paid to the recycling of nutrients, energy
and physical matter to the sites from whence they came, and an
overwhelming sense of re-enchantment with the beauty of the natural
world, of which we are a part and to which we can and do contribute
through our works.

17. Unalienated human beings and unalienated creative personas emerge
armed with a new and confident sense of self and collective being. Born
out of the experience of freely contracted intimate social relations and
empathy for different modes of living and producing, a world will emerge
where everyone is considered equally worthy of dignity and respect, even
as conflict rages over the appropriate definition of the good life. This
social world will continuously evolve through permanent and ongoing
revolutions in human capacities and powers. The perpetual search for
novelty continues.

None of these mandates, it goes without saying, transcends or supersedes
the importance of waging war against all other forms of discrimination,
oppression and violent repression within capitalism as a whole. By the
same token, none of these other struggles should transcend or supersede
that against capital and its contradictions. Alliances of interests are
clearly needed.


Notes

PROLOGUE: THE CRISIS OF CAPITALISM THIS TIME AROUND

1. Karl Marx, _Theories of Surplus Value_, Part 2, London, Lawrence and
Wishart, 1969, p. 540.

INTRODUCTION: ON CONTRADICTION

1. Bertell Ollman, _The Dance of the Dialectic: Steps in Marx’s Method_,
Champagne, IL, University of Illinois Press, 2003.

CONTRADICTION 1: USE VALUE AND EXCHANGE VALUE

1. For a brief overview see David Harvey, _Rebel Cities: From the Right
to the City to the Urban Revolution_, London, Verso, 2013.

2. Michael Lewis, _The Big Short: Inside the Doomsday Machine_, New
York, Norton, 2010, p. 34.

CONTRADICTION 2: THE SOCIAL VALUE OF LABOUR AND ITS REPRESENTATION BY
MONEY

1. This fascinating story is told in Paul Seabright (ed.), _The
Vanishing Rouble: Barter Networks and Non-Monetary Transactions in
Post-Soviet Societies_, London, Cambridge University Press, 2000.

2. John Maynard Keynes, _Essays in Persuasion_, New York, Classic House
Books, 2009, p. 199.

3. Silvio Gesell, (1916);
http:www.archive.org/details/TheNaturalEconomicOrder, p. 121. For some
further discussion of Gesell’s ideas see John Maynard Keynes, _The
General Theory of Employment, Interest, and Money_, New York, Harcourt
Brace, 1964, p. 363, and Charles Eisenstein, _Sacred Economics: Money,
Gift and Society in the Age of Transition_, Berkeley, CA, Evolver
Editions, 2011.

CONTRADICTION 3: PRIVATE PROPERTY AND THE CAPITALIST STATE

1. Silvio Gesell, _The Natural Economic Order_ (1916);
http:www.archive.org/details/TheNaturalEconomicOrder, p. 81.

2. David Harvey, _The Enigma of Capital_, London, Profile Books, 2010,
pp. 55–7.

3. Thomas Greco, _The End of Money and the Future of Civilization_,
White River Junction, VT, Chelsea Green Publishing, 2009.

4. Ibid.

CONTRADICTION 4: PRIVATE APPROPRIATION AND COMMON WEALTH

1. Karl Marx, _Grundrisse_, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1973, p. 223.

2. Karl Polanyi, _The Great Transformation: The Political and Economic
Origins of Our Time_, Boston, Beacon Press, 1957, p. 72.

3. Ibid., p. 73.

4. Ibid., p. 178.

5. Martin Heidegger, _Discourse on Thinking_, New York, Harper Press,
1966, p. 50.

CONTRADICTION 5: CAPITAL AND LABOUR

1. Karl Marx, _Capital_, Volume 1, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1973, p. 344.

2. Andrew Glyn and Robert Sutcliffe, _British Capitalism: Workers and
the Profit Squeeze_, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1972.

CONTRADICTION 6: CAPITAL AS PROCESS OR THING?

1. John Maynard Keynes, _The General Theory of Employment, Interest and
Money_, New York, Harcourt Brace, 1964, p. 376.

CONTRADICTION 7: THE CONTRADICTORY UNITY OF PRODUCTION AND REALISATION

1. Karl Marx, _Capital_, Volume 2, Harmondsworth, Pelican Books, 1978,
p. 391. The parallel passage in Volume 1 is to be found on p. 799 of the
Penguin edition.

PART TWO: THE MOVING CONTRADICTIONS

1. W. Brian Arthur, _The Nature of Technology: What It Is and How It
Evolves_, New York, Free Press, 2009, p. 202.

CONTRADICTION 8: TECHNOLOGY, WORK AND HUMAN DISPOSABILITY

1. W. Brian Arthur, _The Nature of Technology: What It Is and How It
Evolves_, New York, Free Press, 2009, pp. 22 et seq.

2. Jane Jacobs, _The Economy of Cities_, New York, Vintage, 1969.

3. Arthur, _The Nature of Technology_, p. 211.

4. Alfred NorthWhitehead, _Process and Reality_, New York, Free Press,
1969, p. 33.

5. Arthur, _The Nature of Technology_, p. 213; Karl Marx, _Grundrisse_,
Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1973.

6. Arthur, _The Nature of Technology_, p 191.

7. Joseph Schumpeter, _Capitalism, Socialism and Democracy_, London,
Routledge, 1942, pp. 82–3.

8. Arthur, _The Nature of Technology_, p. 186.

9. André Gorz, _Critique of Economic Reason_, London, Verso, 1989, p.
200.

10. Martin Ford, _The Lights in the Tunnel: Automation, Acclerating
Technology and the Economy of the Future_, USA, Acculant^(TM)
Publishing, 2009, p. 62.

11. Ibid., pp. 96–7.

12. Gorz, _Critique of Economic Reason_, p. 92.

13. Melissa Wright, _Disposable Women and Other Myths of Global
Capitalism_, New York, Routledge, 2006.

CONTRADICTION 9: DIVISIONS OF LABOUR

1. Harry Braverman, _Labor and Monopoly Capital_, New York, Monthly
Review Press, 1974.

2. Timothy Mitchell, _The Rule of Experts: Egypt, Techno-Politics,
Modernity_, Berkeley, University of California Press, 2002.

3. Robert Reich, _The Work of Nations: Preparing Ourselves for 21st
Century Capitalism_, New York, Vintage, 1992.

4. Karl Marx, _Capital_, Volume 1, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1973, p. 618.

CONTRADICTION 10: MONOPOLY AND COMPETITION: CENTRALISATION AND
DECENTRALISATION

1. Joseph Stiglitz, _The Price of Inequality_, New York, Norton, 2013,
p. 44.

2. Ibid.

3. Paul Baran and Paul Sweezy, _Monopoly Capitalism_, New York, Monthly
Review Press, 1966.

4. Giovanni Arrighi, ‘Towards a Theory of Capitalist Crisis’, _New Left
Review_, September 1978.

5. Elisée Reclus, _Anarchy, Geography, Modernity_, edited by John P.
Clark and Camille Martin, Oxford, Lexington Books, 2004, p. 124.

6. David Harvey, ‘The Art of Rent’, in _Spaces of Capital_, Edinburgh,
Edinburgh University Press, 2002.

7. Alfred Chandler, _The Visible Hand: The Managerial Revolution in
American Business_, Cambridge, MA, Harvard University Press, 1993.

8. Giovanni Arrighi, _Adam Smith in Beijing_, London, Verso, 2010.

9. Karl Marx, _Capital_, Volume 3, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1981, p. 490.

CONTRADICTION 11: UNEVEN GEOGRAPHICAL DEVELOPMENTS AND THE PRODUCTION OF
SPACE

1. Gunnar Myrdal, _Economic Theory and Underdeveloped Regions_, London,
Duckworth, 1957.

2. David Harvey, _Spaces of Capital_, Edinburgh, Edinburgh University
Press, 2002.

3. Henri Lefebvre, _The Production of Space_, Oxford, Basil Blackwell,
1989.

CONTRADICTION 12: DISPARITIES OF INCOME AND WEALTH

1. Michael Norton and Dan Ariely, ‘Building a Better America – One
Wealth Quintile at a Time’, _Perspectives on Psychological Science_,
Vol. 6, 2011, p. 9.

2. Oxfam, ‘The Cost of Inequality: How Wealth and Income Extremes Hurt
Us All’, _Oxfam Media Briefing_, 18 January 2013.

3. Branko Milanovic, _Worlds Apart: Measuring International and Global
Inequality_, Princeton, Princeton University Press, 2005, p. 149.

4. Craig Calhoun, ‘What Threatens Capitalism Now?’, in Immanuel
Wallerstein, Randall Collins, Michael Mann, Georgi Derluguian and Craig
Calhoun, _Does Capitalism Have a Future?_, Oxford, Oxford University
Press, 2013.

CONTRADICTION 13: SOCIAL REPRODUCTION

1. Cited in Samuel Bowles and Herbert Gintis, ‘The Problem with Human
Capital Theory: A Marxian Critique’, _American Economic Review_, Vol.
65, No. 2, 1975, pp. 74–82.

2. Karl Marx, _Capital_, Volume 3, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1981, pp.
503–5.

3. Gary Becker, _Human Capital: A Theoretical and Empirical Analysis,
with Special Reference to Education_, Chicago, University of Chicago
Press, 1994.

4. Pierre Bourdieu, ‘The Forms of Capital’, in J. Richardson (ed.),
_Handbook of Theory and Research for the Sociology of Education_, New
York, Greenwood, 1986.

5. Robert Reich, _The Work of Nations: Preparing Ourselves for 21st
Century Capitalism_, New York, Vintage, 1992.

6. Cindi Katz, ‘Vagabond Capitalism and the Necessity of Social
Reproduction’, _Antipode_, Vol. 33, No. 4, 2001, pp. 709–28.

7. Jürgen Habermas, _The Theory of Communicative Action. Volume 2:
Lifeworld and System: A Critique of Functionalist Reason_, Boston,
Beacon Press, 1985; Henri Lefebvre, _Critique of Everyday Life_, London,
Verso, 1991.

8. Fernand Braudel, _Capitalism and Material Life, 1400–1800_, London,
Weidenfeld & Nicolson, 1973.

9. Randy Martin, _Financialization of Daily Life_, Philadelphia, Temple
University Press, 2002.

10. Katz, ‘Vagabond Capitalism and the Necessity of Social
Reproduction’, pp. 709–28.

11. Lefebvre, _Critique of Everyday Life_.

CONTRADICTION 14: FREEDOM AND DOMINATION

1. Christopher Hill, _The World Turned Upside Down: Radical Ideas During
the English Revolution_, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1984.

2. Terry Eagleton, _Why Marx Was Right_, New Haven, Yale University
Press, 2011, p. 87.

3. I provide an overview of all of George W. Bush’s speeches in David
Harvey, _Cosmopolitanism and the Geographies of Freedom_, New York,
Columbia University Press, 2009, pp. 1–14.

4. Michel Foucault, _The Birth of Biopolitics: Lectures at the College
de France, 1978–1979_, New York, Picador, 2008.

5. Robert Wolff, Barrington Moore and Herbert Marcuse, _A Critique of
Pure Tolerance: Beyond Tolerance, Tolerance and the Scientific Outlook,
Repressive Tolerance_, Boston, Beacon Press, 1969.

6. Karl Polanyi, _The Great Transformation: The Political and Economic
Origins of Our Time_, Boston, Beacon Press, 1957, pp. 256–7.

7. Ibid., p. 257.

8. Ibid., p. 258.

9. Amartya Sen, _Development as Freedom_, New York, Anchor Books, 2000,
pp. 297–8.

10. Peter Buffett, ‘The Charitable-Industrial Complex’, _New York
Times_, 26 July 2013.

11. Karl Marx, _Grundrisse_, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1973, p. 488.

12. Karl Marx, ‘On the Jewish Question’, in _Karl Marx: Early Texts_,
edited by David McLellan, Oxford, Basil Blackwell, 1972.

13. Jean-Jacques Rousseau, _The Social Contract_, Oxford, Oxford
University Press, 2008.

14. Eagleton, _Why Marx Was Right_, pp. 75–6.

CONTRADICTION 15: ENDLESS COMPOUND GROWTH

1. Michael Hudson, _The Bubble and Beyond_, Dresden, Islet, 2012. This
is one of the only economics texts I know that takes the issue of
compound growth seriously. I have used some of his materials in what
follows. When I raised the question of compound growth in 2011 with two
senior economics editors of a major global newspaper, one of them
shrugged off the question as trivial if not laughable, while the other
said there were still plenty of new technological frontiers to explore
so why worry.

2. Robert Gordon, ‘Is U.S. Economic Growth Over? Faltering Innovation
Confronts the Six Headwinds’, _Working Paper 18315_, Cambridge, MA,
National Bureau of Economic Research, 2012. The public reaction to
Gordon’s arguments are covered in Thomas Edsall, ‘No More Industrial
Revolutions’, _New York Times_, 15 October 2012. The general public
reaction was that Gordon probably had a point but that he was too
pessimistic on the future impact of innovations. Martin Wolf, an
influential economist with the _Financial Times_, however, accepted much
of what Gordon had to say and concluded that economic elites in the
high-income world would welcome the future that Gordon described but
everyone else would like it ‘vastly less. Get used to this. It will not
change.’ Other contributions would be Tyler Cowen, _The Great
Stagnation: How America Ate all the Low-Hanging Fruit of Modern History,
Got Sick and Will (Eventually) Feel Better_, E-special from Dutton,
2011. All these arguments are, however, US-focused.

3. The Thelluson case is described in Hudson, _The Bubble and Beyond_.

4. Cited in Karl Marx, _Capital_, Volume 3, Harmondsworth, Penguin, p.
519.

5. Angus Maddison, _Phases of Capitalist Development_, Oxford, Oxford
University Press, 1982; _Contours of the World Economy, 1–2030 AD_,
Oxford, Oxford University Press, 2007.

6. Bradford DeLong, ‘Estimating World GDP, One Million B.C.–Present’.
Estimates given in Wikipedia entry on Gross World Product.

7. Thomas Malthus, _An Essay on the Principle of Population_, Cambridge,
Cambridge University Press, 1992.

8. McKinsey Global Institute, ‘The World at Work: Jobs, Pay and Skills
for 3.5 Billion People’, _Report of the McKinsey Global Institute_,
2012.

9. Guy Debord, _The Society of the Spectacle_, Kalamazoo, Black & Red,
2000.

10. Alvin Toffler, _The Third Wave: The Classic Study of Tomorrow_, New
York, Bantam, 1980.

11. Michael Hardt and Antonio Negri, _Commonwealth_, Cambridge, MA,
Harvard University Press, 2009.

12. Antonio Gramsci, _The Prison Notebooks_, London, NLR Books, 1971.

13. Gordon, ‘Is U.S. Economic Growth Over? Faltering Innovation
Confronts the Six Headwinds’.

14. Marx, _Capital_, Volume 3, p. 573.

15. I provided a synoptic account of this in David Harvey, _A Brief
History of Neoliberalism_, Oxford, Oxford University Press, 2005.

CONTRADICTION 16: CAPITAL’S RELATION TO NATURE

1. Paul Sabin, _The Bet: Paul Ehrlich, Julian Simon, and Our Gamble over
Earth’s Future_, New Haven, Yale University Press, 2013.

2. I argue this case in detail in David Harvey, _Justice, Nature and the
Geography of Difference_, Oxford, Basil Blackwell, 1996.

3. Neil Smith, ‘Nature as Accumulation Strategy’, _Socialist Register_,
2007, pp. 19–41.

4. Arthur McEvoy, _The Fisherman’s Problem: Ecology and Law in the
California Fisheries, 1850–1980_, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press,
1990.

5. Arne Naess, _Ecology, Community and Lifestyle_, Cambridge, Cambridge
University Press, 1989; William Leiss, _The Domination of Nature_,
Boston, MA, Beacon Press, 1974; Martin Jay, _The Dialectical
Imagination: A History of the Frankfurt School and the Institute of
Social Research, 1923–50_, Boston, MA, Beacon Press, 1973; Murray
Bookchin, _The Philosophy of Social Ecology: Essays on Dialectical
Naturalism_, Montreal, Black Rose Books, 1990; Richard Peet, Paul
Robbins and Michael Watts, _Global Political Ecology_, New York,
Routledge, 2011; John Bellamy Foster, _Marx’s Ecology: Materialism and
Nature_, New York, Monthly Review Press, 2000.

CONTRADICTION 17: THE REVOLT OF HUMAN NATURE: UNIVERSAL ALIENATION

1. David Harvey, _The Enigma of Capital_, London, Profile Books, 2010,
p. 260.

2. See the debate in Immanuel Wallerstein, Randall Collins, Michael
Mann, Georgi Derluguian and Craig Calhoun, _Does Capitalism Have a
Future?_, Oxford, Oxford University Press, 2013.

3. André Gorz, _Critique of Economic Reason_, London, Verso, 1989, p.
22.

4. Ibid., p. 86.

5. Ibid., pp. 87–8.

6. Ibid., p. 100.

7. Ibid., p. 114.

8. Thorstein Veblen, _The Theory of the Leisure Class_, New York, Oxford
University Press, 2009 edition.

9. Gorz, _Critique of Economic Reason_, p. 116.

10. Ibid., pp. 45–6.

11. Pope Francis, ‘Apostolic Exhortation Evangelii Gaudium of the Holy
Father Francis to the Bishops, Clergy, Consecrated Persons and the Lay
Faithful on the Proclamation of the Gospel in Today’s World’, _National
Catholic Register_, 15 December 2013, paragraph 192.

12. Gorz, _Critique of Economic Reason_, p. 46.

13. Ibid., pp. 46–7.

14. Ibid., p. 184.

CONCLUSION: PROSPECTS FOR A HAPPY BUT CONTESTED FUTURE: THE PROMISE OF
REVOLUTIONARY HUMANISM

1. David Harvey, _Rebel Cities: From the Right to the City to the Urban
Revolution_, London, Verso, 2013, p. 4.

2. Peter Buffett, ‘The Charitable-Industrial Complex’, _New York Times_,
26 July 2013.

3. Catherine MacKinnon, _Are Women Human?: And Other International
Dialogues_, Cambridge, MA, Harvard University Press, 2007.

4. Giorgio Agamben, _State of Exception_, Chicago, Chicago University
Press, 2005.

5. John Mackey, Rajendra Sisodia and Bill George, _Conscious Capitalism:
Liberating the Heroic Spirit of Business_, Cambridge, MA, Harvard
Business Review Press, 2013.

6. Louis Althusser, _The Humanist Controversy and Other Writings_,
London, Verso, 2003; Peter Thomas, _The Gramscian Moment: Philosophy,
Hegemony and Marxism_, Chicago, Haymarket Books, 2010.

7. Frantz Fanon, _The Wretched of the Earth_, New York, Grove Press,
2005, p. 144.

8. Ibid., p. 6.

9. Ibid., p. 51.

10. Ibid., p. 144.

11. Frederick Engels, _The Condition of the Working Class in England_,
London, Cambridge University Press, 1962.

12. Fanon, _The Wretched of the Earth_, p. 62.


Bibliography and Further Reading

Agamben, G., _State of Exception_, Chicago, Chicago University Press,
2005

Althusser, L., ‘Contradiction and Overdetermination’ (1964);
althusser_overdetermination_nlr41.pdf

—, _The Humanist Controversy and Other Writings_, London, Verso, 2003

Arendt, H., _Between Past and Future: Eight Exercises in Political
Thought_, London, Penguin, 2009

Armstrong, P., Glynn, A., and Harrison, J., _Capitalism Since World War
II: The Making and Breaking of the Long Boom_, Oxford, Basil Blackwell,
1991

Arrighi, G., ‘Towards a Theory of Capitalist Crisis’, _New Left Review_,
September 1978

—, _The Long Twentieth Century_, London, Verso, 1994

Arthur, W. B., _The Nature of Technology: What It Is and How It
Evolves_, New York, Free Press, 2009

Atkinson, T., and Piketty, T., _Top Incomes: A Global Perspective_,
Oxford, Oxford University Press, 2010

Baran, P., and Sweezy, P., _Monopoly Capital_, New York, Monthly Review
Press, 1966

Becker, G., _Human Capital: A Theoretical and Empirical Analysis, with_
_Special Reference to Education_, Chicago, University of Chicago Press,
1994

Bookchin, M., _The Philosophy of Social Ecology: Essays on Dialectical_
_Naturalism_, Montreal, Black Rose Books, 1990

Bourdieu, P., ‘The Forms of Capital’, in J. Richardson (ed.), _Handbook
of Theory and Research for the Sociology of Education_, New York,
Greenwood, 1986

Bowles, S., and Gintis, H., ‘The Problem with Human Capital Theory: A
Marxian Critique’, _American Economic Review_, Vol. 65, No. 2, 1975, pp.
74–82

Braudel, F., _Capitalism and Material Life, 1400–1800_, London,
Weidenfeld & Nicolson, 1973

Braverman, H., _Labor and Monopoly Capital_, New York, Monthly Review
Press, 1974

Buffett, P., ‘The Charitable-Industrial Complex’, _New York Times_, 26
July 2013

Chandler, A., _The Visible Hand: The Managerial Revolution in American_
_Business_, Cambridge, MA, Harvard University Press, 1993

Clarke, S. (ed.), _The State Debate_, London, Macmillan, 1991

Cleaver, H., _Reading Capital Politically_, Austin, University of Texas
Press, 1979

Debord, G., _The Society of the Spectacle_, Kalamazoo, Black & Red, 2000

Eagleton, T., _Why Marx Was Right_, New Haven, Yale University Press,
2011

Eisenstein, C., _Sacred Economics: Money, Gift and Society in the Age
of_ _Transition_, Berkeley, Ca, Evolver Editions, 2011

Engels, F., _The Condition of the Working Class in England_, London,
Cambridge University Press, 1962

Fanon, F., _The Wretched of the Earth_, New York, Grove Press, 2005

Ford, M., _The Lights in the Tunnel: Automation, Accelerating Technology
and the Economy of the Future_, USA, Acculant^(TM) Publishing, 2009

Foster, J. B., _Marx’s Ecology; Materialism and Nature_, New York,
Monthly Review Press, 2000

Foucault, M., _The Birth of Biopolitics: Lectures at the College de
France_, _1978–1979_, New York, Picador, 2008

Gesell, S., _The Natural Economic Order_ (1916);
http:www.archive.org/details/TheNaturalEconomicOrder

Glyn, A., and Sutcliffe, R., _British Capitalism: Workers and the
Profit_ _Squeeze_, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1972

Gordon, R., ‘Is U.S. Economic Growth Over? Faltering Innovation
Confronts the Six Headwinds’, Cambridge, MA, National Bureau of Economic
Research, 2012

Gorz, A., _Critique of Economic Reason_, London, Verso, 1989

—, _The Immaterial_, New York and Chicago, Seagull, 2010

Gramsci, A., _The Prison Notebooks_, London, NLR Books, 1971

Greco, T., _The End of Money and the Future of Civilization_, White
River Junction, VT, Chelsea Green Publishing, 2009

Greider, W., _Secrets of the Temple: How the Federal Reserve Runs the_
_Country_, New York, Simon and Schuster, 1989

Habermas, J., _The Theory of Communicative Action. Volume 2: Lifeworld
and System: A Critique of Functionalist Reason_, Boston, Beacon Press,
1985

Hardt, M., and Negri, A., _Commonwealth_, Cambridge, MA, Harvard
University Press, 2009

Hart, K., ‘Notes Towards an Anthropology of Money’, _Kritikos_, Vol. 2,
2005

Harvey, D., _Justice, Nature and the Geography of Difference_, Oxford,
Basil Blackwell, 1996

—, _Spaces of Capital_, Edinburgh, Edinburgh University Press, 2002

—, _A Brief History of Neoliberalism_, Oxford, Oxford University Press,
2005

—, _Cosmopolitanism and the Geographies of Freedom_, New York, Columbia
University Press, 2009

—, _The Enigma of Capital_, London, Profile Books, 2010

—, _Rebel Cities: From the Right to the City to the Urban Revolution_,
London, Verso, 2012

—, _A Companion to Marx’s Capital_, Volume Two, London, Verso, 2013

Heidegger, M., _Discourse on Thinking_, New York, Harper Press, 1966

Hill, C., _The World Turned Upside Down: Radical Ideas During the
English_ _Revolution_, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1984

Hudson, M., _The Bubble and Beyond_, Dresden, Islet, 2012

Jacobs, J., _The Economy of Cities_, New York, Vintage, 1969

Jay, M., _The Dialectical Imagination: A History of the Frankfurt School
and the Institute of Social Research, 1923–50_, Boston, MA, Beacon
Press, 1973

Katz, C., ‘Vagabond Capitalism and the Necessity of Social
Reproduction’, _Antipode_, Vol. 33, No. 4, 2001, pp. 709–28

Keynes, J.M., _The General Theory of Employment, Interest, and Money_,
New York, Harcourt Brace, 1964

—, _Essays in Persuasion_, New York, Classic House Books, 2009

Klein, N., _The Shock Doctrine: The Rise of Disaster Capitalism_, New
York, Metropolitan Books, 2009

Lefebvre, H., _The Production of Space_, Oxford, Basil Blackwell, 1989

—, _Critique of Everyday Life_, London, Verso, 1991

Leiss, W., _The Domination of Nature_, Boston, MA, Beacon Press, 1974

Lewis, M., _The Big Short: Inside the Doomsday Machine_, New York,
Norton, 2010

McEvoy, A., _The Fisherman’s Problem: Ecology and Law in the California
Fisheries, 1850–1980_, Cambridge, Cambridge University Press, 1990

Mackey, J., Sisodia, R., and George, B., _Conscious Capitalism:
Liberating the Heroic Spirit of Business_, Cambridge, MA, Harvard
Business Review Press, 2013

MacKinnon, C., _Are Women Human?: And Other International Dialogues_,
Cambridge, MA, Harvard University Press, 2007

McKinsey Global Institute, ‘The World at Work: Jobs, Pay and Skills for
3.5 Billion People’, _Report of the McKinsey Global Institute_, 2012

Maddison, A., _Phases of Capitalist Development_, Oxford, Oxford
University Press, 1982

—, _Contours of the World Economy, 1–2030 AD_, Oxford, Oxford University
Press, 2007

Malthus, T., _An Essay on the Principle of Population_, Cambridge,
Cambridge University Press, 1992

Mao Zedong, _Collected Works of Chairman Mao. Volume 3: On Policy_,
_Practice and Contradiction_, El Paso, TX, El Paso Norte Press, 2009

Martin, R., _Financialization of Daily Life_, Philadelphia, Temple
University Press, 2002

Marx, K., _The Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_, New York,
International Publishers, 1964

—, _Theories of Surplus Value_, Part 2, London, Lawrence and Wishart,
1969

—, _Karl Marx: Early Texts_, edited by David McLellan, Oxford, Basil
Blackwell, 1972

—, _Grundrisse_, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1973

—, _Capital_, Volume 1, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1976

—, _Capital_, Volume 2, Harmondsworth, Pelican, 1978

—, _Capital_, Volume 3, Harmondsworth, Penguin, 1981

Meszaros, I., _Marx’s Theory of Alienation_, London, Merlin Press, 1970

Milanovic, B., _Worlds Apart: Measuring International and Global_
_Inequality_, Princeton, Princeton University Press, 2005

Mitchell, T., _The Rule of Experts: Egypt, Techno-Politics, Modernity_,
Berkeley, University of California Press, 2002

Myrdal, G., _Economic Theory and Underdeveloped Regions_, London,
Duckworth, 1957

Naess, A., _Ecology, Community and Lifestyle_, Cambridge, Cambridge
University Press, 1989

Nelson, A., and Timmerman, F. (eds), _Life without Money: Building Fair
and Sustainable Economies_, London, Pluto, 2011

Norton, N., and Ariely, D., ‘Building a Better America – One Wealth
Quintile at a Time’, _Perspectives on Psychological Science_, Vol. 6,
2011, p. 9

Ollman, B., _The Dance of the Dialectic: Steps in Marx’s Method_,
Champagne, IL, University of Illinois Press, 2003

Oxfam, ‘The Cost of Inequality: How Wealth and Income Extremes Hurt Us
All’, Oxfam Media Briefing, 18 January 2013

Peet, R., Robbins P., and Watts, M., _Global Political Ecology_, New
York, Routledge, 2011

Piketty, T., and Saez, E., ‘Top Incomes and the Great Recession’, _IMF_
_Economic Review_, Vol. 61, 2013, pp. 456–78

Polanyi, K., _The Great Transformation: The Political and Economic
Origins of Our Time_, Boston, Beacon Press, 1957

Ratcliffe, R., _Revolutionary Humanism and the Anti-Capitalist
Struggle_, distributed by the author, Beech Hill House, Morchard Bishop,
EX17 6RF, 2003

Reclus, E., _Anarchy, Geography, Modernity_, edited by John P. Clark and
Camille Martin, Oxford, Lexington Books, 2004

Reich, R., _The Work of Nations: Preparing Ourselves for 21st Century_
_Capitalism_, New York, Vintage, 1992

Rousseau, J.-J., _The Social Contract_, Oxford, Oxford University Press,
2008

Sabin, P., _The Bet: Paul Ehrlich, Julian Simon, and Our Gamble over
Earth’s_ _Future_, New Haven, Yale University Press, 2013

Sassower, R., _Postcapitalism: Moving Beyond Ideology in America’s_
_Economic Crises_, Boulder, CO, Paradigm Publishers, 2009

Schumpeter, J., _Capitalism, Socialism and Democracy_, London,
Routledge, 1942, pp. 82–3

Seabright P., (ed.), _The Vanishing Rouble: Barter Networks and_
_Non-Monetary Transactions in Post-Soviet Societies_, London, Cambridge
University Press, 2000

Sen, A., _Development as Freedom_, New York, Anchor Books, 2000

Smith, N., _Uneven Development: Nature, Capital and the Production of_
_Space_, Oxford, Basil Blackwell, 1984

—, ‘Nature as Accumulation Strategy’, _Socialist Register_, 2007, pp.
19–41

Stiglitz, J., _The Price of Inequality_, New York, Norton, 2013

Storrs, C. (ed.), _The Fiscal Military State in Eighteenth Century
Europe_, Aldershot, Ashgate, 2009

Thomas, P., _The Gramscian Moment: Philosophy, Hegemony and Marxism_,
Chicago, Haymarket Books, 2010

Toffler, A., _The Third Wave: The Classic Study of Tomorrow_, New York,
Bantam, 1980

Veblen, T., _The Theory of the Leisure Class_, New York, Oxford
University Press, 2009 edition

Wallerstein, I., Collins, R., Mann, M., Derluguian, G., and Calhoun, C.,
_Does Capitalism Have a Future?_, Oxford, Oxford University Press, 2013

Whitehead, A. N., _Process and Reality_, New York, Free Press, 1969

Wolff, R., Moore, B., and Marcuse, H., _A Critique of Pure Tolerance:
Beyond Tolerance, Tolerance and the Scientific Outlook, Repressive
Tolerance_, Boston, Beacon Press, 1969

Wright, M., _Disposable Women and Other Myths of Global Capitalism_, New
York, Routledge, 2006


Index

Numbers in _italics_ indicate Figures.

_2001: A Space Odyssey_ (film) 271

A

Abu Ghraib, Iraq 202

acid deposition 255, 256

advertising 50, 121, 140, 141, 187, 197, 236, 237, 275, 276

Aeschylus 291

Afghanistan 202, 290

Africa

and global financial crisis 170

growth 232

indigenous population and property rights 39

labour 107, 108, 174

‘land grabs’ 39, 58, 77, 252

population growth 230

Agamben, Giorgio 283–4

agglomeration 149, 150

economies 149

aggregate demand 20, 80, 81, 104, 173

aggregate effective demand 235

agribusiness 95, 133, 136, 206, 247, 258

agriculture ix, 39, 61, 104, 113, 117, 148, 229, 239, 257–8, 261

Alabama 148

Algerian War (1954–62) 288, 290

alienation 57, 69, 125, 126, 128, 129, 130, 198, 213, 214, 215, 263,
266–70, 272, 275–6, 279–80, 281, 286, 287

Allende, Salvador 201

Althusser, Louis 286

Amazon 131, 132

Americas

colonisation of 229

indigenous

populations 283

Amnesty International 202

anti-capitalist movements 11, 14, 65, 110, 111, 162

anti-capitalist struggle 14, 110, 145, 193, 269, 294

anti-globalisation 125

anti-terrorism xiii

apartheid 169, 202, 203

Apple 84, 123, 131

apprenticeships 117

Arab Spring movement 280

Arbenz, Jacobo 201

Argentina 59, 107, 152, 160, 232

Aristotelianism 283, 289

Aristotle 1, 4, 200, 215

arms races 93

arms traffickers 54

Arrighi, Giovanni 136

_Adam Smith in Beijing_ 142

Arthur, Brian: _The Nature of Technology_ 89, 95–9, 101–4, 110

artificial intelligence xii, 104, 108, 120, 139, 188, 208, 295

Asia

‘land grabs’ 58

urbanisation 254

assembly lines 119

asset values

and the credit system 83

defined 240

devalued 257

housing market 19, 20, 21, 58, 133

and predatory lending 133

property 76

recovery of 234

speculation 83, 101, 179

associationism 281

AT&T 131

austerity xi, 84, 177, 191, 223

Australia 152

autodidacts 183

automation xii, 103, 105, 106, 108, 138, 208, 215, 295

B

Babbage, Charles 119

Bangkok riots, Thailand (1968) x

Bangladesh

dismantlement of old ships 250

factories 129, 174, 292

industrialisation 123

labour 108, 123, 129

protests against unsafe labour conditions 280

textile mill tragedies 249

Bank of England 45, 46

banking

bonuses 164

electronic 92, 100, 277

excessive charges 84

interbank lending 233

and monopoly power 143

national banks supplant local banking in Britain and France 158

net transfers between banks 28

power of bankers 75

private banks 233

profits 54

regional banks 158

shell games 54–5

systematic banking malfeasance 54, 61

Baran, Paul and Sweezy, Paul:

_Monopoly Capitalism_ 136

Barcelona 141, 160

_barrios pobres_ ix

barter 24, 25, 29

Battersea Power Station, London 255

_Battle of Algiers, The_ (film) 288

Bavaria, Germany 143, 150

Becker, Gary 186

Bernanke, Ben 47

Bhutan 171

billionaires xi, 165, 169, 170

biodiversity 246, 254, 255, 260

biofuels 3

biomedical engineering xii

Birmingham 149

Bitcoin 36, 109

Black Panthers 291

_Blade Runner_ (film) 271

Blankfein, Lloyd 239–40

Bohr, Niels 70

Bolivia 257, 260, 284

bondholders xii, 32, 51, 152, 158, 223, 240, 244, 245

bonuses 54, 77, 164, 178

Bourdieu, Pierre 186, 187

bourgeois morality 195

bourgeois reformism 167, 211

‘Brady Bonds’ 240

Braudel, Fernand 193

Braverman, Harry: _Labor and_

_Monopoly Capital_ 119

Brazil

a BRIC country 170, 228

coffee growers 257

poverty grants 107

unrest in (2013) 171, 243, 293

Brecht, Bertolt 265, 293

Bretton Woods (1944) 46

brewing trade 138

BRIC countries 10, 170, 174, 228

Britain

alliance between state and London merchant capitalists 44–5

banking 158

enclosure movement 58

lends to United States (nineteenth century) 153

suppression of Mau Mau 291

surpluses of capital and labour sent to colonies 152–3

welfare state 165

_see also_ United Kingdom

British Empire 115, 174

British Museum Library, London 4

British Petroleum (BP) 61, 128

Buffett, Peter 211–12, 245, 283, 285

Buffett, Warren 211

bureaucracy 121–2, 165, 203, 251

Bush, George, Jr 201, 202

C

Cabet, Étienne 183

Cabral, Amilcar 291

cadastral mapping 41

Cadbury 18

Cairo uprising (2011) 99

Calhoun, Craig 178

California 29, 196, 254

Canada 152

Cape Canaveral, Florida 196

capital

abolition of monopolisable skills 119–20

aim of 92, 96–7, 232

alternatives to 36, 69, 89, 162

annihilation of space through time 138, 147, 178

capital-labour contradiction 65, 66, 68–9

and capitalism 7, 57, 68, 115, 166, 218

centralisation of 135, 142

circulation of 5, 7, 8, 53, 63, 67, 73, 74, 75, 79, 88, 99, 147, 168,
172, 177, 234, 247, 251, 276

commodity 74, 81

control over labour 102–3, 116–17, 166, 171–2, 274, 291–2

creation of 57

cultural 186

destruction of 154, 196, 233–4

and division of labour 112

economic engine of 8, 10, 97, 168, 172, 200, 253, 265, 268

evolution of 54, 151, 171, 270

exploitation by 156, 195

fictitious 32–3, 34, 76, 101, 110–11, 239–42

fixed 75–8, 155, 234

importance of uneven geographical development to 161

inequality foundational for 171–2

investment in fixed capital 75

innovations 4

legal-illegal duality 72

limitless growth of 37

new form of 4, 14

parasitic forms of 245

power of xii, 36, 47

private capital accumulation 23

privatisation of 61

process-thing duality 70–78

profitability of 184, 191–2

purpose of 92

realisation of 88, 173, 192, 212, 231, 235, 242, 268, 273

relation to nature 246–63

reproduction of 4, 47, 55, 63, 64, 88, 97, 108, 130, 146, 161, 168, 171,
172, 180, 181, 182, 189, 194, 219, 233, 252

spatiality of 99

and surplus value 63

surpluses of 151, 152, 153

temporality of 99

tension between fixed and circulating capital 75–8, 88, 89

turnover time of 73, 99, 147

and wage rates 173

capital accumulation, exponential growth of 229

capital gains 85, 179

capital accumulation 7, 8, 75, 76, 78, 102, 149, 151–5, 159, 172, 173,
179, 192, 209, 223, 228–32, 238, 241, 243, 244, 247, 273, 274, 276

basic architecture for 88

and capital’s aim 92, 96

collapse of 106

compound rate of 228–9

and the credit system 83

and democratisation 43

and demographic growth 231

and household consumerism 192

and lack of aggregate effective demand in the market 81

and the land market 59

and Marx 5

maximising 98

models of 53

in a new territories 152–3

perpetual 92, 110, 146, 162, 233, 265

private 23

promotion of 34

and the property market 50

recent problems of 10

and the state 48

capitalism

ailing 58

an alternative to 36

and capital 7, 57, 68, 115, 166, 218

city landscape of 160

consumerist 197

contagious predatory lawlessness within 109

crises essential to its reproduction ix;

defined 7

and demand-side management 85

and democracy 43

disaster 254–5, 255

economic engine of xiii, 7–8, 11, 110, 220, 221, 252, 279

evolution of 218

geographical landscape of 146, 159

global xi–xii, 108, 124

history of 7

‘knowledge-based’ xii, 238

and money power 33

and a moneyless economy 36

neoliberal 266

political economy of xiv;

and private property rights 41

and racialisation 8

reproduction of ix;

revivified xi;

vulture 162

capitalist markets 33, 53

capitalo-centric studies 10

car industry 121, 138, 148, 158, 188

carbon trading 235, 250

Caribbean migrants 115

Cartesian thinking 247

Cato Institute 143

Central America 136

central banks/bankers xi–xii, 37, 45, 46, 48, 51, 109, 142, 156, 161,
173, 233, 245

centralisation 135, 142, 144, 145, 146, 149, 150, 219

Césaire, Aimé 291

CFCs (chloro-fluorocarbons) 248, 254, 256, 259

chambers of commerce 168

Chandler, Alfred 141

Chaplin, Charlie 103

Charles I, King 199

Chartism 184

Chávez, Hugo 123, 201

cheating 57, 61, 63

Cheney, Dick 289

Chicago riots (1968) x

chicanery 60, 72

children 174

exploitation of 195

raising 188, 190

trading of 26

violence and abuse of 193

Chile 136, 194, 280

coup of 1973 165, 201

China

air quality 250, 258

becomes dynamic centre of a global capitalism 124

a BRIC country 170, 228

capital in (after 2000) 154

class struggles 233

and competition 150, 161

consumerism 194–5, 236

decentralisation 49

_dirigiste_ governmentality 48

dismantlement of old ships 250

dispossessions in 58

education 184, 187

factories 123, 129, 174, 182

famine in 124–5

‘great leap forward’ 125

growth of 170, 227, 232

income inequalities 169

industrialisation 232

Keynesian demand-side and debt-financed expansion xi;

labour 80, 82, 107, 108, 123, 174, 230

life expectancy 259

personal debt 194

remittances 175

special economic zones 41, 144

speculative booms and bubbles in housing markets 21

suburbanisation 253

and technology 101

toxic batteries 249–50

unstable lurches forward 10

urban and infrastructural projects 151

urbanisation 232

Chinese Communist Party 108, 142

Church, the 185, 189, 199

circular cumulative causation 150

CitiBank 61

citizenship rights 168

civil rights 202, 205

class

affluent classes 205

alliances 143, 149

class analysis xiii;

conflict 85, 159

domination 91, 110

plutocratic capitalist xiii;

power 55, 61, 88, 89, 92, 97, 99, 110, 134, 135, 221, 279

and race 166, 291

rule 91

structure 91

class struggle 34, 54, 67, 68, 85, 99, 103, 110, 116, 120, 135, 159,
172, 175, 183, 214, 233

climate change 4, 253–6, 259

Clinton, President Bill 176

_Cloud Atlas_ (film) 271

CNN 285

coal 3, 255

coercion x, 41–4, 53, 60–63, 79, 95, 201, 286

Cold War 153, 165

collateralised debt obligations (CDOs) 78

Collins, Suzanne: _The Hunger Games_ 264

Colombia 280

colonialism 257

the colonised 289–90

indigenous populations 39, 40

liberation from colonial rule 202

philanthropic 208, 285

colonisation 229, 262

‘combinatorial evolution’ 96, 102, 104, 146, 147, 248

commercialisation 262, 263, 266

commodification 24, 55, 57, 59–63, 88, 115, 140, 141, 192, 193, 235,
243, 251, 253, 260, 262, 263, 273

commodities

advertising 275

asking price 31

and barter 24

commodity exchange 39, 64

compared with products 25–6

defective or dangerous 72

definition 39

devaluation of 234

exchange value 15, 25

falling costs of 117

importance of workers as buyers 80–81

international trade in 256

labour power as a commodity 62

low-value 29

mobility of 147–8

obsolescence 236

single metric of value 24

unique 140–41

use value 15, 26, 35

commodity markets 49

‘common capital of the class’ 142, 143

common wealth

created by social labour 53

private appropriation of 53, 54, 55, 61, 88, 89

reproduction of 61

use values 53

commons

collective management of 50

crucial 295

enclosure of 41, 235

natural 250

privatised 250

communications 99, 147, 148, 177

communism 196

collapse of (1989) xii, 165

communist parties 136

during

Cold War 165

scientific 269

socialism/communism 91, 269

comparative advantage 122

competition

and alienated workers 125

avoiding 31

between capitals 172

between energy and food production 3

decentralised 145

and deflationary crisis (1930s) 136

foreign 148, 155

geopolitical 219

inter-capitalist 110

international 154, 175

interstate 110

interterritorial 219

in labour market 116

and monopoly 131–45, 146, 218

and technology 92–3

and turnover time of capital 73, 99

and wages 135

competitive advantage 73, 93, 96, 112, 161

competitive market 131, 132

competitiveness 184

complementarity principle of 70

compounding growth 37, 49, 222, 227, 228, 233, 234, 235, 243, 244

perpetual 222–45, 296

computerisation 100, 120, 222

computers 92, 100, 105, 119

hardware 92, 101

organisational forms 92, 93, 99, 101

programming 120

software 92, 99, 101, 115, 116

conscience laundering 211, 245, 284, 286

Conscious Capitalism 284

constitutional rights 58

constitutionality 60, 61

constitutions

progressive 284

and social bond between human rights and private property 40

US Constitution 284

and usurpation of power 45

consumerism 89, 106, 160, 192–5, 197, 198, 236, 274–7

containerisation 138, 148, 158

contracts 71, 72, 93, 207

contradictions

Aristotelian conception of 4

between money and the social labour money represents 83

between reality and appearance 4–6

between use and exchange value 83

of capital and capitalism 68

contagious intensification of 14

creative use of 3

dialectical conception of 4

differing reactions to 2–3

and general crises 14

and innovation 3

moved around rather than resolved 3–4

multiple 33, 42

resolution of 3, 4

two modes of usage 1–2

unstable 89

Controller of the Currency 120

corporations

and common wealth 54

corporate management 98–9

power of 57–8, 136

and private property 39–40

‘visible hand’ 141–2

corruption 53, 197, 266

cosmopolitanism 285

cost of living 164, 175

credit cards 67, 133, 277

credit card companies 54, 84, 278

credit financing 152

credit system 83, 92, 101, 111, 239

crises

changes in mental conceptions of the world ix-x;

crisis of capital 4

defined 4

essential to the reproduction of capitalism ix;

general crisis ensuing from contagions 14

housing markets crisis (2007–9) 18, 20, 22

reconfiguration of physical landscapes ix;

slow resolution of x;

sovereign debt crisis (after 2012) 37

currency markets, turbulence of (late 1960s) x

customary rights 41, 59, 198

D

Davos conferences 169

DDT 259

Debord, Guy: _The Society of the Spectacle_ 236

debt creation 236

debt encumbrancy 212

debt peonage 62, 212

decentralisation 49, 142, 143, 144, 146, 148, 219, 281, 295

Declaration of Independence (US) 284

decolonisation 282, 288, 290

decommodification 85

deindustrialisation xii, 77–8, 98, 110, 148, 153, 159, 234

DeLong, Bradford 228

demand management 81, 82, 106, 176

demand-side management 85

democracy 47, 215

bourgeois 43, 49

governance within capitalism 43

social 190

totalitarian 220, 292

democratic governance 220, 266

democratisation 43

Deng Xiaoping x

depressions 49, 227 1930s x, 108, 136, 169, 227, 232, 234

Descartes, René 247

Detroit 77, 136, 138, 148, 150, 152, 155, 159, 160

devaluation 153, 155, 162

of capital 233

of commodities 234

crises 150–51, 152, 154

localised 154

regional 154

developing countries 16, 240

Dhaka, Bangladesh 77

dialectics 70

Dickens, Charles 126, 169

_Bleak House_ 226

_Dombey and Son_ 184

digital revolution 144

disabled, the 202

_see also_ handicapped

discrimination 7, 8, 68, 116, 297

diseases 10, 211, 246, 254, 260

disempowerment 81, 103, 116, 119, 198, 270

disinvestment 78

Disneyfication 276

dispossession

accumulation by 60, 67, 68, 84, 101, 111, 133, 141, 212

and capital 54, 55, 57

economies of 162

of indigenous populations 40, 59, 207

‘land grabs’ 58

of land rights of the Irish 40

of the marginalised 198

political economy of 58

distributional equality 172

distributional shares 164–5, 166

division of labour 24, 71, 112–30, 154, 184, 268, 270

and Adam Smith 98, 118

defined 112

‘the detail division of labour’ 118, 121

distinctions and oppositions 113–14

evolution of 112, 120, 121, 126

and gender 114–15

increasing complexity of 124, 125, 126

industrial proletariat 114

and innovation 96

‘new international division of labour’ 122–3

organisation of 98

proliferating 121

relation between the parts and the whole 112

social 113, 118, 121, 125

technical 113, 295

uneven geographical developments in 130

dot-com bubble (1990s) 222–3, 241

‘double coincidence of wants and needs’ 24

drugs 32, 193, 248

cartels 54

Durkheim, Emile 122, 125

Dust Bowl (United States, 1930s) 257

dynamism 92, 104, 146, 219

dystopia 229, 232, 264

E

Eagleton , Terry: _Why Marx Was Right_ 1, 21, 200, 214–15

East Asia

crisis of 1997–98 154

_dirigiste_ governmentality 48

education 184

rise of 170

Eastern Europe 115, 230

ecological offsets 250

economic rationality 211, 250, 252, 273, 274, 275, 277, 278, 279

economies 48

advanced capitalist 228, 236

agglomeration 149

of dispossession 162

domination of industrial cartels and finance capital 135

household 192

informal 175

knowledge-based 188

mature 227–8

regional 149

reoriented to demand-side management 85

of scale 75

solidarity 66, 180

stagnant xii

ecosystems 207, 247, 248, 251–6, 258, 261, 263, 296

Ecuador 46, 152, 284

education 23, 58, 60, 67–8, 84, 110, 127–8, 129, 134, 150, 156, 168,
183, 184, 185, 187, 188, 189, 223, 235, 296

efficiency 71, 92, 93, 98, 103, 117, 118, 119, 122, 126, 272, 273, 284

efficient market hypothesis 118

Egypt 107, 280, 293

Ehrlich, Paul 246

electronics 120, 121, 129, 236, 292

emerging markets 170–71, 242

employment 37

capital in command of job creation 172, 174

conditions of 128

full-time 274

opportunities for xii, 108, 168

regional crises of 151

of women 108, 114, 115, 127

_see also_ labour

enclosure movement 58

Engels, Friedrich 70

_The Condition of the English Working Class in England_ 292

English Civil War (1642–9) 199

Enlightenment 247

Enron 133, 241

environmental damage 49, 61, 110, 111, 113, 232, 249–50, 255, 257, 258,
259, 265, 286, 293

environmental movement 249, 252

environmentalism 249, 252–3

Epicurus 283

equal rights 64

Erasmus, Desiderius 283

ethnic hatreds and discriminations 8, 165

ethnic minorities 168

ethnicisation 62

ethnicity 7, 68, 116

euro, the 15, 37, 46

Europe

deindustrialisation in 234

economic development in 10

fascist parties 280

low population growth rate 230

social democratic era 18

unemployment 108

women in labour force 230

European Central Bank 37, 46, 51

European Commission 51

European Union (EU) 95, 159

exchange values

commodities 15, 25, 64

dominance of 266

and housing 14–23, 43

and money 28, 35, 38

uniform and qualitatively identical 15

and use values 15, 35, 42, 44, 50, 60, 65, 88

exclusionary permanent ownership rights 39

experts 122

exploitation 49, 54, 57, 62, 68, 75, 83, 107, 108, 124, 126, 128, 129,
150, 156, 159, 166, 175, 176, 182, 185, 193, 195, 208, 246, 257

exponential growth 224, 240, 254

capacity for 230

of capital 246

of capital accumulation 223, 229

of capitalist activity 253

and capital’s ecosystem 255

in computer power 105

and environmental resources 260

in human affairs 229

and innovations in finance and banking 100

potential dangers of 222, 223

of sophisticated technologies 100

expropriation 207

externality effects 43–4

Exxon 128

F

Facebook 236, 278, 279

factories ix, 123, 129, 160, 174, 182, 247, 292

Factory Act (1864) 127, 183

famine 124–5, 229, 246

Fannie Mae 50

Fanon, Frantz 287

_The Wretched of the Earth_ 288–90, 293

fascist parties 280

favelas ix, 16, 84, 175

feminisation 115

feminists 189, 192, 283

fertilisers 255

fetishes, fetishism 4–7, 31, 36–7, 61, 103, 111, 179, 198, 243, 245,
269, 278

feudalism 41

financial markets 60, 133

financialisation 238

FIRE (finance, insurance and real estate) sections 113

fishing 59, 113, 148, 249, 250

fixity and motion 75–8, 88, 89, 146, 155

Food and Drug Administration 120

food

production/supply 3, 229, 246, 248, 252

security 253, 294, 296

stamp aid 206, 292

Ford, Martin 104–8, 111, 273

foreclosure 21, 22, 24, 54, 58, 241, 268

forestry 113, 148, 257

fossil fuels 3–4

Foucault, Michel xiii, 204, 209, 280–81

Fourier, François Marie Charles 183

Fourierists 18

Fourteen Points 201

France

banking 158

_dirigiste_ governmentality under de Gaulle 48

and European Central Bank 46

fascist parties 280

Francis, Pope 293

Apostolic Exhortation 275–6

Frankfurt School 261

Freddie Mac 50

free trade 138, 157

freedom 47, 48, 142, 143, 218, 219, 220, 265, 267–270, 276, 279–82, 285,
288, 296

and centralised power 142

cultural 168

freedom and domination 199–215, 219, 268, 285

and the good life 215

and money creation 51

popular desire for 43

religious 168

and state finances 48

under the rule of capital 64

_see also_ liberty and freedom

freedom of movement 47, 296

freedom of thought 200

freedom of the press 213

French Revolution 203, 213, 284

G

G7 159

G20 159

Gallup survey of work 271–2

Gandhi, Mahatma 284, 291

Gaulle, Charles de 48

gay rights 166

GDP 194, 195, 223

Gehry, Frank 141

gender discriminations 7, 8, 68, 165

gene sequences 60

General Motors xii

genetic engineering xii, 101, 247

genetic materials 235, 241, 251, 261

genetically modified foods 101

genocide 8

gentrification 19, 84, 141, 276

geocentric model 5

geographical landscape

building a new 151, 155

of capitalism 159

evolution of 146–7

instability of 146

soulless, rationalised 157

geopolitical struggles 8, 154

Germany

and austerity 223

autobahns built 151

and European Central Bank 46

inflation during 1920s 30

wage repression 158–9

Gesell, Silvio 35

Ghana 291

global economic crisis (2007–9) 22, 23, 47, 118, 124, 132, 151, 170,
228, 232, 234, 235, 241

global financialisation x, 177–8

global warming 260

globalisation 136, 174, 176, 179, 223, 293

gold 27–31, 33, 37, 57, 227, 233, 238, 240

Golden Dawn 280

Goldman Sachs 75, 239

Google 131, 136, 195, 279

Gordon, Robert 222, 223, 230, 239, 304_n_2

Gore, Al 249

Gorz, André 104–5, 107, 242, 270–77, 279

government 60

democratic 48

planning 48

and social bond between human rights and private property 40

spending power 48

governmentality 43, 48, 157, 209, 280–81, 285

Gramsci, Antonio 286, 293

Greco, Thomas 48–9

Greece 160, 161, 162, 171, 235

austerity 223

degradation of the well-being of the masses xi;

fascist parties 280

the power of the bondholders 51, 152

greenwashing 249

Guantanamo Bay, Cuba 202, 284

Guatemala 201

Guevara, Che 291

Guggenheim Museum, Bilbao 141

guild system 117

Guinea-Bissau 291

Gulf Oil Spill (2010) 61

H

Habermas, Jürgen 192

habitat 246, 249, 252, 253, 255

handicapped, the 218 _see also_ disabled

Harvey, David

_The Enigma of Capital_ 265

_Rebel Cities_ 282

Hayek, Friedrich 42

_Road to Serfdom_ 206

health care 23, 58, 60, 67–8, 84, 110, 134, 156, 167, 189, 190, 235, 296

hedge funds 101, 162, 239, 241, 249

managers 164, 178

Heidegger, Martin 59, 250

Heritage Foundation 143

heterotopic spaces 219

Hill, Christopher 199

Ho Chi Minh 291

holocausts 8

homelessness 58

Hong Kong 150, 160

housing 156, 296

asset values 19, 20, 21, 58

‘built to order’ 17

construction 67

controlling externalities 19–20

exchange values 14–23, 43

gated communities ix, 160, 208, 264

high costs 84

home ownership 49–50

investing in improvements 20, 43

mortgages 19, 21, 28, 50, 67, 82

predatory practices 67, 133

production costs 17

rental markets 22

renting or leasing 18–19, 67

self-built 84

self-help 16, 160

slum ix, 16, 175

social 18, 235

speculating in exchange value 20–22

speculative builds 17, 28, 78, 82

tenement 17, 160

terraced 17

tract ix, 17, 82

use values 14–19, 21–2, 23, 67

housing markets 18, 19, 21, 22, 28, 32, 49, 58, 60, 67, 68, 77, 83, 133,
192

crisis (2007–9) 18, 20, 22, 82–3

HSBC 61

Hudson, Michael 222

human capital theory 185, 186

human evolution 229–30

human nature 97, 198, 213, 261, 262, 263

revolt of 263, 264–81

human rights 40, 200, 202

humanism 269

capitalist 212

defined 283

education 128

excesses and dark side 283

and freedom 200, 208, 210

liberal 210, 287, 289

Marxist 284, 286

religious 283

Renaissance 283

revolutionary 212, 221, 282–93

secular 283, 285–6

types of 284

Hungary: fascist parties 280

Husserl, Edmund 192

Huygens, Christiaan 70

I

IBM 128

Iceland: banking 55

identity politics xiii

illegal aliens (‘_sans-papiers_’) 156

illegality 61, 72

immigrants, housing 160

imperialism 135, 136, 143, 201, 257, 258

income

bourgeois disposable 235

disparities of 164–81

levelling up of 171

redistribution to the lower classes xi; _see also_ wages

indebtedness 152, 194, 222

India

billionaires in 170

a BRIC country 170, 228

call centres 139

consumerism 236

dismantlement of old ships 250

labour 107, 230

‘land grabs’ 77

moneylenders 210

social reproduction in 194

software engineers 196

special economic zones 144

unstable lurches forward 10

indigenous populations 193, 202, 257, 283

dispossession of 40, 59, 207

and exclusionary ownership rights 39

individualism 42, 197, 214, 281

Indonesia 129, 160

industrial cartels 135

Industrial Revolution 127

industrialisation 123, 189, 229, 232

inflation 30, 36, 37, 40, 49, 136, 228, 233

inheritance 40

Inner Asia, labour in 108

innovation 132

centres of 96

and the class struggle 103

competitive 219

as a double-edged sword xii;

improving the qualities of daily life 4

labour-saving 104, 106, 107, 108

logistical 147

organisational 147

political 219

product 93

technological 94–5, 105, 147, 219

as a way out of a contradiction 3

insurance companies 278

intellectual property rights xii, 41, 123, 133, 139, 187, 207, 235,
241–2, 251

interest

compound 5, 222, 224, _225_, 226–7

interest-rate manipulations 54

interest rates 54, 186

living off 179, 186

on loans 17

money capital 28, 32

and mortgages 19, 67

on repayment of loans to the state 32

simple _225_, 227

usury 49

Internal Revenue Service income tax returns 164

International Monetary Fund (IMF) 49, 51, 100, 143, 161, 169, 186, 234,
240

internet 158, 220, 278

investment: in fixed capital 75

investment pension funds 35–6

IOUs 30

Iran 232, 289

Iranian Revolution 289

Iraq war 201, 290

Ireland

dispossession of land rights 40

housing market crash (2007–9) 82–3

Istanbul 141

uprising (2013) 99, 129, 171, 243

Italy 51,161, 223, 235

ITT 136

J

Jacobs, Jane 96

James, C.L.R. 291

Japan

1980s economic boom 18

capital in (1980s) 154

economic development in 10

factories 123

growth rate 227

land market crash (1990) 18

low population growth rate 230

and Marshall Plan 153

post-war recovery 161

Jewish Question 213

JPMorgan 61

Judaeo-Christian tradition 283

K

Kant, Immanuel 285

Katz, Cindi 189, 195, 197

Kenya 291

Kerala, India 171

Keynes, John Maynard xi, 46, 76, 244, 266

‘Economic Possibilities for our Grandchildren’ 33–4

_General Theory of Employment, Interest, and Money_ 35

Keynesianism

demand management 82, 105, 176

demand-side and debt-financed

expansion xi

King, Martin Luther 284, 291

knowledge xii, 26, 41, 95, 96, 100, 105, 113, 122, 123, 127, 144, 184,
188, 196, 238, 242, 295

Koch brothers 292

Kohl, Helmut x

L

labour

agitating and fighting for more 64

alienated workers 125, 126, 128, 129, 130

artisan 117, 182–3

and automation 105

capital/labour contradiction 65, 66, 68–9, 146

collective 117

commodification of 57

contracts 71, 72

control over 74, 102–11, 119, 166, 171–2, 274, 291–2

deskilling 111, 119

discipline 65, 79

disempowering workers 81, 103, 116, 119, 270

division of _see_ division of labour; domestic 196

education 127–8, 129, 183, 187

exploitation of 54, 57, 62, 68, 75, 83, 107, 108, 126, 128, 129, 150,
156, 166, 175, 176, 182, 185, 195

factory 122, 123, 237

fair market value 63, 64

Gallup survey 271–2

house building 17

housework 114–15, 192

huge increase in the global wage labour force 107–8

importance of workers as buyers of commodities 80–81

‘industrial reserve army’ 79–80, 173–4

migrations of 118

non-unionised xii;

power of 61–4, 71, 73, 74, 79, 81, 88, 99, 108, 118–19, 127, 173, 175,
183, 189, 207, 233, 267

privatisation of 61

in service 117

skills 116, 118–19, 123, 149, 182–3, 185, 231

social _see_ social labour; surplus 151, 152, 173–4, 175, 195, 233

symbolic 123

and trade unions 116

trading in labour services 62–3

unalienated 66, 89

unionised xii;

unpaid 189

unskilled 114, 185

women in workforce _see under_ women; worked to exhaustion or death 61,
182

_see also_ employment

labour markets 47, 62, 64, 66–9, 71, 102, 114, 116, 118, 166

labour-saving devices 104, 106, 107, 173, 174, 277

labour power

commodification of 61, 88

exploitation of 62, 175

generation of surplus value 63

mobility of 99

monetisation of 61

private property character of 64

privatisation of 61

reserves of 108

Lagos, Nigeria, social reproduction in 195

laissez-faire 118, 205, 207, 281

land

commodification 260–61

concept of 76–7

division of 59

and enclosure movement 58

establishing as private property 41

exhausting its fertility 61

privatisation 59, 61

scarcity 77

urban 251

‘land grabs’ 39, 58, 77, 252

land market 18, 59

land price 17

land registry 41

land rents 78, 85

land rights 40, 93

land-use zoning 43

landlords 54, 67, 83, 140, 179, 251, 261

Latin America

’1and grabs’ 58, 77

labour 107

reductions in social inequality 171

two ‘lost decades’ of development 234

lawyers 22, 26, 67, 82, 245

leasing 16, 17, 18

Lebed, Jonathan 195

Lee Kuan-Yew 48

Leeds 149

Lefebvre, Henri 157, 192

_Critique of Everyday Life_ 197–8

left, the

defence of jobs and skills under threat 110

and the factory worker 68

incapable of mounting opposition to the power of capital xii;

remains of the radical left xii–xiii

Lehman Brothers investment bank, fall of (2008) x–xi, 47, 241

‘leisure’ industries 115

Lenin, Vladimir 135

Leninism 91

Lewis, Michael: _The Big Short_ 20–21

LGBT groups 168, 202, 218

liberation struggle 288, 290

liberty, liberties 44, 48–51, 142, 143, 212, 276, 284, 289

and bourgeois democracy 49

and centralised power 142

and money creation 51

non-coercive individual liberty 42

popular desire for 43

and state finances 48

liberty and freedom 199–215

coercion and violence in pursuit of 201

government surveillance and cracking of encrypted codes 201–2

human rights abuses 202

popular desire for 203

rhetoric on 200–201, 202

life expectancy 250, 258, 259

light, corpuscular theory of 70

living standards xii, 63, 64, 84, 89, 134, 175, 230

loans

fictitious capital 32

housing 19

interest on 17

Locke, John 40, 201, 204

logos 31

London

smog of 1952 255

unrest in (2011) 243

Los Angeles 150, 292

Louis XIV, King of France 245

Lovelace, Richard 199, 200, 203

Luddites 101

M

McCarthyite scourge 56

MacKinnon, Catherine: _Are Women Human?_ 283

Maddison, Angus 227

Maghreb 174

Malcolm X 291

Maldives 260

Malthus, Thomas 229–30, 232–3, 244, 246, 251

Manchester 149, 159

Manhattan Institute 143

Mansion House, London 201

manufacturing 104, 239

Mao Zedong 291

_maquilas_ 129, 174

Marcuse, Herbert 204, 289

market cornering 53

market economy 198, 205, 276

marketisation 243

Marshall Plan 153

Martin, Randy 194

Marx, Karl 106, 118, 122, 142, 207, 211

and alienation 125, 126, 213

in the British Museum library 4

on capital 220

conception of wealth 214

on the credit system 239

and deskilling 119

on equal rights 64

and falling profits 107

and fetishism 4

on freedom 207, 208, 213

and greed 33

‘industrial reserve army’ 79–80

and isolation of workers 125

labour theory of value 109

and monetary system reforms 36

monopoly power and competition 135

reality and appearance 4, 5

as a revolutionary humanist 221

and social reproduction 182

and socialist utopian literature 184

and technological innovation 103

and theorists of the political left 54

and the ‘totally developed individual’ 126–7

and world crises xiii;

_Capital_ 57, 79–80, 81, 82, 119, 129, 132, 269, 286, 291–2

_The Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts of 1844_ 269, 286

_Grundrisse_ 97, 212–13

_Theories of Surplus Value_ 1

Marxism

contradiction between productive forces and social relations 269

‘death of Marxism’ xii;

ecologically sensitive 263

and humanism 284, 286, 287

‘profit squeeze’ theory of crisis formation 65

traditional Marxist conception of socialism/ communism 91

Marxists 65, 109

MasterCard Priceless 275

Mau Mau movement 291

Melbourne 141

merchants 67

and industrial capital 179

price-gouging customers 54

and producers 74–5

Mercosur 159

Mexican migrants 115, 175, 195–6

Mexico 123, 129, 174

Mexico City riots (1968) x

microcredit 194, 198

microfinance 186, 194, 198, 211

Microsoft 131

Middle East 124, 230

Milanovic, Branko 170

military, the

capacities and powers 4

dominance 110

and technology 93, 95

‘military-industrial complex’ 157

mind-brain duality 70

mining 94, 113, 123, 148, 239, 257

MIT (Massachusetts Institute of Technology) 292

Mitchell, David: _Cloud Atlas_ 264

Mitchell, Timothy 122

_Modern Times_ (film) 103

Mondragon 180

monetarism xi

monetary wealth and incomes, inequalities in (1920s) x 1071

monetisation 44, 55, 60, 61, 62, 115, 192–3, 198, 235, 243, 250, 253,
261, 262

money

abandonment of metallic basis of global moneys 30, 37, 109

circulation of 15, 25, 30–31, 35

coinage 15, 27, 29, 30

commodification of 57

commodity moneys 27–31

creation of 30, 51, 173, 233, 238–9, 240

credit moneys 28, 30, 31, 152

cyber moneys 36, 109–10

electronic moneys 27, 29, 35, 36, 100

and exchange value 28, 35, 38

fiat 8, 27, 30, 40, 109, 233

gap between money and the value it represents 27

global monetary system 46–7

love of money as a possession 34

measures value 25, 28

a moneyless economy 36

oxidisation of 35

paper 15, 27, 29, 30, 31, 37, 40, 45

power of 25, 36, 59, 60, 62, 65–66, 131–6, 245, 266

quasi-money 35

relation between money and value 27, 35

represented as numbers 29–30

and social labour 25, 27, 31, 42, 55, 88, 243

and the state 45–6, 51, 173

storage of value 25, 26, 35

the US dollar 46–7

use value 28

money capital 28, 32, 59, 74, 142, 147, 158, 177, 178

money laundering 54, 109

‘money of account’ 27–8, 30

monopolisation 53, 145

monopoly, monopolies 77

and competition 131–45, 218, 295

corporate 123

monetary system 45, 46, 48, 51

monopoly power 45, 46, 51, 93, 117, 120, 132, 133–4, 136, 137, 139, 141,
142–3

monopoly pricing 72, 132

natural 118, 132

of state over legitimate use of force and violence 42, 44, 45, 51, 88,
155, 173

_see also_ prices, monopoly

monopsony 131

Monsanto 123

Montreal Protocol 254, 259

‘moral restraints’ 229, 233

mortgages 19, 21, 28, 32, 54, 67, 82, 239

multiculturalism 166

Mumbai 155, 159

Murdoch, Rupert xi

Myrdal, Gunnar 150

N

NAFTA 159

name branding 31, 139

nano-trading 243

Nation of Islam 291

national debt 45, 226, 227

National Health Service 115

National Labor Relations Board 120

National Security Administration 136

nationalisation 50

nationalism 7, 8, 44, 289

natural resources 58, 59, 123, 240, 241, 244, 246, 251

nature 56

alienation from 263

capital’s conception of 252

capital’s relation to 246–63

commodification of 59

domination of 247, 272

Heidegger on 59, 250

Polanyi on 58

power over 198

process-thing duality 73

and technology 92, 97, 99, 102

Nazis 151

neoclassical economists 109

neocolonialism 143, 201

neoliberal era 128

neoliberal ethic 277

neoliberalisation x, 48

neoliberalism xiii, 68, 72, 128, 134, 136, 176, 191, 234, 281

capitalism 266

consensus 23

counter-revolution 82, 129, 159, 165

political programme 199

politics 57

privatisation 235

remedies xi

Nevada, housing in 77

‘new economy’ (1990s) 144

New York City 141, 150

creativity 245

domestic labour in 196

income inequality 164

rental markets 22

social reproduction 195

Newton, Isaac 70

NGOs (non-governmental organisations) 189, 210, 284, 286, 287

Nike 31

Nkrumah, Kwame 291

‘non-coincidence of interests’ 25

Nordic countries 165

North America

deindustrialisation in 234

food grain exports 148

indigenous population and property rights 39

women in labour force 230

‘not in my back yard’ politics 20

nuclear weapons 101

Nyere, Julius 291

O

Obama, Barack 167

occupational safety and health 72

Occupy movement 280, 292

Ohlin Foundation 143

oil

cartel 252

companies 77, 131

‘Seven Sisters’ 131

embargo (1973) 124

‘peak oil’ 251–2, 260

resources 123, 240, 257

oligarchy, oligarchs 34, 143, 165, 221, 223, 242, 245, 264, 286, 292

oligopoly 131, 136, 138

Olympic Games 237–8

oppositional movements 14, 162, 266–7

oppression 193, 266, 288, 297

Orwell, George 213

_Nineteen Eighty-Four_ 202

overaccumulation 154

overheating 228

Owen, Robert 18, 184

Oxfam xi, 169–70

P

Paine, Tom: _Rights of Man_ 285

Paris 160

riots (1968) x

patents 139, 245, 251

paternalism 165, 209

patriarchy 7

Paulson, Hank 47

pauperisation 104

Peabody, George 18

peasantry ix, 7, 107, 117, 174, 190, 193

revolts 202

pensions 134, 165, 230

rights 58, 67–8, 84, 134

people of colour: disposable

populations 111

Pereire, Emile 239

pesticides 255, 258

pharmaceuticals 95, 121, 123, 136, 139

Philanthropic Colonialism 211

philanthropy 18, 128, 189, 190, 210–11, 245, 285

Philippines 115, 196

Picasso, Pablo 140–41, 187, 240

Pinochet, Augusto x

Pittsburgh 150, 159, 258

planned obsolescence 74

plutocracy xi, xii, 91, 170, 173, 177, 180

Poland 152

Polanyi, Karl 56, 58, 60, 205–7, 210, 261

_The Great Transformation_ 56–7

police 134

brutality 266

capacities and powers 43

powers xiii, 43, 52

repression 264, 280

surveillance and violence 264

violence 266, 280

police-state 203, 220

political economy xiv, 54, 58, 89, 97, 179–80, 182, 201, 206–9

liberal 204, 206, 209

political parties, incapable of

mounting opposition to the power of capital xii

political representation 183

pollutants 8, 246, 255

pollution 43, 57, 59, 60, 150, 250, 254, 255, 258

Pontecorvo, Gillo 288

Ponzi schemes 21, 53, 54, 243

population

ageing 223, 230

disposable 108, 111, 231, 264

growth 107–8, 229, 230–31, 242, 246

Malthus’s principle 229–30

Portugal 161

post-structuralism xiii

potlatch system 33

pounds sterling 46

poverty 229

anti-poverty organisations 286–7

and bourgeois reformism 167

and capital 176

chronic 286

eradication of 211

escape from 170

feminisation of 114

grants 107

and industrialisation 123

and population expansion 229

and unemployment 170, 176

US political movement denies assistance to the poor 292–3

and wealth 146, 168, 177, 218, 219, 243

world xi, 170

power

accumulation of 33, 35

of capital xii, 36

class 55, 61, 88, 89, 97, 99, 110, 134, 135, 221, 279

computer 105

and currencies 46

economic 142, 143, 144

global 34, 170

the house as a sign of 15–16

of labour _see under_ labour; of merchants 75

military 143

and money 25, 33, 36, 49, 59, 60, 62, 63, 65–6, 245, 266

monopoly _see_ monopoly power; oligarchic 292

political 62, 143, 144, 162, 171, 219, 292

purchasing 105, 107

social 33, 35, 55, 62, 64, 294

state 42–5, 47–52, 72, 142, 155–9, 164, 209, 295

predation, predators 53, 54, 61, 67, 77, 84, 101, 109, 111, 133, 162,
198, 212, 254–5

price fixing 53, 118, 132

price gouging 132

Price, Richard 226, 227, 229

prices

discount 133

equilibrium in 118

extortionate 84

food 244, 251

housing 21, 32, 77

land 77, 78, 150

low 132

market 31, 32

and marketplace anarchy 118

monopoly 31, 72, 139, 141

oil 251, 252

property 77, 78, 141, 150

supermarket 6

and value 31, 55–6

private equity firms 101, 162

private equity funds 22, 162

private property

and the commons 41, 50, 57

and eradication of usufructuary rights 41

and individual appropriation 38

and monopoly power 134–5, 137

social bond between human rights and private property 39–40

and the state 47, 50, 58, 59, 146, 210

private property rights 38–42, 44, 58, 204, 252

and collective management 50

conferring the right to trade away that which is owned 39

decentralised 44

exclusionary permanent ownership rights 39

and externality effects 44

held in perpetuity 40

intellectual property rights 41

microenterprises endowed with 211

modification or abolition of the regime 14

and nature 250

over commodities and money 38

and state power 40–41, 42–3

underpinning home ownership 49

usufructuary rights 39

privatisation 23, 24, 48, 59, 60, 61, 84, 185, 235, 250, 253, 261, 262,
266

product lines 92, 107, 219, 236

production

bourgeois 1

falling value of 107

immaterial 242

increase in volume and variety of 121

organised 2

and realisation 67, 79–85, 106, 107, 108, 173, 177, 179, 180, 221, 243

regional crises 151

workers’ dispossession of own means of 172

productivity 71, 91, 92, 93, 117, 118, 121, 125, 126, 132, 172, 173,
184, 185, 188, 220, 239

products, compared with

commodities 25–6

profitability 92, 94, 98, 102, 103, 104, 106, 112, 116, 118, 125, 147,
184, 191–2, 240, 252, 253, 256, 257

profit(s)

banking 54

as capital’s aim 92, 96, 232

and capital’s struggle against labour 64, 65

and competition 93

entrepreneurs 24, 104

falling 81, 107, 244

from commodity sales 71

and money capital 28

monopoly 93

rate of 79, 92

reinvestment in expansion 72

root of 63

spending of 15

and wage rates 172

proletarianisation 191

partial 175, 190, 191

‘property bubble’ 21

property market

boom (1920s) 239

growth of 50

property market crashes

1928 x, 21

1973 21

2008 21–2, 54, 241

property rights 39, 41, 93, 135

_see also_ intellectual property

rights; private property

property values 78, 85, 234

‘prosumers’ 237

Proudhon, Pierre-Joseph 183

Prozac 248

public goods 38

public utilities 23, 60, 118, 132

Q

quantitative easing 30, 233

R

R&D ix

race 68, 116, 165, 166, 291

racial minorities 168

racialisation 7, 8, 62, 68

racism 8

Rand, Ayn 200

raw materials 16, 17, 148, 149, 154

Reagan, Ronald x, 72

Speech at Westminster 201

Reagan revolution 165–166

realisation, and production 67, 79–85, 106, 107, 108, 173, 177, 179,
180, 221, 243

reality

contradiction between reality and appearance 4–6

social 27

Reclus, Elisée 140

regional development 151

regional volatility 154

Reich, Robert 123, 188

religion 7

religious affiliation 68

religious

hatreds and discriminations 8

religious minorities 168

remittances 175

rent seeking 132–3, 142

rentiers 76, 77, 78, 89, 150, 179, 180, 241, 244, 251, 260, 261, 276

rents xii, 16–19, 22, 32, 54, 67, 77, 78, 84, 123, 179, 241

monopoly 93, 135, 141, 187, 251

repression 271, 280

autocratic 130

militarised 264

police-state 203

violent 269, 280, 297

wage 158, 274

Republican Party (US) 145, 280

Republicans (US) 167, 206

_res nullius_ doctrine 40

research and development 94, 96, 187

‘resource curse’ 123

resource scarcity 77

revolution, Fanon’s view of 288

revolutionary movements 202, 276

Ricardo, David 122, 244, 251

right, the

ideological and political assault on the left xii;

response to universal alienation 281

‘rights of man’ 40, 59, 213

Rio de Janeiro 84

risk 17, 141, 162, 219, 240

robbery 53, 57, 60, 63, 72

robotisation 103, 119, 188, 295

Rodney, Walter 291

romantic movement 261

Roosevelt, Theodore 131, 135

Four Freedoms 201

Rousseau, Jean-Jacques 213, 214

Ruhr, Germany 150

rural landscapes 160–61

Russia 154

a BRIC country 170, 228

collapse of (1989) 165

financial crisis (1998) 154, 232

indebtedness 152

local famine 124

oligarchs take natural resource wealth 165

S

‘S’ curve _225_, 230–31

Saint-Simon, Claude de Rouvroy, comte de 183

sales 28, 31, 187, 236

San Francisco 150

Santiago, Chile: street battles (2006–) 185

Sao Paulo, Brazil 129, 195

savings

the house as a form of saving 19, 22, 58

loss of 20, 58

private 36

protecting the value of 20

Savings and Loan Crisis (USA from 1986) 18

savings accounts 5, 6

Scandinavia 18, 85, 165

scarcity 37, 77, 200, 208, 240, 246, 260, 273

Schumpeter, Joseph 98, 276

science, and technology 95

Seattle 196

Second Empire Paris 197

Second World War x, 161, 234

Securities and Exchange

Commission 120, 195

security xiii, 16, 121, 122, 165, 205, 206

economic 36, 153

food 253, 294, 296

job 273

national 157

Sen, Amartya 208–11, 281

_Development as Freedom_ 208–9

senior citizens 168

Seoul 84

serfdom 62, 209

sexual hatreds and discriminations 8

Shanghai 153, 160

share-cropping 62

Sheffield 148, 149, 159, 258

Shenzhen, China 77

Silicon Valley 16, 143, 144, 150

silver 27–31, 33, 37, 57, 233, 238

Simon, Julian 246

Singapore 48, 123, 150, 184, 187, 203

slavery 62, 202, 206, 209, 213, 268

slums ix, 16, 175

Smith, Adam 98, 125–6, 157, 185, 201, 204

‘invisible hand’ 141–2

_The Wealth of Nations_ 118, 132

Smith, Neil 248

social distinction 68, 166

social inequality 34, 110, 111, 130, 171, 177, 180, 220, 223, 266

social justice 200, 266, 268, 276

social labour 53, 73, 295

alienated 64, 66, 88

and common wealth 53

creation of use values through 36

expansion of total output 232

household and communal work 296

immateriality of 37, 233

and money 25, 27, 31, 42, 55, 88, 243

productivity 239

and profit 104

and value 26, 27, 29, 104, 106, 107, 109

weakening regulatory role of 109, 110

social media 99, 136, 236–7, 278–9

social movements 162–3

social reproduction 80, 127, 182–98, 218, 219, 220, 276

social security 36, 165

social services 68

social struggles 156, 159, 165, 168

social value 26, 27, 32, 33, 55, 172, 179, 241, 244, 268, 270

socialism 215

democratic xii;

‘gas and water’ 183

socialism/communism 91, 269

socialist revolution 67

socialist totalitarianism 205

society

capitalist 15, 34, 81, 243, 259

civil 92, 122, 156, 185, 189, 252

civilised 161, 167

complex 26

demolition of 56

and freedom 205–6, 210, 212

hope for a better society 218

industrial 205

information 238

market 204

post-colonial 203

pre-capitalist 55

primitive 57

radical transformation of 290

status position in 186

theocratic 62

women in 113

work-based 273

world 204

soil erosion 257

South Africa 84–5, 152, 169

apartheid 169, 202, 203

South Asia

labour 108

population growth 230

software programmers and developers 115, 116

South Korea 123, 148, 150, 153

South-East Asia 107–8

crisis (1997–8) 154, 232, 241

sovereign debt crises 37

Soviet Bloc, ex-, labour in 107

Soviet Union 196, 202

_see also_ Russia

Spain xi, 51, 161

housing market crash (2007–9) 82–3

spatio-temporal fixes 151–2, 153, 154, 162

spectacle 237–8, 242, 278

speculative bubbles and busts 178

stagnation xii, 136, 161–2, 169

Stalin, Joseph 70

standard of life 23, 175

starvation 56, 124, 246, 249, 260, 265

state, the

aim of 156–7

brutality 266, 280

and capital accumulation 48

and civil society 156

curbing the powers of capital as private property 47

evolution of the capitalist state 42

and externality effects 44

guardian of private property and of individual rights 42

and home ownership 49–50

interstate system 156, 157

interventionism 193, 205

legitimate use of violence 42, 44, 45, 51, 88, 155, 173

loss of state sovereignty xii;

and money 1, 45–6, 51, 173

‘nightwatchman’ role 42, 50

powers of 42–5, 47–52, 57–8, 65, 72, 142, 155–9, 209, 295

and private property 47, 50, 58, 59, 146, 210

provision of collective and public goods 42–3

a security and surveillance state xiii;

social democratic states 85

war aims 44

state benefits 165

state regulatory agencies 101

state-finance nexus 44–5, 46–7, 142–3, 156, 233

state-private property nexus 88–9

steam engine, invention of the 3

steel industry 120, 121, 148, 188

steel production 73–4

Stiglitz, Joseph 132–4

stock market crash (1929) x

Stockholm, protests in (2013) 171, 243

strikes 65, 103, 124

sub-prime mortgage crisis 50

suburbanisation 253

supply and demand 31, 33, 56, 106

supply chain 124

supply-side remedies xi

supply-side theories 82, 176

surplus value 28, 40, 63, 73, 79–83, 172, 239

surveillance xiii, 94, 121, 122, 201, 220, 264, 280, 292

Sweden 166, 167

protests in (2013) 129, 293

Sweezy, Paul 136

swindlers, swindling 45, 53, 57, 239

‘symbolic analysts’ 188

Syntagma Square, Athens 266, 280

T

Tahrir Square, Cairo 266

Taipei, Taiwan 153

Taiwan 123, 150, 153

Taksim Square, Istanbul 266, 280

Tanzania 291

tariffs 137

taxation 40, 43, 47, 67, 84, 93–4, 106, 133, 150, 155, 157, 167, 168,
172, 190

Taylor, Frederick 119, 126

Taylorism 103

Tea Party faction 205, 280, 281, 292

technological evolution 95–6, 97, 101–2, 109

technological imperatives 98–101

technological innovation 94–5

technology

changes involving different branches of state apparatus 93–4

communicative technologies 278–9

and competition 92–3

constraints inhibiting deployment 101

culture of 227, 271

definition 92, 248

and devaluation of commodities 234

environmental 248

generic technologies 94

hardware 92, 101

humanising 271

information 100, 147, 158, 177

military 93, 95

monetary 109

and nature 92, 97, 99, 102

organisational forms 92, 99, 101

and productivity 71

relation to nature 92

research and development 94

and science 95

software 92, 99, 101

a specialist field of business 94

and unemployment 80, 103

work and labour control 102–11

telephone companies 54, 67, 84, 278

Tennessee 148

Teresa, Mother 284

Thatcher, Margaret (later Baroness)

x, 72, 214, 259

Thatcherism 165

theft 53, 60, 61, 63

Thelluson, Peter 226, 227

think tanks 143

‘Third Italy’ 143

Third World debt crisis 240

Toffler, Alvin 237

tolls 137

Tönnies, Ferdinand 122, 125

tourism ix, 16, 140, 141, 187, 236

medical 139

toxic waste disposal 249–50, 257

trade networks 24

trade unions xii, 116, 148, 168, 176, 184, 274, 280

trade wars 154

transportation 23, 99, 132, 147–8, 150, 296

Treasury Departments 46, 156

TRIPS agreement 242

tropical rainforest 253

‘trust-busting’ 131

trusts 135

Turin, Italy 150

Turkey 107, 123, 174, 232, 280, 293

Tuscany, Italy 150

Tutu, Archbishop Desmond 284

Twitter 236

U

unemployment 37, 104, 258, 273

benefits 176

deliberately created 65, 174

high xii, 10, 176

insurance 175

and labour reserves 175, 231

and labour-saving technologies 173

long-term 108, 129

permanent 111

echnologically induced 80, 103, 173, 274

uneven geographical developments 178, 296

advanced and underserved regional economies 149–50

and anti-capitalist movements 162

asset bubbles 243

and capital’s reinvention of itself 147, 161

macroeconomic processes of 159

masking the true nature of capital 159–60

and technological forms 219

volatility in 244

United Fruit 136

United Kingdom

income inequality in 169; _see also_ Britain

United Nations (UN) 285

United States

aim of Tea Party faction 280

banking 158

Bill of Rights 284

Britain lends to (nineteenth century) 153

capital in (1990s) 154

Constitution 284

consumption level 194

global reserve currency 45–6

growth 232

hostility towards state interventions 167

House of Representatives 206

human rights abuses 202

imperial power 46

indebtedness of students in 194

Indian reservations 249

interstate highway system 239

jobless recoveries after recession 172–3

liberty and freedom rhetoric 200–201, 202

Midwest ‘rust belt’ 151

military expenditures 46

property market crashes x, 21–2, 50, 54, 58, 82–3

racial issues 166

Savings and Loan Crisis (from 1986) 18

social mobility 196

social reproduction 196–7

solidly capitalist 166

steel industry 120

‘symbolic analysts’ 188

‘trust-busting’ 131

unemployment 108

wealth distribution 167

welfare system 176

universal suffrage 183

urbanisation 151, 189, 228, 232, 239, 247, 254, 255, 261

Ure, Andrew 119

US Congress 47

US dollar 15, 30, 45–6

US Executive Branch 47

US Federal Reserve xi, 6, 30, 37, 46, 47, 49, 132, 143, 233

monetary policy 170–71

US Housing Act (1949) 18

US Treasury 47, 142, 240

use values

collectively managed pool of 36

commodification of 243

commodities 15, 26, 35

common wealth 53

creation through social labour 36

and entrepreneurs 23–4

and exchange values 15, 35, 42, 44, 50, 60, 65, 88

and housing 14–19, 21–2, 23, 67

and human labour 26

infinitely varied 15

of infrastructural provision 78

loss of 58

marketisation of 243

monetisation of 243

of money 28

privatised and commodified 23

provision of 111

and revolt of the mass of the people 60

social demand for 81

usufructuary rights 39, 41, 59

usury 49, 53, 186, 194

utopianism 18, 35, 42, 51, 66, 119, 132, 183, 184, 204, 206–10, 269,
281, 282

V

value(s)

commodity 24, 25

failure to produce 40

housing 19, 20, 22

net 19

production and realisation of 82

production of 239

property 21

relation between money and value 27, 35

savings 20

storing 25, 26, 35

_see also_ asset values; exchange values; social value; use values

value added 79, 83

Veblen, Thorstein: _Theory of the Leisure Class_ 274

Venezuela 123, 201

Vietnam, labour in 108

Vietnam War 290

violence 53, 57, 72, 204–5, 286

against children 193

against social movements 266

against women 193

colonial 289–90, 291

and contemporary capitalism 8

culture of 271

of dispossession 58, 59

in a dystopian world 264

and humanism 286, 289, 291

of the liberation struggle 290

militarised 292

as the only option 290–91

political 280

in pursuit of liberty and freedom 201

racialised 291

state’s legitimate use of 42, 44, 45, 51, 88, 155, 173

of technology 271

and wage labour 207

virtual ecological transfer 256

Volcker, Paul 37

W

wages 103

basic social wage 103

falling 80, 82

for housework 115, 192–3

low xii, 114, 116, 186, 188

lower bound to wage levels 175

non-payment of 72

and profits 172

reduction in 81, 103, 104, 135, 168, 172, 176, 178

rising 178

and unskilled labour 114

wage demands 150, 274

wage levels pushed up by labour 65

wage rates 103, 116, 172, 173

wage repression 158–9

weekly 71

_see also_ income

Wall Street

criticised by a congressional committee 239–40

illegalities practised by 72, 77

and Lebed 195

new information-processing technologies 100

Wall Street Crash (1929) x, 47

_Wall-E_ (film) 271

Walmart xii, 75, 84, 103, 131

war on terror 280

wars 8, 60, 229

currency 154

defined 44

monetisation of state war-making activities 44–5

privatisation of war making 235

resource 154, 260

and state aims 44

state financing of 32, 44, 48

and technology 93

trade 154

world 154

water privatisation 235

wave theory 70

wave-particle duality 70

wealth

accumulation of 33, 34, 35, 157, 205

creation of 132–3, 142, 214

disparities of 164–81

distribution of 34, 167

extraction from non-productive activities 32

global 34

the house as a sign of 15–16

levelling up of per capita wealth 171

and poverty 146, 168, 177, 218, 219, 243

redistribution of 9, 234, 235

social 35, 53, 66, 157, 164, 210, 251, 265, 266, 268

taking it from others 132–3

_see also_ common wealth

weather futures 60

Weber, Max 122, 125

Weimar Republic 30

welfare state 165, 190, 191, 208

Wells Fargo 61

West Germany 153, 154, 161

Whitehead, Alfred North 97

Wilson, Woodrow 201

Wolf, Martin 304_n_2

Wollstonecraft, Mary: _A Vindication of the Rights of Woman_ 285

women

career versus family obligations 1–2

disposable populations 111

exploitation of 193

housework versus wage labour 114–15

oppression against 193

social struggle 168

trading of 62

violence against 193

in the workforce 108, 114, 115, 127, 174, 230

women’s rights 202, 218

workers’ rights 202

working classes

and capital 80

consumer power 81

crushing organisation 81

education 183, 184

gentrified working-class neighbourhoods ix;

housing 160

living conditions 292

wage repression and consumption 158–9

working hours 72, 104–5, 182, 272–5, 279

World Bank 16, 24, 100, 186, 245

World Trade Organization 138, 242

WPA programmes (1930s) 151

Wright, Frank Lloyd: Falling Water 16

Wriston, Walter 240

Y

YouTube 236

Yugoslavia, former 174

Z

Zola, Émile 7
